CHAPTER I.
Whither, 'midst falling dew,
While glow the heavens with the last steps of day,
Far, through their rosy depths, dost thou pursue
Thy solitary way?
Bryant.
The
slumbers of Columbus were of short duration.
While his sleep lasted it was profound, like that of a man
who has so much control over his will as to have reduced
the animal functions to its domination, for he awoke
regularly
at short intervals, in order that his watchful eye might
take a survey of the state of the weather, and of the
condition
of his vessels. On this occasion, the admiral was on
deck again, a little after one, where he found all things
seemingly in that quiet and inspiring calm that ordinarily
marks, in fine weather, a middle watch at sea. The men
on deck mostly slumbered, the drowsy pilot, and the
steersman
,
with a look-out or two, alone remaining erect and
awake. The wind had freshened, and the caravel was
ploughing her way ahead, with an untiring industry,
leaving
Ferro and its dangers, at each instant, more and more
remote. The only noises that were audible, were the
gentle
sighing of the wind among the cordage, the wash of the
water, and the occasional creaking of a yard, as the breeze
forced it, with a firmer pressure, to distend its tackle and to
strain its fittings.
The night was dark, and it required a moment to
accustom
the eye to objects by a light so feeble: when this was
done, however, the admiral discovered that the ship was not
close by the wind, as he had ordered that she should be
kept. Walking to the helm, he perceived that it was so far
borne up, as to cause her head to fall off towards the
northeast
,
which was, in fact, in the direction to Spain.
Art thou a seaman, and disregardest thy course, in
this heedless manner? sternly demanded the admiral; or
art thou only a muleteer, who fancieth he is merely
winding
his way along a path of the mountains. Thy heart is
in Spain, and thou thinkest that a vain wish to return may
meet with some relief in this idle artifice!
Alas, Seor Almirante! your Excellency hath judged
rightly in believing that my heart is in Spain, where it ought
to be, moreover, as I have left behind me at Moguer seven
motherless children.
Dost thou not know, fellow, that I too am a father, and
that the dearest objects of a father's hopes are left behind
me, also? In what, then, dost thou differ from me, my son
being also without a mother's care?
Excellency, he hath an admiral for a father, whilst my
boys have only a helmsman!
And what will it matter to Don Diego,  Columbus
was fond of dwelling on the honours he had received from
the sovereigns, even though it were a little irregularly
what will it matter to Don Diego, my son, that his parent
perished an admiral, if he perish at all; and in what will
he profit more than your children, when he findeth himself
altogether without a parent?
Seor, it will profit him to be cherished by the king
and queen, to be honoured as your child, and to be fostered
and fed as the offspring of a viceroy, instead of being cast
aside as the issue of a nameless mariner.
Friend, thou hast some reason in this, and insomuch I
respect thy feelings  answered Columbus, who, like our
own Washington, appears to have always submitted to a
lofty and pure sense of justicebut thou would'st do well
to remember the influence that thy manly and successful
perseverance in this voyage may produce on the welfare of
thy children, instead of thus dwelling on weak forebodings
1 *
of ills that are little likely to come to pass. Neither of us
hath much to expect, should we fail of our discoveries, while
both may hope every thing should we succeed. Can I trust
thee now, to keep the ship on her course, or must I send
for another mariner to relieve the helm?
It may be better, noble admiral, to do the last. I will
bethink me of thy counsel, and strive with my longings for
home; but it would be safer to seek another for this duty,
while we are so near to Spain.
Dost thou know one Sancho Mundo, a common seaman
of this crew?
Seor, we all know him; he hath the name of the
most skilful of our craft, of all in Moguer.
Is he of thy watch, or sleepeth he with his fellows of
the relief below?
Seor, he is of our watch; and sleepeth not with his
fellows below, for the reason that he sleepeth on deck. No
care, or danger, can unsettle the confidence of Sancho!
To him the sight of land is so far an evil, that I doubt if he
rejoice should we ever reach those distant countries that
your Excellency seemeth to expect we may.
Go find this Sancho, and bid him come hither: I will
discharge thy office the while.
Columbus now took the helm with his own hands, and
with a light play of the tiller brought the ship immediately
up as near the wind as she would lie. The effect was felt
in more quick and sudden plunges into the sea, a deeper
heel to leeward, and a fresh creaking aloft, that denoted a
renewed and increased strain on all the spars and their
tackle. In the course of a few minutes, however, Sancho
appeared rubbing his eyes, and yawning.
Take thou this duty, said the admiral, as soon as the
man was near him, and discharge it faithfully. Those
who have been here already, have proved unfaithful,
suffering
the vessel to fall off, in the direction of Spain; I
expect
better things of thee. I think, friend Sancho, I may
count on thee as a true and faithful follower, even in
extremity
?
Seor Don Almirante, said Sancho, who took the helm,
giving it a little play to feel his command of it, as a skilful
coachman brings his team in subjection on first assuming
the reins, I am a servant of the crown's, and your
inferior
and subordinate; such duty as becometh me, I am ready
to discharge.
Thou hast no fear of this voyageno childish
forebodings
of becoming an endless wanderer in an unknown sea,
without hope of ever seeing wife or child again?
Seor, you seem to know our hearts as well as if your
Excellency had made them with your own hands, and then
put them into our miserable bodies!
Thou hast, then, none of these unsuitable and
unseamanlike
apprehensions?
Not as much, Excellency, as would raise an ave in a
parish priest, or a sigh in an old woman. I may have my
misgivings, for we all have weaknesses, but none of them
incline to any dread of sailing about the ocean, since that is
my happiness; nor to any concern about wife and children,
not having the first, and wishing not to think I have the
last.
If thou hast misgivings, name them.  I could wish to
make one firm as thou, wholly my friend.
I doubt not, Seor, that we shall reach Cathay, or
whatever country your Excellency may choose to seek; I
make no question of your ability to beard the Great Khan,
and, at need, to strip the very jewels from his turban; as
turban he must have, being an Infidel; nor do I feel any
misgivings about the magnitude and richness of our
discoveries
and freights, since I believe, Seor Don Almirante, you
are skilful enough to take the caravels in at one end of
the earth and out at the other; or, even to load them with
carbuncles, should diamonds be wanting.
If thou hast this faith in thy leader, what other distrust
can give thee concern?
I distrust the value of the share, whether of honour or
of jewels, that will fall to the lot of one Sancho Mundo,
a poor unknown, almost shirtless mariner, that hath more
need of both than hath ever crossed the mind of our
gracious
lady, Doa Isabella, or of her royal consort.
Sancho, thou art a proof that no man is without his
failings, and I fear thou art mercenary. They say all men
have their prices; thou seemest clearly to have thine.
Your Excellency hath not been sailing about the world
for nothing, or you could not tell every man his
inclinations
so easily. I have ever suspected I was mercenary, and
so have accepted all sorts of presents, to keep the feeling
down. Nothing appeases a mercenary longing like gifts
and rewards; and as for price, I strive hard to keep mine
as high as possible, lest it should bring me into discredit for
a mean and grovelling spirit. Give me a high price, and
plenty of gifts, and I can be as disinterested as a
mendicant
friar.
I understand thee, Sancho; thou art to be bought, but
not to be frightened. In thy opinion a single dobla is too
little to be divided between thee and thy friend, the
Portuguese
.
I will make a league with thee on thine own
terms; here is another piece of gold; see that thou
remainest
true to me throughout the voyage.
Count on me, without scruple, Seor Don Almirante,
and with scruples, too, should they interfere. Your
Excellency
hath not a more disinterested friend in the fleet.
I only hope that when the share-list shall be written out,
the name of Sancho Mundo may have an honourable
place, as will become his fidelity. And now, your
Excellency
,
go sleep in peace; the Santa Maria shall lie as
near to the route to Cathay, as this south-westerly breeze
will suffer.
Columbus complied, though he rose once or twice more,
during the night, to ascertain the state of the weather, and
that the men did their duties. So long as Sancho remained
at the helm, he continued faithful to his compact; but, as
he went below with his watch, at the usual hour, successors
were put in his place, who betrayed the original treachery
of the other helmsman. When Luis left his hammock,
Columbus was already at work, ascertaining the distance
that had been run in the course of the night. Catching the
inquiring glance of the young man, the admiral observed,
gravely, and not altogether without melancholy in his
manner
We have had a good run, though it hath been more
northerly than I could have desired. I find that the
vessels
are thirty leagues farther from Ferro than when the
sun set, and thou seest, here, that I have written
four-and-twenty
in the reckoning, that is intended for the eyes of
the people. But there hath been great weakness at work
this night among the steersmen, if not treachery: they have
kept the ship away in a manner to cause her to run a part
of the time in a direction nearly parallel to the coast of
Europe, so that they have been endeavouring to deceive
me, on the deck, whilst I have thought it necessary to
attempt
deceiving them in the cabin. It is painful, Don Luis,
to find such deceptions resorted to, or such deceptions
necessary
,
when one is engaged in an enterprise that
surpasseth
all others ever yet attempted by man, and that,
too, with a view to the glory of God, the advantage of the
human race, and the especial interests of Spain.
The holy churchmen, themselves, Don Christopher,
are obliged to submit to this evil, answered the careless
Luis; and it does not become us laymen to repine at
what they endure. I am told that half the miracles they
perform are, in truth, miracles of but a very indifferent
quality, the doubts and want of faith of us hardened
sinners
rendering such little inventions necessary for the good
of our souls.
That there are false-minded and treacherous
churchmen
,
as well as false-minded and treacherous laymen, Luis,
I little doubt, answered the admiral; but this cometh of
the fall of man, and of his evil nature. There are also
righteous and true miracles, that come of the power of God,
and which are intended to uphold the faith, and to
encourage
those who love and honour his holy name. I do not
esteem any thing that hath yet befallen us to belong very
distinctly to this class; nor do I venture to hope that we
are to be favoured in this manner by an especial
intervention
in our behalf; but it exceedeth all the machinations of
the devils to persuade me that we shall be deserted while
bent on so glorious a design, or that we are not, indirectly
and secretly, led, in our voyage, by a spirit and knowledge
that both come of Divine grace and infinite wisdom.
This may be so, Don Christopher, so far as you are
concerned; though, for myself, I claim no higher a guide
than an angel. An angel's purity, and I hope I may add,
an angel's love, lead me, in my blind path across the
ocean!
So it seemeth to thee, Luis; but thou canst not know
that a higher power doth not use the Doa Mercedes, as an
instrument in this matter. Although no miracle rendereth
it apparent to the vulgar, a spirit is placed in my breast, in
conducting this enterprise, that I should deem it blasphemy
to resist. God be praised, my boy, we are at last quit of
the Portuguese, and are fairly on our road! At present all
our obstacles must arise from the elements, or from our
own fears. It gladdeneth my heart to find that the two
Pinzons remain true, and that they keep their caravels
close to the Santa Maria, like men bent on maintaining
their faith, and seeing an end of the adventure.
As Luis was now ready, he and the admiral left the
cabin together. The sun had risen, and the broad expanse
of the ocean was glittering with his rays. The wind had
freshened, and was gradually getting farther to the south,
so that the vessels headed up nearly to their course; and,
there being but little sea, the progress of the fleet was, in
proportion, considerable. Every thing appeared propitious;
and the first burst of grief, on losing sight of known land,
having subsided, the crews were more tranquil, though
dread of the future was smothered, like the latent fires of a
volcano, rather than extinguished. The aspect of the sea
was favourable, offering nothing to view that was unusual
to mariners; and, as there is always something grateful in
a lively breeze, when unaccompanied with danger, the men
were probably encouraged by a state of things to which
they were accustomed, and which brought with it
cheerfulness
and hope. In the course of the day and night, the
vessels ran a hundred and eighty miles, still farther into
the trackless waste of the ocean, without awakening half
the apprehensions in the bosoms of the mariners that they
had experienced on losing sight of land. Columbus,
however
,
acting on the cautious principle he had adopted, when
he laid before his people the result of the twenty-four hours'
work, reduced the distance to about one hundred and fifty.
Tuesday, the 1st of September, brought a still more
favourable
change of wind. This day, for the first time since
quitting the Canaries, the heads of the vessels were laid
fairly to the west; and, with the old world directly behind
them, and the unknown ocean in their front, the
adventurers
proceeded onward with a breeze at south-east. The
rate of sailing was about five miles in the hour;
compensating
for the want of speed, by the steadiness of their
progress
,
and by the directness of their course.
The observations that are usually made at sea, when the
sun is in the zenith, were over, and Columbus had just
announced
to his anxious companions that the vessels were
gradually setting south, owing to the drift of some invisible
current, when a cry from the mast-head, announced the
proximity of a whale. As the appearance of one of these
monsters of the deep breaks the monotony of a sea-life,
every one was instantly on the look-out, some leaping into
the rigging, and others upon the rails, in order to catch a
glimpse of his gambols.
Dost thou see him, Sancho? demanded the admiral of
Mundo, the latter being near him at the moment. To me
the water hath no appearance of any such animals being
at hand.
Your Excellency's eye, Seor Don Almirante, is far
truer than that of the babbler's aloft. Such as this is the
Atlantic, and yonder is the foam of the crests of the waves,
there is no whale.
The flukes!  the flukes! shouted a dozen voices at
once, pointing to a spot where a dark object arose above
the froth of the sea, showing a pointed summit, with short
arms extended on each side. He playeth with his head
beneath the water, and the tail uppermost!
Alas!  Alas! exclaimed the practised Sancho, with
the melancholy of a true seaman, what these
inexperienced
and hasty brawlers call the fluke of a whale, is nought
but the mast of some unhappy ship, that hath left her bones,
with her freight and her people, in the depths of the ocean!
Thou art right, Sancho, returned the admiral. I
now see that thou meanest: it is truly a spar, and doubtless
betokeneth a shipwreck.
This fact passed swiftly from mouth to mouth, and the
sadness that ever accompanies the evidences of such a
disaster
,
settled on the faces of all the beholders. The pilots
alone showed indifference, and they consulted on the
expediency
of endeavouring to secure the spar, as a resource in
time of need; but they abandoned the attempt on account
of the agitation of the water, and of the fairness of the wind,
the latter being an advantage a true mariner seldom likes
to lose.
There is a warning to us! exclaimed one of the
disaffected
,
as the Santa Maria sailed past the waving summit
of the spar; God hath sent this sign, to warn us not to
venture where he never intended navigators to go!
Say, rather, put in Sancho, who, having taken the fee,
had ever since proved a willing advocate, it is an omen
of encouragement sent from heaven. Dost thou not see that
the part of the mast that is visible resembleth a cross, which
holy sign is intended to lead us on, filled with hopes of
success
?
This is true, Sancho, interrupted Columbus. A cross
hath been reared for our edification, as it might be, in the
midst of the ocean, and we are to regard it as a proof that
Providence is with us, in our attempt to carry its blessings
to the aid and consolation of the heathen of Asia.
As the resemblance to the holy symbol was far from
fanciful, this happy hit of Sancho's was not without its
effect. The reader will understand the likeness all the
better, when he is told that the upper end of a mast has
much of the appearance of a cross, by means of the
trusseltrees
;
and, as often happens, this particular spar was
floating
nearly perpendicular, owing to some heavy object being
fast to its heel, leaving the summit raised some fifteen or
twenty feet above the surface of the sea. In a quarter of
an hour this last relict of Europe and of civilization
disappeared
in the wake of the vessels, gradually diminishing in
size and settling towards the water, until its faint outlines
vanished in threads, still wearing the well-known shape of
the revered symbol of Christianity.
After this little incident, the progress of the vessels was
uninterrupted by any event worthy of notice for two days
and nights. All this time the wind was favourable, and
the adventurers proceeded due west, by compass, which
was in fact, however, going a little north of the real point
a truth that the knowledge of the period had not yet
mastered. Between the morning of the 10th September,
and the evening of the 13th, the fleet had passed over near
ninety leagues of ocean, holding its way in a line but a
little deviating from a direct one athwart the great waste
of water, and having consequently reached a point as far,
if not farther west than the position of the Azores, then
the most westerly land known to European navigators.
On the 13th, the currents proved to be adverse, and having
a south-easterly set, they had a tendency to cause the ships
to sheer southwardly, bringing them, each hour, nearer to
the northern margin of the trades.
The admiral and Luis were at their customary post, on
the evening of the 13th, the day last mentioned, as Sancho
left the helm, his tour of duty having just ended. Instead
of going forward, as usual, among the people, the fellow
hesitated, surveyed the poop with a longing eye, and
finding
it occupied only by the admiral and his constant
companion
,
he ascended the ladder, as if desirous of making
some communication.
Would'st thou aught with me, Sancho? demanded
the admiral, waiting for the man to make certain that no
one else was on the narrow deck. Speak freely: thou
hast my confidence.
Seor Don Almirante, your Excellency well knoweth
that I am no fresh-water fish, to be frightened at the sight
of a shark or a whale, or one that is terrified because a
ship headeth west, instead of east; and yet do I come to
say that this voyage is not altogether without certain signs
and marvels, that it may be well for a mariner to respect,
as unusual, if not ominous.
As thou sayest, Sancho, thou art no driveller to be
terrified
by the flight of a bird, or at the presage of a drifting
spar, and thou awakenest my curiosity to know more.
The Seor de Muos is my confidential secretary, and
nothing
need be hid from him. Speak freely, then, and
without
further delay. If gold is thy aim, be certain thou shalt
have it.
No, Seor, my news is not worth a maravedi, or it is
far beyond the price of gold; such as it is, your Excellency
can take it, and think no more of my reward. You know,
Seor, that we old mariners will have our thoughts as we
stand at the helm, sometimes fancying the smiles and good
looks of some hussy ashore, sometimes remembering the
flavour of rich fruits and well-savoured mutton; and then,
again, for a wonder, bethinking us of our sins.
Vol. II.  2
Fellow, all this I well know; but it is not matter for an
admiral's ear.
I know not that, Seor; I have known admirals who
have relished mutton after a long cruise; ay, and who have
bethought them, too, of smiling faces and bright eyes, and
who, if they did not, at times, bethink them of their sins,
have done what was much worse, help to add to the great
account that was heaping up against them. Now, there
was
Let me toss this vagabond into the sea, at once, Don
Christopher, interrupted the impatient Luis, making a
forward
movement as if to execute the threat, an act which
the hand of Columbus arrested; we shall never hear a
tale the right end first, as long as he remaineth in the
ship.
I thank you, my young Lord of Llera, answered
Sancho, with an ironical smile, if you are as ready at
drowning seamen, as you are at unhorsing Christian
knights in the tourney, and Infidels in the fray, I would
rather that another should be master of my baths.
Thou know'st me, knave?  Thou hast seen me on
some earlier voyage.
A cat may look at a king, Seor Conde; and why not
a mariner on his passenger? But spare your threats, and
your secret is in safe hands. If we reach Cathay, no one
will be ashamed of having made the voyage; and if we
miss it, it is little likely that any will go back to relate the
precise manner in which your excellency was drowned, or
starved to death, or in what other manner you became a
saint in Abraham's bosom.
Enough of this! said Columbus, sternly; relate
what thou hast to say, and see that thou art discreet
touching
this young noble.
Seor, your word is law. Well, Don Christopher, it
is one of the tricks of us mariners, at night, to be watching
an old and constant friend, the north star; and while thus
occupied, an hour since, I noted that this faithful guide and
the compass by which I was steering, told different tales.
Art certain of this? demanded the admiral, with a
quickness and emphasis that betrayed the interest he felt in
the communication.
As certain, Seor, as fifty years' looking at the star,
and forty years' watching of the compass can make a man.
But there is no occasion, your Excellency, to depend on my
ignorance, since the star is still where God placed it; and
there is your private compass at your elbowone may be
compared with the other.
Columbus had already bethought him of making this
comparison; and by the time Sancho ceased speaking, he
and Luis were examining the instrument with eager
curiosity
.
The first, and the most natural, impression, was a belief
that the needle of the instrument below was defective, or,
at least, influenced by some foreign cause; but an attentive
observation soon convinced the navigator, that the remark
of Sancho was true. He was both astonished and
concerned
to find that the habitual care, and professional eye
of the fellow had been active, and quick to note a change
as unusual as this. It was indeed so common with
mariners
to compare their compasses with the north star, a
luminary
that was supposed never to vary its position in the
heavens, as that position related to man, that no experienced
seaman, who happened to be at the helm at nightfall, could
well overlook the phenomenon.
After repeated observations with his own compasses, of
which he kept twoone on the poop, and another in the
cabin; and having recourse also to the two instruments in
the binnacle, Columbus was compelled to admit to himself
that all four varied, alike, from their usual direction, nearly
six degrees. Instead of pointing due north, or, at least, in
a direct line towards a point on the horizon immediately
beneath
the star, they pointed some five or six degrees to the
westward of it. This was both a novel and an
astounding
departure from the laws of nature, as they were then
understood, and threatened to render the desired results of
the voyage so much the more difficult of attainment, as it
at once deprived the adventurers of a sure reliance on the
mariner's principal guide, and would render it difficult to
sail, with any feeling of certainty as to the course, in cloudy
weather, or dark nights. The first thought of the admiral,
on this occasion, however, was to prevent the effect which
such a discovery would be likely to produce on men already
disposed to anticipate the worst.
Thou wilt say nothing of this, Sancho? he observed
to the man. Here is another dobla to add to thy store.
Excellency, pardon a humble seaman's disobedience,
if my hand refuse to open to your gift. This matter
toucheth
of supernatural means; and, as the devil may have an
agency in the miracle, in order to prevent our converting
them heathen, of whom you so often speak, I prefer to keep
my soul as pure as may be, in the matter, since no one
knoweth what weapons we may be driven to use, should we
come to real blows with the Father of Sin.
Thou wilt, at least, prove discreet?
Trust me for that, Seor Don Almirante; not a word
shall pass my lips about this matter, until I have your
Excellency's
permission to speak.
Columbus dismissed the man, and then he turned towards
Luis, who had been a silent but attentive listener to what
had passed.
You seem disturbed at this departure from the usual
laws of the compass, Don Christopher, observed the young
man, gaily. To me it would seem better to rely
altogether
on Providence, which would scarcely lead us out
here, into the wide Atlantic, on its own errand, and desert
us when we most need its aid.
God implants in the bosom of his servants a desire to
advance his ends, but human agents are compelled to
employ
natural means; and, in order to use such means
advantageously
,
it is necessary to understand them. I look
upon this phenomenon as a proof that our voyage is to
result
in discoveries of unknown magnitude, among which,
perhaps, are to be numbered some clue to the mysteries of
the needle. The mineral riches of Spain differ, in certain
particulars, from the mineral riches of France; for, though
some things are common to all lands, others are peculiar to
particular countries. We may find regions where the
loadstone abounds, or may, even now, be in the
neighbourhood
of some island that hath an influence on our
compasses
that we cannot explain.
Is it known that islands have ever produced this effect
on the needle?
It is not  nor do I deem such a circumstance very
probable, though all things are possible. We will wait
patiently for further proofs that this phenomenon is real and
permanent, ere we reason further on a matter that is so
difficult to be understood.
The subject was now dropped, though the unusual
incident
gave the great navigator an uneasy and thoughtful
night. He slept little, and often was his eye fastened on
the compass that was suspended in his cabin as a
telltale
,
for so seamen term the instrument by which the
officer overlooks the course that is steered by the
helmsman
,
even when the latter least suspects his supervision.
Columbus arose sufficiently early to get a view of the star
before its brightness was dimmed by the return of light,
and made another deliberate comparison of the position of
this familiar heavenly body with the direction of the needles.
The examination proved a slight increase of the variation,
and tended to corroborate the observations of the previous
night. The result of the reckoning showed that the
vessels
had run nearly a hundred miles in the course of the
last twenty-four hours, and Columbus now believed himself
to be about six times that distance west of Ferro, though
even the pilots fancied themselves by no means as far.
As Sancho kept his secret, and no other eye among the
helmsmen was as vigilant, the important circumstance, as
yet, escaped general attention. It was only at night,
indeed
,
that the variation could be observed by means of the
polar star, and it was yet so slight that no one but a very
experienced and quick-eyed mariner would be apt to note
it. The whole of the day and night of the 14th consequently
passed without the crew's taking the alarm, and this so
much the more as the wind had fallen, and the vessels
were only some sixty miles farther west than when they
commenced. Still Columbus noted the difference, slight as
was the change, ascertaining, with the precision of an
experienced
and able navigator, that the needle was gradually
varying more and more to the westward, though it was by
steps that were nearly imperceptible.
2 *
CHAPTER II.
On thy unaltering blaze
The half-wrecked mariner, his compass lost,
Fixes his steady gaze,
And steers, undoubting, to the friendly coast;
And they who stray in perilous wastes, by night,
Are glad when thou dost shine to guide their footsteps right.
Hymn to the North Star.
The
following day was Saturday, the 15th, when the
title fleet was ten days from Gomera, or it was the sixth
morning since the adventurers had lost sight of the land.
The last week had been one of melancholy forebodings,
though habit was beginning to assert its influence, and the
men manifested openly less uneasiness than they had done
in the three or four previous days. Their apprehensions
were getting to be dormant for want of any exciting and
apparent stimulus, though they existed as latent impulses,
in readiness to be roused at the occurrence of any untoward
event. The wind continued fair, though lightthe whole
twenty-four hours' work showing considerably less than a
hundred miles, as the true progress west. All this time
Columbus kept his attention fastened on the needles, and
he perceived that as the vessels slowly made their westing,
the magnets pointed more and more, though by scarcely
palpable changes, in the same direction.
The admiral and Luis, by this time, had fallen into such
habits of close communication, that they usually rose and
slept at the same time. Though far too ignorant of the
hazards he ran to feel uneasiness, and constitutionally, as
well as morally, superior to idle alarms, the young man had
got to feel a sort of sportsman's excitement in the result;
and, by this time, had not Mercedes existed, he would have
been as reluctant to return without seeing Cathay, as
Columbus
himself. They conversed together of their
progress
and their hopes, without ceasing, and Luis took so
much interest in his situation as to begin to learn how to
discriminate in matters that might be supposed to affect its
duration and ends.
On the night of the Saturday just mentioned, Columbus
and his reputed secretary were alone on the poop,
conversing
,
as usual, on the signs of the times, and of the events
of the day.
The Nia had something to say to you, last evening,
Don Christopher, observed the young man; I was
occupied
in the cabin, with my journal, and had no opportunity
of knowing what passed.
Her people had seen a bird or two, that are thought
never to go far from the land. It is possible that islands
are at no great distance, for man hath nowhere passed over
any very great extent of sea without meeting with them.
We cannot, however, waste the time necessary for a search,
since the glory and profit of ascertaining the situation of a
group of islands would be but a poor compensation for the
loss of a continent.
Do you still remark those unaccountable changes in
the needles, Seor?
In this respect there is no change, except that which
goeth to corroborate the phenomenon. My chief
apprehension
is of the effect on the people, when the
circumstance
shall be known.
Are there no means to persuade them that the needle
pointeth thus west, as a sign Providence willeth they should
pursue that course, by persevering in the voyage.
This might do, Luis, answered the admiral, smiling,
had not fear so sharpened their wits, that their first
question
would be an inquiry why Providence should deprive us
of the
means
of knowing whither we are travelling, when
it so much wisheth us to go in any particular direction.
A cry from the watch on deck arrested the discourse,
while a sudden brightness broke on the night,
illuminating
the vessels and the ocean, as if a thousand lamps were
shedding their brilliancy upon the surrounding portion of
the sphere. A ball of fire was glancing athwart the
heavens
,
and seemed to fall into the sea, at the distance of a
few leagues, or at the limits of the visible horizon. Its
disappearance
was followed by a gloom as profound as the
extraordinary and fleeting light had been brilliant. This
was only the passage of a meteor; but it was such a meteor
as men do not see more than once in their livesif it
is seen as often; and the superstitious mariners did not
fail to note the incident among the extraordinary omens
that accompanied the voyage; some auguring good, and
others evil, from the event.
By St. Iago! exclaimed Luis, as soon as the light
had vanished, Seor Don Christopher, this voyage of ours
doth not seem fated to pass away unheeded by the elements
and other notable powers! Whether these portents speak
in our favour, or not, they speak us any thing but men
engaged
in an every-day occupation.
Thus it is with the human mind! returned Columbus.
Let but its owner pass beyond the limits of his ordinary
habits and duties, and he sees marvels in the most simple
changes of the weatherin a flash of lightninga blast
of airor the passage of a meteor; little heeding that these
miracles exist in his own consciousness, and have no
connexion
with the every-day laws of nature. These sights
are by no means uncommon, especially in low latitudes;
and they augur neither for nor against our enterprise.
Except, Seor Almirante, as they may beset the spirits
and haunt the imaginations of the men. Sancho telleth
me, that a brooding discontent is growing among them;
and, that while they seem so tranquil, their disrelish of the
voyage is hourly getting to be more and more decided.
Notwithstanding this opinion of the admiral, and some
pains that he afterwards took to explain the phenomenon to
the people on deck, the passage of the meteor had, indeed,
not only produced a deep impression on them, but its
history
went from watch to watch, and was the subject of
earnest
discourse throughout the night. But the incident
produced
no open manifestation of discontent; a few deeming
it a propitious omen, though most secretly considered it an
admonition from heaven against any impious attempts to
pry into those mysteries of nature that, according to their
notions, God, in his providence, had not seen fit to reveal
to man.
All this time the vessels were making a steady
progress
towards the west. The wind had often varied, both
in force and direction, but never in a manner to compel the
ships to shorten sail, or to deviate from what the admiral
believed to be the proper course. They supposed
themselves
to be steering due west, but, owing to the variation,
were in fact now holding a west-and-by-south course, and
were gradually getting nearer to the trades; a movement
in which they had also been materially aided by the force
of the currents. In the course of the 15th and 16th of the
month, the fleet had got about two hundred miles farther
from Europe, Columbus taking the usual precaution to
lessen the distance in the public reckoning. The latter day
was a Sunday; and the religious offices, which were then
seldom neglected in a Christian ship, produced a deep and
sublime effect on the feelings of the adventurers. Hitherto
the weather had partaken of the usual character of the
season
,
and a few clouds, with a slight drizzling rain, had
relieved
the heat; but these soon passed away, and were
succeeded
by a soft south-east wind, that seemed to come
charged with the fragrance of the land. The men united
in the evening chants, under these propitious circumstances;
the vessels drawing near each other, as if it might be to
form one temple in honour of God, amid the vast solitudes
of an ocean that had seldom, if ever, been whitened by a
sail. Cheerfulness and hope succeeded to this act of
devotion
,
and both were speedily heightened by a cry from the
look-out aloft, who pointed ahead and to leeward, as if he
beheld some object of peculiar interest in that quarter.
The helms were varied a little; and in a few minutes the
vessels entered into a field of sea-weed, that covered the
ocean for miles. This sign of the vicinity of land was
received
by the mariners with a shout; and the very beings
who had so shortly before been balancing on the verge of
despair, now became elate with joy.
These weeds were indeed of a character to awaken hope
in the bosom of the most experienced mariner. Although
some had lost their freshness, a great proportion of them
were still green, and had the appearance of having been
quite recently separated from their parent rocks, or the
earth that had nourished them. No doubt was now
entertained
even by the pilots, of the vicinity of land.
Tunny-fish
were also seen in numbers, and the people of the Nia
were sufficiently fortunate to strike one. The seamen
embraced
each other, with tears in their eyes, and many a
hand was squeezed in friendly congratulation, that the
previous
day would have been withheld in surly misanthropy.
And do you partake of all this hope, Don Christopher?
demanded Luis; are we really to expect the Indies as a
consequence of these marine plants, or is the expectation
idle?
The people deceive themselves in supposing our voyage
near an end. Cathay must yet be very distant from us.
We have come but three hundred and sixty leagues since
losing sight of Ferro, which, according to my computations,
cannot be much more than a third of our journey.
Aristotle
mentioneth that certain vessels of Cadiz were forced
westward by heavy gales, until they reached a sea covered
with weeds, a spot where the tunny-fish abounded. This
is the fish, thou must know, Luis, that the ancients fancied
could see better with the right eye than with the left,
because
it hath been noted that, in passing the Bosphorus,
they ever take the right shore in proceeding towards the
Euxine, and the left in returning
By St. Francis! there can be no wonder if creatures
so one-sided in their vision, should have strayed thus far
from home, interrupted the light-hearted Luis, laughing.
Doth Aristotle, or the other ancients, tell us how they
regarded
beauty; or whether their notions of justice were like
those of the magistrate who hath been fed by both parties?
Aristotle speaketh only of the presence of the fish in
the weedy ocean, as we see them before us. The mariners
of Cadiz fancied themselves in the neighbourhood of sunken
islands, and, the wind permitting, made the best of their
way back to their own shores. This place, in my
judgment
,
we have now reached; but I expect to meet with no
land, unless, indeed, we may happen to fall in with some
island that lieth off here in the ocean, as a sort of beacon
between the shore of Europe and that of Asia. Doubtless
land is not distant, whence these weeds have drifted, but I
attach little importance to its sight, or discovery. Cathay
is my aim, Don Luis, and I am a searcher for continents,
not islands.
It is now known that while Columbus was right in his
expectations of not finding a continent so early, he was
mistaken in supposing land to lie anywhere in that vicinity.
Whether these weeds are collected by the course of the
currents
,
or whether they rise from the bottom, torn from their
beds by the action of the water, is not yet absolutely
ascertained
,
though the latter is the most common opinion,
extensive
shoals existing in this quarter of the ocean. Under
the latter supposition, the mariners of Cadiz were nearer the
truth than is first apparent, a sunken island having all the
characteristics of a shoal, but those which may be supposed
to be connected with the mode of formation.
No land was seen. The vessels continued their progress
at a rate but little varying from five miles the hour, shoving
aside the weeds, which at times accumulated in masses
under
their bows, but which could offer no serious obstacle to
their progress. As for the admiral, so lofty were his views,
so steady his opinions concerning the great geographical
problem he was about to solve, and so determined his
resolution
to persevere to the end, that he rather hoped to miss
than to fall in with the islands, that he fancied could be at
no great distance. The day and night carried the vessels
rather more than one hundred miles to the westward,
placing the fleet not far from midway between the meridians
that bounded the extreme western and eastern margins of
the two continents, though still much nearer to Africa than
to America, following the parallel of latitude on which it
was sailing. As the wind continued steady, and the sea
was as smooth as a river, the three vessels kept close
together
,
the Pinta, the swiftest craft, reducing her canvass for
that purpose. During the afternoon's watch of the day
that succeeded that of the meeting with the weeds, which
was Monday, the 17th September, or the eighth day after
losing sight of Ferro, Martin Alonzo Pinzon hailed the
Santa Maria, and acquainted the pilot on deck of his
intention
to get the amplitude of the sun, as soon as the
luminary should be low enough, with a view to ascertain
how far his needles retained their virtue. This observation,
one of no unusual occurrence among mariners, it was
thought had better be made in all the caravels
simultaneously
,
that any error of one might be corrected by the
greater accuracy of the rest.
Columbus and Luis were in a profound sleep, in their
cots, taking their siestas, when the former was awakened
by such a shake of the shoulder as seamen are wont to
give, and are content to receive. It never required more
than a minute to arouse the great navigator from his
deepest
slumbers to the fullest possession of his faculties, and
he was awake in an instant.
Seor Don Almirante, said Sancho, who was the
intruder
,
it is time to be stirring: all the pilots are on deck
in readiness to measure the amplitude of the sun, as soon
as the heavenly bodies are in their right places. The west
is already beginning to look like a dying dolphin, and ere
many minutes it will be gilded like the helmet of a Moorish
Sultan.
An amplitude measured! exclaimed Columbus,
quitting
his cot on the instant. This is news, indeed! Now
we may look for such a stir among the people, as hath not
been witnessed since we left Cadiz!
So it hath appeared to me, your Excellency, for the
mariner hath some such faith in the needle as the
churchman
bestoweth on the goodness of the Son of God. The
people are in a happy humour at this moment, but the saints
only know what is to come!
The admiral awoke Luis, and in five minutes both were
at their customary station on the poop. Columbus had
gained so high a reputation for skill in navigation, his
judgment
invariably proving right, even when opposed to those
of all the pilots in the fleet, that the latter were not sorry
to perceive he had no intention to take an instrument in
hand, but seemed disposed to leave the issue to their own
skill and practice. The sun slowly settled, the proper time
was watched, and then these rude mariners set about their
task, in the mode that was practised in their time. Martin
Alonzo Pinzon, the most ready and best-taught of them all,
was soonest through with his task. From his lofty stand,
the admiral could overlook the deck of the Pinta, which
vessel was sailing but a hundred yards from the Santa
Maria, and it was not long before he observed her
commander
moving from one compass to another, in the
manner
of a man who was disturbed. Another minute or
two elapsed, when the skiff of the caravel was launched;
a sign was made for the admiral's vessel to shorten sail,
and Martin Alonzo was soon forcing his way through the
weeds that still covered the surface of the ocean towards
the Santa Maria. As he gained the deck of the latter ship,
on one of her sides, his kinsman, Vicente Yaez, the
commander
of the Nia, did the same thing on the other. In
the next instant both were at the side of the great navigator,
on the poop, whither they had been followed by Sancho
Ruiz and Bartolemeo Roldan, the two pilots of the admiral.
What meaneth this haste, good Martin Alonzo? calmly
asked Columbus: thou and thy brother, Vicente Yaez,
and these honest pilots, hurry towards me as if ye had
cheering tidings from Cathay.
God only knoweth, Seor Almirante, if any of us are
ever to be permitted to see that distant land, or any shore
that is only to be reached by mariners through the aid of a
needle, answered the elder Pinzon, with a haste that almost
rendered him breathless. Here have we all been at the
comparison of the instruments, and we find them, without
a single exception, varying from the true north, by, at least,
a full point!
That would be a marvel, truly! Ye have made some
oversight in your observations, or have been heedless in the
estimates.
Not so, noble admiral, put in Vicente Yaez, to
sustain
his brother. Even the magnets are becoming false
to us; and as I mentioned the circumstance to the oldest
steersman of my craft, he assures me that the North Star
did not tally with his instrument throughout the night!
Others say the same, here, added RuizNay, some
are ready to swear that the wonder hath been noted ever
since we entered the sea of weeds!
This may be so, Seores, answered Columbus, with
an undisturbed mien, and yet no evil follow. We all
know that the heavenly bodies have their revolutions, some
of which no doubt are irregular, while others are more in
conformity with certain settled rules. Thus it is with the
sun himself, which passeth once round the earth in the short
space of twenty-four hours, while no doubt he hath other,
and more subtle movements, that are unknown to us, on
account of the exceeding distance at which he is placed in
the heavens. Many astronomers have thought that they
Vol. II.  3
have been able to detect these variations, spots having been
seen on the disk of the orb at times, which have disappeared,
as if hid behind the body of the luminary. I think it will
be found that the North Star hath made some slight
deviation
in its position, and that it will continue thus to move
for some short period, after which, no doubt, it will be found
returning to its customary position, when it will be seen that
its temporary eccentricity hath in no manner disturbed its
usual harmony with the needles. Note the star well
throughout
the night, and in the morning let the amplitude be again
taken, when I think the truth of my conjecture will be
proved by the regularity of the movement of the heavenly
body. So far from being discouraged by this sign, we
ought rather to rejoice that we have made a discovery,
which, of itself, will entitle the expedition to the credit of
having added materially to the stores of science!
The pilots were fain to be satisfied with this solution of
their doubts, in the absence of any other means of
accounting
for them. They remained long on the poop discoursing
of the strange occurrence, and, as men even in their
blindest
moods, usually reason themselves into either tranquillity
or apprehension, they fortunately succeeded in doing the
first on this occasion. With the men there was more
difficulty
,
for when it became known to the crews of the three
vessels that the needles had begun to deviate from their
usual direction, a feeling akin to despair seized on them,
almost without exception. Here Sancho was of material
service. When the panic was at its height, and the people
were on the point of presenting themselves to the admiral,
with a demand that the heads of the caravels should be
immediately
turned towards the north-east, he interposed with
his knowledge and influence to calm the tumult. The first
means this trusty follower had recourse to, in order to bring
his shipmates back to reason, was to swear, without
reservation
,
that he had frequently known the needle and the
North Star to vary, having witnessed the fact with his own
eyes on twenty previous occasions, and no harm to come
of it. He invited the elder and more experienced seamen
to make an accurate observation of the difference which
already existed, which was quite a point of the compass,
and then to see, in the morning, if this difference had not
increased in the same direction.
This, he continued, will be a certain sign, my
friends, that the star is in motion, since we can all see
that the compasses are just where they have been ever
since we left Palos de Moguer. When one of two things
is in motion, and it is certain which stands still, there
can be no great difficulty in saying which is the uneasy
one. Now, look thou here, Martin Martinez,who was
one of the most factious of the disaffectedwords are of
little use when men can prove their meaning by
experiments
like this. Thou seest two balls of spun-yarn on this
windlass; well, it is wanted to be known which of them
remains there, and which is taken away. I remove the
smallest ball, thou perceivest, and the largest remains; from
which it followeth, as only one can remain, and that one is
the larger ball, why the smaller must be taken away. I
hold no man fit to steer a caravel, by needle or by star,
who will deny a thing that is proven as plainly and as
simply as this!
Martin Martinez, though a singularly disaffected man,
was no logician; and, Sancho's oaths backing his
demonstrations
to the letter, his party soon became the most
numerous
.
As there is nothing so encouraging to the
dull-minded
and discontented mutineer, as to perceive that he is
of the strongest side, so is there nothing so discouraging as
to find himself in the minority; and Sancho so far
prevailed
as to bring most of his fellows round to a belief in
the expediency of waiting to ascertain the state of things in
the morning, before they committed themselves by any act
of rashness.
Thou hast done well, Sancho, said Columbus, an
hour later, when the mariner came secretly to make his
nightly report of the state of feeling among the people.
Thou hast done well in all but these oaths, taken to prove
that thou hast witnessed this phenomenon before. Much as
I have navigated the earth, and careful as have been my
observations, and ample as have been my means, never
before
have I known the needle to vary from its direction
towards
the North Star: and I think that which hath escaped
my notice would not be apt to attract thine.
You do me injustice, Seor Don Almirante, and have
inflicted a wound touching my honesty, that a dobla only
can cure
Thou knowest, Sancho, that no one felt more alarm
when the deviation of the needle was first noted, than
thyself
.
So great, in sooth, was thy apprehension, that thou
even refused to receive gold, a weakness of which thou art
usually exceedingly innocent.
When the deviation was first noted, your Excellency,
this was true enough; for, not to attempt to mislead one
who hath more penetration than befalleth ordinary men, I
did fancy that our hopes of ever seeing Spain or St. Clara
de Moguer, again, were so trifling as to make it of no great
consequence who was admiral, and who a simple
helmsman
.
And yet thou would'st now brazen it out, and deny thy
terror! Didst thou not swear to thy fellows, that thou
hadst often seen this deviation before; ay, even on as many
as twenty occasions?
Well, Excellency, this is a proof that a cavalier may
make a very capital viceroy and admiral, and know all
about Cathay, without having the clearest notions of
history
!
I told my shipmates, Don Christopher, that I had
noted these changes before this night, and if tied to the
stake to be burnt as a martyr, as I sometimes think will
one day be the fate of all of us superfluously honest men,
I would call on yourself, Seor Almirante, as the witness of
the truth of what I had sworn to.
Thou would'st, then, summon a most unfortunate
witness
,
Sancho, since I neither practise false oaths myself,
nor encourage their use in others.
Don Luis de Bobadilla y Pedro de Muos, here, would
then be my reliance, said the imperturbable Sancho; for
proof a man hath a right to, when wrongfully accused, and
proof I will have. Your Excellency will please to
remember
that it was on the night of Saturday the 15th, that I
first notified your worship of this very change, and that we
are now at the night of Monday the 17th. I swore to
twenty times noting this phenomenon, as it is called, in
those eight-and-forty hours, when it would have been nearer
the truth had I said two hundred times. Santa Maria! I
did nothing but note it for the first few hours!
Go to, Sancho, thy conscience hath its latitude as well
as its longitude; but thou hast thy uses. Now, that thou
understandest the reason of the variation, however, thou
wilt encourage thy fellows, as well as keep up thy spirits.
I make no question that it is all as your Excellency
sayeth about the star's travelling, returned Sancho, and
it hath crossed my mind that it is possible we are nearer
Cathay than we have thought; this movement being made
by some evil-disposed spirits on purpose to make us lose
the way.
Go to thy hammock, knave, and bethink thee of thy
sins; leaving the reasons of these mysteries to those who
are better taught. There is thy dobla, and see that thou
art discreet.
In the morning every being in the three caravels waited
impatiently for the results of the new observations. As the
wind continued favourable, though far from fresh, and a
current was found setting to the westward, the vessels had
made, in the course of twenty-four hours, more than a
hundred
and fifty miles, which rendered the increase in the
variation
perceptible, thus corroborating a propheey of
Columbus
,
that had been ventured on previous observation. So
easily are the ignorant the dupes of the plausible, that this
solution temporarily satisfied all doubts, and it was
generally
believed that the star had moved, while the needle
remained true.
How far Columbus was misled by his own logic in this
affair, is still a matter of doubt. That he resorted to
deceptions
which might be considered innocent, in order to keep
up the courage of his companions, is seen in the fact of the
false, or public reckoning; but there is no proof that this
was one of the instances in which he had recourse to such
means. No person of any science believed, even when the
variation of the compass was unknown, that the needle
pointed necessarily to the Polar Star; the coincidence in the
direction of the magnetic needle and the position of the
heavenly
body, being thought accidental; and there is nothing
extravagant in supposing that the admiral, who had the
instrument in his possession, and was able to ascertain that
3 *
none of its virtue was visibly lost, while he could only
reason
from supposed analogy concerning the evolutions of
the star, should imagine that a friend he had ever found so
faithful, had now deserted him, leaving him disposed to
throw the whole mystery of the phenomenon on the more
distant dwellers in space. Two opinions have been
ventured
concerning the belief of the celebrated navigator, in
the theory he advanced on this occasion; the one affirming,
and the other denying his good faith in urging the doctrine
he had laid down. Those who assert the latter, however,
would seem to reason a little loosely themselves, their
argument
mainly resting on the improbability of a man like
Columbus uttering so gross a scientific error, at a time
when science itself knew no more of the existence of the
phenomenon, than is known to-day of its cause. Still it is
possible that the admiral may not have had any settled
notions
on the subject, even while he was half inclined to hope
his explanation was correct; for it is certain, that, in the
midst of the astronomical and geographical ignorance of his
age, this extraordinary man had many accurate and
sublime
glimpses of truths that were still in embryo as
respected
their development and demonstration by the lights
of precise and inductive reasoning.
Fortunately, if the light brought with it the means of
ascertaining with certainty the variation of the needle, it
also brought the means of perceiving that the sea was still
covered with weeds, and other signs that were thought to
be encouraging as connected with the vicinity of land.
The current being now in the same direction as the wind,
the surface of the ocean was literally as smooth as that of
an inland sheet of water, and the vessels were enabled to
sail, without danger, within a few fathoms of each other.
This weed, Seor Almirante, called out the elder
Pinzon
,
hath the appearance of that which groweth on the
banks of streams, and I doubt, that we are near to the mouth
of some exceeding great river!
This may be so, returned Columbus, than which
there can be no more certain sign than may be found in
the taste of the water. Let a bucket be drawn, that we
may know.
While Pepe was busied in executing this order, waiting
until the vessel had passed through a large body of weeds
for that purpose, the quick eye of the admiral detected a crab
struggling on the surface of the fresh-looking plants, and
he called to the helmsman in sufficient season, to enable
him so far to vary his course, as to allow the animal to be
taken.
Here is a most precious prize, good Martin Alonzo,
said Columbus, holding the crab between a finger and
thumb, that the other might see it. These animals are
never known to go farther than some eighty leagues from
the land; and see, Seor, yonder is one of the white tropic
birds, which, it is said, never sleep on the water! Truly,
God favoureth us; and what rendereth all these tokens
more grateful, is the circumstance of their coming from the
west, the hidden, unknown, mysterious west!
A common shout burst from the crews at the appearance
of these signs, and again the beings who lately had been
on the verge of despair, were buoyed up with hope and
ready to see propitious omens in even the most common
occurrences of the ocean. All the vessels had hauled up
buckets of water, and fifty mouths were immediately wet
with the brine; and so general was the infatuation, that
every man declared the sea far less salt than usual. So
complete, indeed, was the delusion created by these
cheerful
expectations, and so thoroughly had all concern in
connextion
with the moving star been removed by the sophism of
Sancho, that even Columbus, habitually so wary, so
reasoning
,
so calm, amid his loftiest views, yielded to his native
enthusiasm, and fancied that he was about to discover some
vast island placed midway between Asia and Europe; an
honour not to be despised, though it fell so far short of his
higher expectations.
Truly, friend Martin Alonzo, he said, this water
seemeth to have less of the savour of the sea, than is
customary
at a distance from the outlet of large rivers!
My palate telleth the same tale, Seor Almirante. As
a further sign, the Nia hath struck another tunny, and
her people are at this moment hoisting it in.
Shout succeeded shout, as each new encouraging proof
appeared; and the admiral, yielding to the ardour of the
crews, ordered sail to be pressed on all the vessels, that
each might endeavour to outstrip the others, in the hope of
being the first to discover the expected island. This strife
soon separated the caravels, the Pinta easily outsailing the
other two, while the Santa Maria and the Nia came on
more slowly, in her rear. All was gaiety and mirth, the
livelong day, on board those isolated vessels, that, unknown
to those they held, were navigating the middle of the
Atlantic
,
with horizon extending beyond horizon, without
change in the watery boundary, as circle would form
without
circle, on the same element, were a vast mass of solid
matter suddenly dropped into the sea.
CHAPTER III.
The sails were fill'd, and fair the light winds blew,
As glad to waft him from his native home;
And fast the white rocks faded from his view,
And soon were lost in circumambient foam:
And then, it may be, of his wish to roam
Repented he, but in his bosom slept
The silent thought, nor from his lips did come
One word of wail, whilst others sate and wept,
And to the reckless gales unmanly moaning kept.
Childe Harold's Pilgrimage.
As night drew near, the Pinta shortened sail, permitting
her consorts to close. All eyes now turned anxiously to
the west, where it was hoped that land might at any
moment
appear. The last tint, however, vanished from the
horizon, and darkness enveloped the ocean without
bringing
any material change. The wind still blew a pleasant
breeze from the south-east, and the surface of the ocean
offered little more inequality than is usually met on the
bosoms of large rivers. The compasses showed a slightly
increasing deviation from their old coincidence with the
polar star, and no one doubted, any longer, that the fault
was in the heavenly body. All this time the vessels were
getting to the southward, steering in fact west and by south,
when they thought they were steering west,a
circumstance
that alone prevented Columbus from first reaching
the coast of Georgia, or that of the Carolinas, since, had
he missed the Bermudas, the current of the Gulf Stream,
meeting him on his weather bow, he would have infallibly
been set well to the northward, as he neared the continent.
The night passed as usual, and at noon of the 17th, or
at the termination of the nautical day, the fleet had left
another long track of ocean between it and the old world.
The weeds were disappearing, and with them the
tunny-fish
,
which were in truth feeding on the products of shoals
that mounted several thousands of feet nearer to the
surface
of the water, than was the case with the general bed
of the Atlantic. The vessels usually kept near each other
at noon, in order to compare their observations; but the
Pinta, which, like a swift steed, was with difficulty
restrained
,
shot ahead, until the middle of the afternoon, when, as
usual, she lay-by for the admiral to close. As the Santa
Maria came sweeping on, the elder Pinzon stood, cap in
hand, ready to speak her, waiting only for her to come
within sound of his voice.
God increaseth the signs of land, and the motives of
encouragement, Seor Don Christopher; he called out,
cheerfully, while the Pinta filled her sails in order to keep
way with the admiral. We have seen large flights of
birds ahead, and the clouds at the north look heavy and
dense, as if hovering over some island, or continent, in that
quarter.
Thou art a welcome messenger, worthy Martin Alonzo,
though I wish thee to remember, that the most I expect to
meet with in this longitude is some cluster of pleasant
islands, Asia being yet several days' sail more distant. As
the night approacheth, thou wilt see thy clouds take still
more of the form of the land, and I doubt that groups may
be found on each side of us; but our high destination is
Cathay, and men with such an object before them, may not
turn aside for any lesser errand.
Have I your leave, noble admiral, to push ahead in
the Pinta, that our eyes may first be greeted with the
grateful
sight of Asia? I nothing doubt of seeing it ere morning.
Go, of God's sake, good pilot, if thou thinkest this;
though I warn thee, that no continent can yet meet thine
eyes. Nevertheless, as any land in these distant and
unknown
seas must be a discovery, and bring credit on
Castile
,
as well as on ourselves, he who first perceiveth it will
merit the reward. Thou, or any one else, hath my full
permission to discover islands, or continents, in thousands.
The people laughed at this sally, for the light-hearted are
easily excited to mirth; and then the Pinta shot ahead. As
the sun set, she was seen again lying-to for her companions
a dark speck on the rainbow colours of the glorious sky.
The horizon at the north presented masses of clouds, in
which it was not difficult to fancy the summits of ragged
mountains, receding valleys, with headlands, and
promontories
,
foreshortened by distance.
The following day the wind baffled, for the first time
since encountering the trades; and the clouds collected
over-head, dispersing drizzling showers on the navigators.
The vessels now lay near each other, and conversation flew
from one to the otherboats passing and repassing,
constantly
.
I have come, Seor Almirante, said the elder Pinzon,
as he reached the deck of the Santa Maria, at the united
request of my people, to beg that we may steer to the
north, in quest of land, islands and continent, that no doubt
lie there, and thus crown this great enterprise with the
glory that is due to our illustrious sovereigns, and your
own forethought.
The wish is just, good Martin Alonzo, and fairly
expressed
,
but it may not be granted. That we should make
creditable discoveries, by thus steering, is highly probable,
but in so doing we should fall far short of our aim. Cathay
and the Great Khan still lie west; and we are here, not to
add another group, like the Canaries, or the Azores, to the
knowledge of man, but to complete the circle of the earth,
and to open the way for the setting up of the cross in the
regions that have so long been the property of infidels.
Hast thou nothing to say, Seor de Muos, in support
of our petition? Thou hast favour with his Excellency,
and may prevail on him to grant us this small behest?
To tell thee the truth, good Martin Alonzo, answered
Luis, with more of the indifference of manner that might
have been expected from the grandee to the pilot, than the
respect that would become the secretary to the second person
of the expeditionto tell thee truth, good Martin Alonzo,
my heart is so set on the conversion of the Great Khan,
that I wish not to turn either to the right or left, until that
glorious achievement be sufficiently secure. I have
observed
that Satan effecteth little against those who keep in
the direct path, while his success with those who turn aside
is so material, as to people his dominions with errants.
Is there no hope, noble admiral? and must we quit all
these cheering signs, without endeavouring to trace them
to some advantageous conclusion?
I see no better course, worthy friend. This rain
indicateth
land; also this calm; and here is a visiter that
denoteth
more than either  yonder, in the direction of thy
Pinta, where it seemeth disposed to rest its wings.
Pinzon, and all near him, turned, and to their common
delight and astonishment they saw a pelican, with
extended
wings that spread for ten feet, sailing a few fathoms
above the sea, and apparently aiming at the vessel named.
The adventurous bird, however, as if disdaining to visit one
of inferior rank, passed the Pinta, and, sweeping up grandly
towards the admiral, alighted on a yard of the Santa Maria.
If this be not a certain sign of the vicinity of land,
said Columbus, gravely, it is what is far better, a sure
omen that God is with us. He is sending these
encouraging
calls to confirm us in our intention to serve him, and to
persevere to the end. Never before, Martin Alonzo, have
I seen a bird of this species a day's sail from the shore!
Such is my experience too, noble admiral; and, with
you, I look upon this visit as a most propitious omen. May
it not be a hint to turn aside, and to look farther in this
quarter?
I accept it not as such, but rather as a motive to
proceed
.
At our return from the Indies we may examine this
part of the ocean with greater scrutiny, though I shall think
nought accomplished until India be fairly reached, and
India is still hundreds of leagues distant. As the time is
favourable, however, we will call together our pilots, and
see how each man placeth his vessel on the chart.
At this suggestion, all the navigators assembled on board
the Santa Maria, and each man made his calculations,
sticking a pin in the rude chartrude as to accuracy, but
beautiful as to executionthat the admiral, with the lights
he then possessed, had made of the Atlantic ocean.
Vicente
Yaez, and his companions of the Nia, placed their
pin most in advance, after measuring off four hundred and
forty marine leagues from Gomera. Martin Alonzo varied
a little from this, setting his pin some twenty leagues
farther east. When it was the turn of Columbus, he stuck
a pin twenty leagues still short of that of Martin Alonzo,
his companions having, to all appearance, like less skilful
calculators, thus much advanced ahead of their true
distance
.
It was then determined what was to be stated
to the crews, and the pilots returned to their respective
vessels
.
It would seem that Columbus really believed he was then
passing between islands, and his historian, Las Casas,
affirms
that he was actually right in his conjecture; but if
islands ever existed in that part of the ocean, they have
long since disappeared; a phenomenon which, while it is
not impossible, can scarcely be deemed probable. It is said
that breakers have been seen, even within the present
century
,
in this vicinity, and it is not unlikely that extensive
banks do exist, though Columbus found no bottom with two
hundred fathoms of line. The great collection of weeds,
is a fact authenticated by some of the oldest records of
human investigations, and is most probably owing to some
effect of the currents which has a tendency to bring about
such an end; while the birds must be considered as
stragglers
lured from their usual haunts by the food that would be
apt to be collected by the union of weeds and fish. Aquatic
birds can always rest on the water, and the animal that can
wing its way through the air at the rate of thirty or even
fifty miles the hour, needs only sufficient strength, to cross
the entire Atlantic in four days and nights.
Notwithstanding all these cheering signs, the different
crews soon began to feel again the weight of a renewed
despondency
.
Sancho, who was in constant but secret
communication
with the admiral, kept the latter properly
advised
of the state of the people, and reported that more
murmurs than usual prevailed, the men having passed again,
by the suddenness of the reaction, from the most elastic
hope, nearly to the verge of despair. This fact was told
Columbus just at sunset on the evening of the 20th, or on
that of the eleventh day after the fleet lost sight of land,
and while the seaman was affecting to be busy on the poop,
where he made most of his communications.
They complain, your Excellency, continued Sancho,
of the smoothness of the water; and they say that when
the winds blow at all, in these seas, they come only from
the eastward, having no power to blow from any other
quarter. The calms, they think, prove that we are getting
into a part of the ocean where there is no wind; and the
east winds, they fancy, are sent by Providence to drive
those there who have displeased Heaven by a curiosity that
it was never intended that any who wear beards should
possess.
Do thou encourage them, Sancho, by reminding the
poor fellows that calms prevail, at times, in all seas; and,
as for the east winds, is it not well known that they blow
from off the African shores, in low latitudes, at all seasons
of the year, following the sun in his daily track around the
earth? I trust thou hast none of this silly apprehension?
I endeavour to keep a stout heart, Seor Don
Almirante
,
having no one before me to disgrace, and leaving no
one behind me to mourn over my loss. Still, I should like
to hear a little about the riches of those distant lands, as I
find the thoughts of their gold and precious stones have a
sort of religious charm over my weakness, when I begin
to muse upon Moguer and its good cheer.
Go to, knave, thy appetite for money is insatiable; take
yet another dobla, and as thou gazest on it thou may'st
fancy what thou wilt of the coin of the Great Khan;
resting
certain that so great a monarch is not without gold,
any more than he is probably without the disposition to
part with it, when there is occasion.
Sancho received his fee, and left the poop to Columbus
and our hero.
These ups and downs among the knaves, said Luis,
impatiently, were best quelled, Seor, by an application
of the flat of the sword, or, at need, of its edge.
Vol. II.  4
This may not be, my young friend, without at least far
more occasion than yet existeth for the severity. Think
not that I have passed so many years of my life in
soliciting
the means to effect so great a purpose, and have got
this far on my way, in unknown seas, with a disposition to
be easily turned aside from my purpose. But God hath
not created all alike; neither hath he afforded equal chances
for knowledge to the peasant and the noble. I have vexed
my spirit too often, with arguments on this very subject,
with the great and learned, not to bear a little with the
ignorance
of the vulgar. Fancy how much fear would have
quickened the wits of the sages of Salamanca, had our
discussion been held in the middle of the Atlantic, where
man never had been, and whence no eyes but those of logic
and science, could discover a safe passage.
This is most true, Seor Almirante; and yet, methinks
the knights that were of your antagonists should not have
been wholly unmanned by fear. What danger have we
here? this is the wide ocean, it is true, and we are no doubt
distant some hundreds of leagues from the known islands,
but we are not the less safe. By San Pedro! I have seen
more lives lost in a single onset of the Moors, than these
caravels could hold in bodies, and blood enough spilt to
float them!
The dangers our people dread may be less turbulent
than those of a Moorish fray, Don Luis, but they are not
the less terrible. Where is the spring that is to furnish
water to the parched lip, when our stores shall fail, and
where the field to give us its bread and nourishment? It is
a fearful thing to be brought down to the dregs of life, by
the failure of food and water, on the surface of the wide
ocean, dying by inches, often without the consolations of
the church, and ever without Christian sepulture. These
are the fancies of the seaman, and he is only to be driven
from them violently when duty demands extreme remedies
for his disease.
To me it seemeth, Don Christopher, that it will be time
to reason thus, when our casks are drained, and the last
biscuit is broken. Until then, I ask leave of your
Excellency
to apply the necessary logic to the
outside
of the
heads of these varlets, instead of their insides, of which I
much question the capacity to hold any good.
Columbus too well understood the hot nature of the
young noble to make a serious reply; and they both stood
sometime leaning against the mizen-mast, watching the
scene before them, and musing on the chances of their
situation. It was night, and the figures of the watch, on the
deck beneath, were visible only by a light that rendered it
difficult to distinguish countenances. The men were
grouped; and it was evident by the low but eager tones
in which they conversed, that they discussed matters
connected
with the calm, and the risks they ran. The outlines of
the Pinta and Nia were visible, beneath a firmament that
was studded with brilliants, their lazy sails hanging in
festoons
,
like the drapery of curtains, and their black hulls were
as stationary, as if they both lay moored in one of the rivers
of Spain. It was a bland and gentle night, but the
immensity
of the solitude, the deep calm of the slumbering ocean,
and even the occasional creaking of a spar, by recalling to
the mind the actual presence of vessels so situated,
rendered
the scene solemn, almost to sublimity.
Dost thou detect aught fluttering in the rigging, Luis?
the admiral cautiously inquired. My ear deceiveth me,
or I hear something on the wing. The sounds, moreover,
are quick and slight, like those produced by birds of
indifferent
size.
Don Christopher, you are right. There are little
creatures
perched on the upper yards, and that of a size like the
smaller songsters of the land.
Hark! interrupted the admiral. That is a joyous
note, and of such a melody as might be met in one of the
orange groves of Seville, itself! God be praised for this
sign of the extent and unity of his kingdom, since land
cannot well be distant, when creatures, gentle and frail as
these, have so lately taken their flight from it!
The presence of these birds soon became known to all
on deck, and their songs brought more comfort than the
most able mathematical demonstration, even though founded
on modern learning, could have produced on the sensitive
feelings of the common men.
I told thee, land was near, cried Sancho, turning with
exultation to Martin Martinez, his constant disputant;
here thou hast the proof of it, in a manner that none but
the traitor will deny. Thou hearest the songs of orchard
birdsnotes that would never come from the throats of the
tired; and which sound as gaily as if the dear little
feathered
rogues were pecking at a fig or a grape in a field of
Spain.
Sancho is right! exclaimed the seamen. The air
savours of land, tooand the sea hath a look of the land;
and God is with usblessed be his Holy nameand
honour
to our lord the king, and to our gracious mistress,
Doa Isabella!
From this moment concern seemed to leave the vessel,
again. It was thought, even by the admiral himself, that
the presence of birds so small, and which were judged to
be so feeble of wing, was an unerring evidence that land
was nigh; and land, too, of generous productions, and a
mild, gentle climate; for these warblers, like the softer sex
of the human family, best love scenes that most favour
their gentle propensities and delicate habits.
Investigation has since proved, that, in this particular,
however plausible the grounds of error, Columbus was
deceived
.
Men often mistake the powers of the inferior
animals
of creation, and at other times they overrate the
extent
of their instinct. In point of fact, a bird of light weight
would be less liable to perish on the ocean, and in that low
latitude, than a bird of more size, neither being aquatic.
The sea-weed itself would furnish resting-places out of
number
for the smaller animals, and in some instances it would
probably furnish food. That birds, purely of the land,
should take long flights at sea, is certainly improbable;
but, apart from the consequence of gales, which often force
even that heavy-winged animal the owl, hundreds of miles
from the land, instinct is not infallible; whales being
frequently
found embayed in shallow waters, and birds sailing
beyond the just limits of their habits. Whatever may have
been the cause of the opportune appearance of these little
inhabitants of the orchard, on the spars of the Santa Maria,
the effect was of the most auspicious kind on the spirits of
the men. As long as they sang, no amateurs ever listened
to the most brilliant passages from the orchestra, with
greater delight than those rude seamen listened to their
warbling, and while they slept it was with a security that
had its existence in veneration and gratitude. The songs
were renewed with the dawn, shortly after which the whole
went off in a body, taking their flight towards the
south-west
.
The next day brought a calm, and then an air so
light, that the vessels could with difficulty make their way
through the dense masses of weeds that actually gave the
ocean the appearance of vast inundated meadows. The
current was now found to be from the west, and shortly
after day-light a new source of alarm was reported by
Sancho.
The people have got a notion in their heads, Seor
Almirante
,
which partaketh so much of the marvellous, that it
findeth exceeding favour with such as love miracles more
than they love God. Martin Martinez, who is a
philosopher
in the way of terror, maintaineth that this sea into
which we seem to be entering deeper and deeper, lieth over
sunken islands, and that the weeds, which it would be
idle to deny grow more abundant as we proceed, will
shortly get to be so plentiful on the surface of the water,
that the caravels will become unable to advance, or to
retreat
.
Doth Martin find any to believe this silly notion?
Seor Don Almirante, he doth; and for the plain reason
that it is easier to find those who are ready to believe an
absurdity, than to find those who will only believe truth.
But the man is backed by some unlucky chances, that must
come of the Powers of Darkness, more particularly as they
can have no great wish to see your Excellency reach
Cathay
,
with the intention of making a Christian of the Great
Khan, and of planting the tree of the cross in his dominions.
This calm sorely troubleth many, moreover, and the birds
are beginning to be looked upon as creatures sent by Satan
himself, to lead us whither we can never return. Some
even believe we shall tread on shoals, and lie for ever
stranded wrecks in the midst of the wide ocean!
Go bid the men prepare to sound; I will show them the
folly of this idea, at least; and see that all are summoned
to witness the experiment.
4 *
Columbus now repeated this order to the pilots, and the
deep-sea was let go, in the usual manner. Fathom after
fathom of the line glided over the rail, the lead taking its
unerring way towards the bottom, until so little was left as
to compel the downward course to be arrested.
Ye see, my friends, that we are yet full two hundred
fathoms from the shoals ye so much dread, and as much
more as the sea is deeper than our measurement. Lo!
yonder, too, is a whale, spouting the water before him, a
creature never seen, except on the coasts of large islands,
or continents.
This appeal of Columbus, which was in conformity
with the notions of the day, had its weighthis crew being
naturally most under the influence of notions that were
popular. It is now known, however, that whales frequent
those parts of the ocean where their food is most abundant;
and one of the best grounds for taking them, of late years,
has been what is called the the False Brazil Banks, which
lie near the centre of the ocean. In a word, all those signs,
that were connected with the movements of birds and fishes,
and which appear to have had so much effect, not only on
the common men of this great enterprise, but on Columbus
himself, were of far less real importance than was then
believed
;
navigators being so little accustomed to venture far
from the land themselves, that they were not duly
acquainted
with the mysteries of the open ocean.
Notwithstanding the moments of cheerfulness and hope
that intervened, distrust and apprehension were fast getting
to be again the prevailing feelings among the mariners.
Those who had been most disaffected from the first, seized
every occasion to increase these apprehensions; and when
the sun arose, Saturday, September 22d, on a calm sea,
there were not a few in the vessels who were disposed to
unite in making another demand on the admiral to turn the
heads of the caravels towards the east.
We have come some hundreds of leagues before a fair
wind, into a sea that is entirely unknown to man, until we
have reached a part of the ocean where the winds seem
altogether to fail us, and where there is danger of our being
bound up in immovable weeds, or stranded on sunken
islands, without the means of procuring food or water!
Arguments like these, were suited to an age in which
even the most learned were obliged to grope their way to
accurate knowledge, through the mists of superstition and
ignorance, and in which it was a prevailing weakness to
put faith, on the one hand, in visible proofs of the
miraculous
power of God, and, on the other, in substantial
evidences
of the ascendency of evil spirits, as they were
permitted
to affect the temporal affairs of those they
persecuted
.
It was, therefore, most fortunate for the success of the
expedition, that a light breeze sprang up from the
southward
and westward, in the early part of the day just
mentioned
,
enabling the vessels to gather way, and to move
beyond the vast fields of weeds, that equally obstructed the
progress of the caravels, and awakened the fears of their
people. As it was an object to get clear of the floating
obstacles that surrounded the vessels, the first large
opening
that offered was entered, and then the fleet was brought
close upon a wind, heading as near as possible to the desired
course. Columbus now believed himself to be steering
west-north-west, when, in fact, he was sailing in a direction
far nearer to his true course, than when his ships headed
west, by compass; the departure from the desired line of
sailing, being owing to the variation in the needle. This
circumstance alone, would seem to establish the fact, that
Columbus believed in his own theory of the moving star,
since he would hardly have steered
west-and-by-south-half-south
,
with a fair wind, for many days in succession, as he
is known to have done, when it was his strongest wish to
proceed directly west. He was now heading up, within
half a point of the latter course, though he and all with
him, fancied they were running off nearly two points to
leeward of the so much desired direction.
But these little variations were trifles as compared with
the advantage that the admiral obtained over the fears of
his followers by the shift of the wind, and the liberation
from the weeds. By the first, the men saw a proof that
the breezes did not always blow from the same quarter;
and by the last, they ascertained that they had not actually
reached a point where the ocean had become impassable.
Although the wind was now favourable to return to the
Canaries, no one any longer demanded that such a course
should be adopted, so apt are we all to desire that which
appears to be denied to us, and so ready to despise that
which lies perfectly at our disposal.
This, indeed, was a moment when the feelings of the
people appeared to be as variable as the light and baffling
winds themselves. The Saturday passed away, in the
manner just mentioned, the vessels once more entering into
large fields of weeds, just as the sun set. When the light
returned, the airs headed them off to north-west and
north-west-by-north
,
by compass, which was, in truth,
steering
north-west-by-west-half-west, and north-west-half-west.
Birds abounded again, among which were a turtle-dove, and
many living crabs were seen crawling among the weeds.
All these signs would have encouraged the common men,
had they not already so often proved deceptive.
Seor, said Martin Martinez, to the admiral, when
Columbus went among the crew to raise their drooping
spirits, we know not what to think! For days, did the
wind blow in the same direction, leading us on, as it might
be, to our ruin; and then it hath deserted us in such a sea,
as mariners in the Santa Maria never before saw. A sea,
looking like meadows on a river side, and which wanteth
only kine and cow-herds, to be mistaken for fields a little
overflowed by a rise of the water, is a fearful thing!
Thy meadows are the weeds of the ocean, and prove
the richness of the nature that hath produced them; while
thy breezes from the east, are what all who have ever made
the Guinea voyage, well know to exist in latitudes so low.
I see nought in either to alarm a bold seaman; and as for
the bottom, ye all know it hath not yet been found by many
a long and weary fathom of line. Pepe, thou hast none
of these weaknesses; but hast set thy heart on Cathay,
and a sight of the Great Khan?
Seor Almirante, as I swore to Monica, so do I swear
to your Excellency; and that is to be true and obedient.
If the cross is to be raised among the infidels, my hand
shall not be backward in doing its share towards the holy
act. Still, Seor, none of us like this long unnatural
calm. Here is an ocean that hath no waves, but a surface
so smooth that we much distrust whether the waters obey
the same laws, as they are known to do near Spain; for
never before have I beheld a sea that hath so much the air
of the dead! May it not be, Seor, that God hath placed
a belt of this calm and stagnant water around the outer
edges of the earth, in order to prevent the unheedy from
looking into some of his sacred secrets?
Thy reasoning hath, at least, a savour of religion; and,
though faulty, can scarce be condemned. God hath placed
man on this earth, Pepe, to be its master, and to serve him
by extending the dominion of his church, as well as by
turning to the best account all the numberless blessings that
accompany the great gift. As to the limits, of which thou
speakest, they exist only in idea, the earth being a sphere,
or a ball, to which there are no other edges than those thou
seest everywhere on its surface.
And as for what Martin saith, put in Sancho, who
was never at fault for a fact, or for a reason, concerning
the winds, and the weeds, and the calms, I can only
wonder
where a seaman of his years hath been navigating so
long, that these things should be novelties. To me, all this
is as common as dish-water at Moguer, and so much a
matter
of course, that I should not have remarked it, but for
the whinings of Martin and his fellows. When the Santa
Catalina made the voyage to that far-off region, Ireland,
we landed on the sea-weed, a distance of half a league or
so from the coast; and as for the wind, it blew regularly
four weeks from one quarter, and four weeks from the
other; after which the people of the country said it would
blow four weeks each way, transversely; but we did not
remain long enough in those seas to enable me to swear to
the two last facts.
Hast thou not heard of shoals so wide that a caravel
could never find its way out of them, if it once entered?
demanded Martinez, fiercely, for much addicted to gross
exaggerations himself, he little liked to be outdone; and
do not these weeds bespeak our near approach to such a
danger, when the weeds themselves often are so closely
packed as to come near to stop the ship?
Enough of this, said the admiral; at times we have
weeds, and then we are altogether free from them; these
changes are owing to the currents; no doubt as soon as we
have passed this meridian, we shall come to clear water
again.
But the calm, Seor Almirante, exclaimed a dozen
voices. This unnatural smoothness of the ocean
frighteneth
us!  never before did we see water so stagnant and
immoveable!
Call ye this stagnant and immoveable? exclaimed the
admiral. Nature herself arises to reproach your
senseless
fears, and to contradict your mistaken reasoning, by
her own signs and portents!
This was said as the Santa Maria's bows rose on a long
low swell, every spar creaking at the motion, and the
whole hull heaving and setting as the billow passed beneath
it, washing the sides of the ship from the water-line to its
channels. At this moment there was not even a breath of
air, and the seamen gazed about them with an
astonishment
that was increased and rendered extreme by dread.
The ship had scarcely settled heavily into the long trough,
when a second wave lifted her again forward, and billow
succeeded
billow, each successive wave increasing in height,
until the entire ocean was undulating, though only marked
at distant intervals, and that slightly, by the foam of crests
or combing seas. It took half an hour to bring this
phenomenon
up to its height, when all three vessels were
wallowing
in the seas, as mariners term it, their hulls falling
off helplessly into the troughs, until the water fairly
spouted
from their low scuppers, as each rose by her buoyancy
from some roll deeper than common. Fancying that this
occurrence promised to be either a source of new alarm, or
a means of appeasing the old one, Columbus took early
measures to turn it to account, in the latter mode. Causing
all the crew to assemble at the break of the poop, he
addressed
them, briefly, in the following words:
Ye see, men, that your late fears about the stagnant
ocean are rebuked, in this sudden manner, as it might be,
by the hand of God himself, proving, beyond dispute, that
no danger is to be apprehended from that source. I might
impose on your ignorance, and insist that this sudden rising
of the sea is a miracle wrought to sustain me against your
rebellious repinings and unthinking alarms; but the cause
in which I am engaged needs no support of this nature, that
doth not truly come from heaven. The calms, and the
smoothness of the water, and even the weeds of which ye
complain, come from the vicinity of some great body of
land; I think not a continent, as that must lie still farther
west, but of islands, either so large or so numerous, as to
make a far-extended lee; while these swells are probably
the evidence of wind at a distance, which hath driven up
the ocean into mountainous waves, such as we often see
them, and which send out their dying efforts, even beyond
the limits of the gale. I do not say that this intervention,
to appease your fears, doth not come of God, in whose
hands I am; for this last do I fully believe, and for it am I
fully grateful; but it cometh through the agencies of nature,
and can in no sense be deemed providential, except as it
demonstrateth the continuance of the divine care, as well
as its surpassing goodness. Go then, and be tranquil.
Remember if Spain be far behind ye, that Cathay now lieth
at no great distance before ye; that each hour shorteneth
that distance, as well as the time necessary to reach our
goal. He that remaineth true and faithful, shall not repent
his confidence; while he who unnecessarily disturbeth
either himself or others, with silly doubts, may look
forward
to an exercise of authority that shall maintain the
rights of their Highnesses to the duty of all their servants.
We record this speech of the great navigator with so
much the more pleasure, as it goes fully to establish the
fact that he did not believe the sudden rising of the seas, on
this occasion, was owing to a direct miracle, as some of the
historians and biographers seem inclined to believe; but
rather to a providential interference of Divine Power,
through natural means, in order to protect him against the
consequences of the blind apprehensions of his followers.
It is not easy, indeed, to suppose, that a seaman as
experienced
as Columbus, could be ignorant of the natural
cause of a circumstance so very common on the ocean,
that those who dwell on its coasts have frequent
occasion
to witness its occurrence.
CHAPTER IV.
`
Ora pro nobis, Mater!
'what a spell
Was in those notes, with day's last glory dying
On the flush'd watersseem'd they not to swell
From the far dust, wherein my sires were lying
With crucifix and sword?Oh! yet how clear
Comes their reproachful sweetness to my ear!
`
Ora
'with all the purple waves replying,
All my youth's visions rising in the strain
And I had thought it much to bear the rack and chain!
The Forest Sanctuary.
It
may now be well to recapitulate, and to let the reader
distinctly know how far the adventurers had actually
advanced
into the unknown waters of the Atlantic; what was
their real, and what their supposed position. As has been
seen, from the time of quitting Gomera, the admiral kept
two reckonings, one intended for his own government,
which came as near the truth as the imperfect means of
the science of navigation that were then in use would
allow, and another that was freely exhibited to the crew,
and was purposely miscalculated in order to prevent alarm,
on account of the distance that had been passed. As
Columbus
believed himself to be employed in the service of
God, this act of deception would be thought a species of
pious fraud, in that devout age; and it is by no means
probable
,
that it gave the conscience of the navigator any
trouble, since churchmen, even, did not hesitate always
about buttressing the walls of faith by means still less
justifiable.
The long calms and light head-winds had prevented the
vessels from making much progress for the few last days;
and, by estimating the distance that was subsequently run
in a course but a little south of west, it appears,
notwithstanding
all the encouraging signs of birds, fishes, calms,
and smooth water, that on the morning of Monday,
September
24th, or that of the fifteenth day after losing sight
of Ferro, the expedition was about half-way across the
Atlantic, counting from continent to continent, on the
parallel of about 31 or 32 degrees of north latitude. The
circumstance of the vessels being so far north of the
Canaries, when it is known that they had been running
most of the time west, a little southerly, must be imputed
to the course steered in the scant winds, and perhaps to the
general set of the currents. With this brief explanation,
we return to the daily progress of the ships.
The influence of the trades was once more felt, though
in a very slight degree, in the course of the twenty-four
hours that succeeded the day of the miraculous seas,
and the vessels again headed west by compass Birds
were seen as usual, among which was a pelican. The
whole progress of the vessels was less than fifty miles, a
distance that was lessened, as usual, in the public
reckoning
.
The morning of the 25th was calm, but the wind
returned
,
a steady gentle breeze from the south-east, when
the day was far advanced, the caravels passing most of the
hours of light floating near each other, in a lazy indolence,
or barely stirring the water with their stems, at a rate
little, if any, exceeding that of a mile an hour.
The Pinta kept near the Santa Maria, and the officers
and crews of the two vessels conversed freely with each
other, concerning their hopes and situation. Columbus
listened to these dialogues for a long time, endeavouring to
collect the predominant feeling from the more guarded
expressions
that were thus publicly delivered, and watching
each turn of the expressions with jealous vigilance. At
length it struck him that the occasion was favourable to
producing a good effect on the spirits of his followers.
What hast thou thought of the chart I sent thee three
days since, good Martin Alonzo, called out the admiral:
Dost thou see in it aught to satisfy thee that we are
approaching
the Indies, and that our time of trial draweth
rapidly to an end?
At the first sound of the admiral's voice, every syllable
was hushed among the people; for, in spite of their
discontent
,
and their disposition even to rise against him, in
their extremity, Columbus had succeeded in creating a
profound
respect for his judgment and his person among all
his followers.
Vol. II.  5
'T is a rare and well-designed chart, Seor Don
Christopher
,
answered the master of the Pinta, and doth a
fair credit to him who hath copied and enlarged, as well as
to him who first projected it. I doubt that it is the work
of some learned scholar, that hath united the opinions of
all the greater navigators in his map.
The original came from one Paul Toscanelli, a learned
Tuscan, who dwelleth at Firenze in that country; a man of
exceeding knowledge, and of an industry in investigation
that putteth idleness to shame. Accompanying the chart
he sent a missive that hath much profound and learned
matter on the subject of the Indies, and touching those
islands that thou seest laid down with so much
particularity
.
In that letter he speaketh of divers places, as being
so many wonderful exemplars of the power of man; more
especially of the port of Zaiton, which sendeth forth no
less than a hundred ships yearly, loaded with the single
product of the pepper-tree. He saith, moreover, that an
ambassador came to the Holy Father, in the time of
Eugenius
IV., of blessed memory, to express the desire of the
Great Khan, which meaneth King of Kings, in the dialect
of those regions, to be on friendly terms with the
Christians
of the west, as we were then termed; but of the
east, as will shortly be our designation in that part of the
world.
This is surprising, Seor! exclaimed Pinzon: how
is it known, or is it known at all, of a certainty?
Beyond a question; since Paul stateth, in his missive,
that he saw much of this same ambassador, living greatly
in his society, Eugenius deceasing as lately as 1477. From
the ambassador, no doubt a wise and grave personage,
since no other would have been sent so far on a mission to
the Head of the Church;from this discreet person, then,
did Toscanelli gain much pleasant information concerning
the populousness and vast extent of those distant countries,
the gorgeousness of the palaces, and the glorious beauty
of the cities. He spoke of one town, in particular, that
surpasseth all others of the known world; and of a single
river that hath two hundred noble cities on its own banks,
with marble bridges spanning the stream. The chart
before
thee, Martin Alonzo, showeth that the exact distance
from Lisbon to the city of Quisay is just three thousand
nine hundred miles of Italy, or about a thousand leagues,
steering always in a due-west direction.
*
*
Note.
It is worthy of remark that the city of Philadelphia
stands, as near as may be, in the position that the honest Paul
Toscanelli
supposed to have been occupied by the famous city of
Quisay
.
And doth the learned Tuscan say aught of the riches
of those countries? demanded Master Alonzoa question
that caused all within hearing to prick up their ears, afresh.
That doth he, and in these precise and impressive
words`This is a noble country,' observed the learned
Paul, in his missive, `and ought to be explored by us, on
account of its great riches, and the quantity of gold, silver,
and precious stones, which might be obtained there.' He
moreover describeth Quisay as being five-and-thirty leagues
in circuit, and addeth that its name in the Castilian, is `the
City of Heaven.'
In which case, muttered Sancho, though in a tone so
low that no one but Pepe heard him, there is little need
of our bearing thither the cross, which was intended for
the benefit of man, and not of paradise.
I see here two large islands, Seor Almirante,
continued
Pinzon, keeping his eyes on the chart, one of which
is called Antilla, and the other is the Cipango of which your
Excellency so often speaketh.
Even so, good Martin Alonzo, and thou also seest that
they are laid down with a precision that must prevent any
experienced navigator from missing his way, when in
pursuit
of them. These islands lie just two hundred and
twenty-five leagues asunder.
According to our reckoning, here, in the Pinta, noble
Admiral, we cannot, then, be far from Cipango at this very
moment.
It would so seem by the reckonings, though I
somewhat
doubt their justness. It is a common error of pilots
to run ahead of their reckonings, but in this instance,
apprehension
hath brought ye behind them. Cipango lieth
many days' sail from the continent of Asia, and cannot,
therefore, be far from this spot; still the currents have been
adverse, and I doubt that it will be found that we are as
near this island, good Martin Alonzo, as thou and thy
companions
imagine. Let the chart be returned, and I will
trace our actual position on it, that all may see what reason
there is to despond, and what reason to rejoice.
Pinzon now took the chart, rolled it together carefully,
attached a light weight, and securing the whole with the
end of a log-line, he hove it on board the Santa Maria, as
a seaman makes a cast with the lead. So near were the
vessels at the moment, that this communication was made
without any difficulty; after which, the Pinta, letting fall
an additional sail or two, flapped slowly ahead, her
superiority
,
particularly in light winds, being at all times
apparent
.
Columbus now caused the chart to be spread over a table
on the poop, and invited all who chose to draw near, in
order that they might, with their own eyes, see the precise
spot on the ocean where the admiral supposed the vessels
to be. As each day's work was accurately laid down, and
measured on the chart, by one as expert as the great
navigator
himself, there is little question that he succeeded in
showing his people, as near as might be, and subject to the
deduction in distance that was intentionally made, the
longitude
and latitude to which the expedition had then
reached
;
and as this brought them quite near those islands
which were believed to lie east of the continent of Asia,
this tangible proof of their progress had far more effect
than any demonstration that depended on abstract
reasoning
,
even when grounded on premises that were true;
most men submitting sooner to the authority of the senses,
than to the influence of the mere mind. The seamen
did not stop to inquire how it was settled that Cipango
lay in the precise place where it had been projected on this
famous chart, but seeing it there, in black and white, they
were disposed to believe it was really in the spot it
appeared
to be; and, as Columbus's reputation for keeping a
ship's reckoning far surpassed that of any other navigator
in the fleet, the facts were held to be established. Great
was the joy, in consequence; and the minds of the people
again passed from the verge of despair to an excess and
illusion of hope, that was raised only to be disappointed.
That Columbus was sincere in all that related to this
new delusion, with the exception of the calculated reduction
of the true distance, is beyond a doubt. In common with
the cosmographers of the age, he believed the
circumference
of the earth much less than actual measurement
has since shown it to be; striking out of the calculations,
at once, nearly the whole breadth of the Pacific Ocean.
That this conclusion was very natural, will be seen by
glancing at the geographical facts that the learned then
possessed, as data for their theories.
It was known that the continent of Asia was bounded on
the east by a vast ocean, and that a similar body of water
bounded Europe on the west, leaving the plausible inference,
on the supposition that the earth was a sphere, that nothing
but islands existed between these two great boundaries of
land. Less than half of the real circumference of the globe
is to be found between the western and eastern verges of
the old continent, as they were then known; but it was too
bold an effort of the mind, to conceive that startling fact, in
the condition of human knowledge at the close of the
fifteenth
century. The theories were consequently content
with drawing the limits of the east and the west into a
much narrower circle, finding no data for any freer
speculation
;
and believing it a sufficient act of boldness to
maintain
the spherical formation of the earth at all. It is true,
that the latter theory was as old as Ptolemy, and quite
probably
much older; but even the antiquity of a system
begins to be an argument against it, in the minds of the
vulgar, when centuries elapse, and it receives no
confirmation
from actual experiment. Columbus supposed his island
of Cipango, or Japan, to lie about a hundred and forty
degrees
of longitude east of its actual position; and, as a
degree
of longitude in the latitude of Japan, or 35 north,
supposing the surface of the earth to be perfectly spherical,
is about fifty-six statute miles, it follows that Columbus had
advanced this island, on his chart, more than seven
thousand
English miles towards the eastward, or a distance
materially exceeding two thousand marine leagues.
All this, however, was not only hidden in mystery as
regards
the common men of the expedition, but it far
outstripped
the boldest conceptions of the great navigator
himself
.
5 *
Facts of this nature, notwithstanding, are far from
detracting from the glory of the vast discoveries that were
subsequently made, since they prove under what moral
disadvantages
the expedition was conceived, and under what
a limited degree of knowledge it finally triumphed.
While Columbus was thus employed with the chart, it
was a curious thing to witness the manner in which the
seamen watched his smallest movement, studied the
expression
of his grave and composed countenance, and sought
to read their fate in the contraction, or dilation, of his eyes.
The gentlemen of the Santa Maria, and the pilots, stood at
his elbow, and here and there some old mariner ventured
to take his post at hand, where he could follow the slow
progress of the pen, or note the explanation of a figure.
Among these was Sancho, who was generally admitted to
be one of the most expert seamen in the little fleet, in all
things, at least, that did not require the knowledge of the
schools. Columbus even turned to these men, and spoke
them kindly, endeavouring to make them comprehend a
part of their calling, which they saw practised daily,
without
ever succeeding in acquiring a practical acquaintance
with it, pointing out particularly the distance come, and
that which yet remained before them. Others, again, the
less experienced, but not the less interested among the
crew, hung about the rigging, whence they could overlook
the scene, and fancy they beheld demonstrations that came
of theories which it as much exceeded their reasoning
powers to understand, as it exceeded their physical vision to
behold the desired Indies themselves. As men become
intellectual
,
they entertain abstractions, leaving the dominion
of the senses to take refuge in that of thought. Until this
change arrives, however, we are all singularly influenced
by a parade of positive things. Words spoken, seldom
produce
the effect of words written; and the praise or censure
that would enter lightly and unheeded into the ear, might
even change our estimates of character, when received into
the mind through the medium of the eye. Thus, the very
seamen, who could not comprehend the reasoning of
Columbus
,
fancied they understood his chart, and willingly enough
believed that islands and continents must exist in the
precise
places where they saw them so plainly delineated.
After this exhibition, cheerfulness resumed its sway
over the crew of the Santa Maria; and Sancho, who was
generally considered as of the party of the admiral, was
eagerly appealed to by his fellows, for many of the little
circumstances that were thought to explain the features of
the chart.
Dost think, Sancho, that Cipango is as large as the
admiral hath got the island on the chart? asked one who
had passed from the verge of despair to the other extreme;
that it lieth fairly, any eye may see, since its look is as
natural as that of Ferro or Madeira.
That hath he, answered Sancho, positively, as one
may see by its shape. Didst not notice the capes, and
bays, and head-lands, all laid down as plainly as on any
other well-known coast? Ah! these Genoese are skilful
navigators; and Seor Colon, our noble admiral, hath not
come all this distance without having some notion in what
roadstead he is to anchor.
In such conclusive arguments, the dullest minds of the
crew found exceeding consolation; whilst among all the
common people of the ship, there was not one who did not
feel more confidence in the happy termination of the
voyage
,
since he had this seeming ocular proof of the existence
of land in the part of the ocean they were in.
When the discourse between the admiral and Pinzon
ceased, the latter made sail on the Pinta, which vessel
had slowly passed the Santa Maria, and was now a
hundred
yards, or more, ahead of her; neither going through
the water at a rate exceeding a knot an hour. At the
moment
just mentioned, or while the men were conversing of
their newly awakened hopes, a shout drew all eyes towards
their consort, where Pinzon was seen on the poop, waving
his cap in exultation, and giving the usual proofs of
extravagant
delight.
Land!Land! Seor! he shouted. I claim my
reward
!
Land! Land!
In what direction, good Martin Alonzo? asked
Columbus
,
so eagerly that his voice fairly trembled. In
which quarter dost thou perceive this welcome neighbour?
Here, to the south-west, pointing in that direction
a range of dim but noble mountains, and such as promise
to satisfy the pious longings of the Holy Father himself!
Every eye turned towards the south-west, and there,
indeed
,
they fancied they beheld the long-sought proofs of
their success. A faint, hazy mass, was visible in the
horizon
,
broken in outline, more distinctly marked than clouds
usually are, and yet so obscure as to require a practised
eye to draw it out of the obscurity of the void. This is
the manner in which land often appears to seamen, in
peculiar
conditions of the atmosphere; others, under such
circumstances, being seldom able to distinguish it at all.
Columbus was so practised in all the phenomena of the
ocean, that the face of every man in the Santa Maria was
turned towards his, in breathless expectation of the result,
as soon as the first glance had been given towards the
point of the compass mentioned. It was impossible to
mistake the expression of the admiral's countenance, which
immediately became radiant with delight and pious
exultation
.
Uncovering himself, he cast a look upward in
unbounded
gratitude, and then fell on his knees, to return
open thanks to God. This was the signal of triumph, and
yet, in their desolate situation, exultation was not the
prevalent feeling of the moment. Like Columbus, the
men felt their absolute dependence on God; and a sense
of humble and rebuked gratitude came over every spirit,
as it might be simultaneously. Kneeling, the entire crews
of the three vessels simultaneously commenced the chant
of Gloria in excelsis Deo! lifting the voice of praise, for
the first time since the foundations of the earth were laid,
in that deep solitude of the ocean. Matins and vespers, it
is true, were then habitually repeated in most Christian
ships; but this sublime chant was now uttered to waves
that had been praising their Maker, in their might and in
their calm, for so many thousand years, for the first time
in the voice of man.
Glory be to God on high!
sang these rude mariners,
with hearts softened by their escapes, dangers, and success,
speaking as one man, though modulating their tones to the
solemn harmony of a religious rite
and on earth peace,
good will towards men. We praise thee, we bless thee, we
worship thee, we glorify thee, we give thanks to thee for
thy great glory! O Lord God! Heavenly King! God
the Father Almighty!
&c. &c.
In this noble chant, which would seem to approach as
near to the praises of angels as human powers can ever
hope to rise, the voice of the admiral was distinct, and deep,
but trembling with emotion.
When this act of pious gratitude was performed, the men
ascended the rigging to make more certain of their success.
All agreed in pronouncing the faintly delineated mass to be
land, and the first sudden transport of unexpected joy was
succeeded by the more regulated feelings of confirmed
security
.
The sun set a little north of the dim mountains,
and night closed around the scene, shadowing the ocean
with as much of gloom as is ever to be found beneath a
tropical and cloudless sky. As the first watch was set,
Columbus, who, whenever the winds would allow, had
persevered
in steering what he fancied to be a due-west course,
to satisfy the longings of his people, ordered the vessels to
haul up to south-west by compass, which was in fact
heading
south-west by south, southerly. The wind increased,
and, as the admiral had supposed the land to be distant
about twenty-five leagues, when last seen, all in the little
fleet confidently relied on obtaining a full and complete
view of it in the morning. Columbus himself entertained
this hope, though he varied his course reluctantly, feeling
certain that the continent would be met by sailing west, or
what he thought to be west, though he could have no
similar
confidence as to making any island.
Few slept soundly that night, visions of oriental
riches, and of the wonders of the East, crowding on
the minds of even the least imaginative, converting their
slumbers into dreams rendered uneasy by longings for
gold, and anticipations of the wonders of the unknown East.
The men left their hammocks, from hour to hour, to stand
in the rigging, watching for some new proofs of their
proximity
to the much-desired islands, and straining their eyes
in vain, in the hope of looking deeper into the obscurity in
quest of objects that fancy had already begun to invest with
forms. In the course of the night, the vessels ran in a
direct line towards the south-west, seventeen of the
twenty-five
leagues that Columbus had supposed alone separated
him from this new discovery; and just before the light
dawned, every soul in the three vessels was stirring, in the
eager hope of having the panorama of day open on such a
sight, as they felt it to be but a slight grievance to have
come so far, and to have risked so much, to behold.
Yonder is a streak of light, glimmering in the east,
cried Luis, in a cheerful voice; and now, Seor
Almirante
,
we may unite in terming you the honoured of the
earth!
All rests with God, my young friend, returned
Columbus
;
whether land is near us or not, it boundeth the
western ocean, and to that boundary we must proceed.
Thou art right, truly, friend Gutierrez; the light is
beginning
to shed itself along the eastern margin of the sea,
and even to rise in an arch into the vault above it.
Would that the sun rose, for this one day, in the west,
that we might catch the first glimpse of our new
possessions
in that radiant field of heaven, which his coming
rays are so gloriously illuminating above the track we
have just passed!
That will not happen, Master Pedro, since Sol hath
journeyed daily round this planet of ours, from east to
west, since time began, and will so continue to journey
until time shall cease. This
is
a fact on which our senses
may be trusted, though they mislead us in so many other
things.
So reasoned Columbus, a man whose mind had
outstripped
the age, in his favourite study, and who was
usually
so calm and philosophical; simply because he
reasoned
in the fetters of habit and prejudice. The celebrated
system of Ptolemy, that strange compound of truth and
error, was the favourite astronomical law of the day.
Copernicus, who was then but a mere youth, did not
reduce the just conception of Pythagoras  just in
outline
,
though fanciful in its connextion with both cause
and effect  to the precision of science for many years
after the discovery of America; and it is a strong proof
of the dangers which attended the advancement of
thought, that he was rewarded for this vast effort of
human reason, by excommunication from the church, the
maledictions of which actually rested on his soul, if not on
his body, until within a few years of the present moment!
This single circumstance will show the reader how much
our navigator had to overcome in achieving the great office
he had assumed.
But all this time, the day is dawning, and the light is
beginning to diffuse itself over the entire panorama of
ocean and sky. As means were afforded, each look eagerly
took in the whole range of the western horizon, and a
chill of disappointment settled on every heart, as suspicion
gradually became confirmation, that no land was visible.
The vessels had passed, in the night, those bounds of the
visible horizon, where masses of clouds had settled; and
no one could any longer doubt that his senses had been
deceived by some accidental peculiarity in the atmosphere.
All eyes now turned again to the admiral, who, while he
felt the disappointment in his inmost heart, maintained a
dignified calm that it was not easy to disturb.
These signs are not infrequent at sea, Seors, he said
to those near him, speaking loud enough, nevertheless, to
be heard by most of the crew, though seldom as
treacherous
as they have now proved to be. All accustomed
to the ocean have doubtless seen them often; and as
physical
facts, they must be taken as counting neither for nor
against us. As omens, each person will consider them as
he putteth his trust in God, whose grace and mercy to us
all, is yet, by a million of times, unrequited, and still would
be, were we to sing
Gloria in excelsis,
from morn till
night, as long as breath lasted for the sacred office.
Still, our hope was so very strong, Don Christopher,
observed one of the gentlemen, that we find the
disappointment
hard to be borne. You speak of omens, Seor;
are there any physical signs of our being near the land
of Cathay?
Omens come of God, if they come at all. They are
a species of miracles preceding natural events, as real
miracles surpass them. I think this expedition cometh of
God; and I see no irreverence in supposing that this late
appearance of land may have been heaped along the
horizon
for an encouraging sign to persevere, and as a proof
that our labours will be rewarded in the end. I cannot say,
nevertheless, that any but natural means were used, for
these deceptions are familiar to us mariners.
I shall endeavour so to consider it, Seor Almirante,
gravely returned the other, and the conversation dropped.
The non-appearance of the land, which had been so
confidently hoped for, produced a deep gloom in the
vessels
,
notwithstanding; again changing the joy of their
people
into despondency. Columbus continued to steer
due-west
,
by compass, or west by south, southerly, in reality,
until meridian, when, yielding to the burning wishes of
those around him, he again altered his course to the
south-west
.
This course was followed until the ships had gone
far enough in that direction to leave no doubt that the
people
had been misled by clouds, the preceding evening. At
night, when not the faintest hope remained, the vessels kept
away due west again, running, in the course of the
twenty-four hours, quite thirty-one leagues, which were
recorded
before the crew as twenty-four.
For several succeeding days no material changes
occurred
.
The wind continued favourable, though frequently
so light as to urge the vessels very slowly ahead, reducing
the day's progress sometimes to little more than fifty of our
English miles. The sea was calm, and weeds were again
met, though in much smaller quantities than before.
September
29th, or the fourth day after Pinzon had called out
land, another frigate-bird was seen; and as it was the
prevalent notion among seamen that this bird never flew
far from the shore, some faint hopes were momentarily
revived
by his passage. Two pelicans also appeared, and
the air was so soft and balmy that Columbus declared
nothing but nightingales were wanting to render the nights
as delicious as those of Andalusia.
In this manner did birds come and go, exciting hopes
that were doomed to be disappointed; sometimes flying in
numbers that would seem to forbid the idea that they could
be straying on the waste of waters, without the certainty
of their position. Again, too, the attention of the admiral,
and of the people, was drawn to the variation of the
needle
,
all uniting in the opinion that the phenomenon was
only to be explained by the movements of the star. At
length the first day of October arrived, and the pilots of
the admiral's vessel seriously set to work to ascertain the
distance they had come. They had been misled as well as
the rest, by the management of Columbus, and they now
approached the latter, as he stood at his usual post on the
poop, in order to give the result of their calculations, with
countenances that were faithful indexes of the concern
they felt.
We are not less than five hundred and seventy-eight
leagues west of Ferro, Seor Almirante, commenced one
of the two; a fearful distance to venture into the bosom
of an unknown ocean!
Thou say'st true, honest Bartolemeo, returned
Columbus
,
calmly; though the farther we venture, the
greater will be the honour. Thy reckoning is even short
of the truth, since this of mine, which is no secret from
our people, giveth even five hundred and eighty-four
leagues, fully six more than thine. But, after all, this
scarce equalleth a voyage from Lisbon to Guinea, and
we are not men to be outdone by the seamen of Don
John!
Ah! Seor Almirante, the Portuguese have their islands
by the way, and the old world at their elbows; while we,
should this earth prove not to be really a sphere, are hourly
sailing towards its verge, and are running into untried
dangers!
Go to, Bartolemeo! thou talkest like a river-man who
hath been blown outside his bar by a strong breeze from
the land, and who fancieth his risks greater than man ever
yet endured, because the water that wetteth his tongue is
salt. Let the men see this reckoning, fearlessly; and
strive to be of cheer, lest we remember thy misgivings,
beneath the groves of Cathay.
The man is sore beset with dread, coolly observed
Luis, as the pilots descended from the poop with a lingering
step and a heavy heart. Even your six short leagues
added to the weight on his spirit. Five hundred and
seventy-eight were frightful, but five hundred and
eighty-four
became burthensome to his soul!
Vol. II.  6
What would he then have thought had he known the
truth, of which, young count, even thou art ignorant?
I hope you do not distrust my nerves, Don Christopher,
that this matter is kept a secret from me?
I ought not, I do believe, Seor de Llera; and yet one
gets to be distrustful even of himself, when weighty
concerns
hang by a thread. Hast thou any real idea of the
length of the road we have come?
Not I, by St. Iago! Seor. It is enough for me that
we are far from the Doa Mercedes, and a league more or
less counts but little. Should your theory be true, and the
earth prove to be round, I have the consolation of knowing
that we shall get back to Spain, in time, even by chasing
the sun.
Still thou hast some general notion of our true distance
from Ferro, knowing that each day it is lessened before the
people.
To tell you the truth, Don Christopher, arithmetic and
I have little feeling for each other. For the life of me, I
never could tell the exact amount of my own revenues, in
figures, though it might not be so difficult to come at their
results, in another sense. If truth were said, however, I
should think your five hundred and eighty leagues might
fairly be set down at some six hundred and ten or twenty.
Add yet another hundred and thou wilt not be far from
the fact. We are, at this moment, seven hundred and seven
leagues from Ferro, and fast drawing near to the meridian
of Cipango. In another glorious week, or ten days at most,
I shall begin seriously to expect to see the continent of
Asia!
This is travelling faster than I had thought, Seor,
answered Luis, carelessly; but journey on; one of your
followers will not complain, though we circle earth itself.
CHAPTER V.
Pronounce what sea, what shore is this?
The gulf, the rock of Salamis?
Byron.
The
adventurers had now been twenty-three days out
of sight of land, all of which time, with the exception of
a few very immaterial changes in the wind, and a day or
two of calms, they had been steadily advancing towards
the west, with a southern variation that ranged between a
fourth of a point and a point and a quarter, though the
latter fact was unknown to them. Their hopes had been
so often raised to be disappointed, that a sort of settled
gloom now began to prevail among the common men, which
was only relieved by irregular and uncertain cries of `land,'
as the clouds produced their usual deceptions in the horizon.
Still their feelings were in that feverish state which admits
of any sudden change; and as the sea continued smooth
as a river, the air balmy, and the skies most genial, they
were prevented from falling into despair. Sancho reasoned,
as usual, among his fellows, resisting ignorance and folly,
with impudence and dogmatism; while Luis unconsciously
produced an effect on the spirits of his associates by his
cheerfulness and confidence. Columbus, himself, remained
calm, dignified, and reserved, relying on the justice of his
theories, and continuing resolute to attain his object. The
wind remained fair, as before, and in the course of the
night and day of the 2d of October, the vessels sailed more
than a hundred miles still further into that unknown and
mysterious sea. The weeds now drifted westerly, which
was a material change, the currents previously setting, in
the main, in an opposite direction. The 3d proved even a
still more favourable day, the distance made reaching to
forty-seven leagues. The admiral now began to think
seriously
that he had passed the islands laid down in his
chart, and, with the high resolution of one sustained by
grand conceptions, he decided to stand on west, with the
intention of reaching the shores of the Indies, at once.
The 4th was a better day than either, the little fleet passing
steadily ahead, without deviating from its course, until it
had fairly made one hundred and eighty-nine miles, much
the greatest day's work it had yet achieved. This distance,
so formidable to men who began to count each hour and
each league with uneasiness, was reckoned to all on board,
but Luis, as only one hundred and thirty-eight miles.
Friday, October 5th, commenced even more favourably,
Columbus finding his ship gliding through the water
there being no sea to cause her to reel and stagger  at the
rate of about eight miles the hour, which was almost as
fast as she had ever been known to go, and which would
have caused this day's work to exceed the last, had not the
wind failed in the night. As it was, however, fifty-seven
more leagues were placed between Ferro and the position
of the vessels; a distance that was reduced to forty-five,
with the crew. The following day brought no material
change, Providence appearing to urge them on at a speed
that must soon solve the great problem which the admiral
had been so long discussing with the learned. It was
already dark, when the Pinta came sheering down upon the
quarter of the Santa Maria, until she had got so near that
her commander hailed without the aid of a trumpet.
Is Seor Don Christopher at his post, as usual?
hurriedly
demanded Pinzon, speaking like one who felt he had
matter of weight upon his mind: I see persons on the
poop, but know not if his Excellency be among them.
What would'st thou, good Martin Alonzo? answered
the admiral: I am here, watching for the shores of
Cipango
,
or Cathay, whichever God, in his goodness, may be
pleased first to give us.
I see so many reasons, noble admiral, for changing our
course more to the south, that I could not resist the desire
to come down and say as much. Most of the late
discoveries
have been made in the southern latitudes, and we
might do well to get more southing.
Have we gained aught by changing our course in this
direction? Thy heart seemeth bent on more southern
climes, worthy friend; while to my feelings we are now in
the very paradise of sweets, land only excepted. Islands
may
lie south, or even north of us; but a continent
must
lie west. Why abandon a certainty for an uncertainty?
the greater for the less? Cipango or Cathay, for some
pleasant
spot, fragrant with spices no doubt, but without a
name, and which can never equal the glories of Asia,
either as a discovery or as a conquest?
I would, Seor, I might prevail on you to steer more to
the south!
Go to, Martin Alonzo, and forget thy cravings. My
heart is in the west, and thither reason teacheth me to
follow
it. First hear my orders, and then go seek the Nia,
that thy brother, the worthy Vicente Yaez, may obey them
also. Should aught separate us in the night, it shall be the
duty of all to stand manfully towards the west, striving to
find our company; for it would be a sad, as well as a
useless
thing, to be wandering alone in this unknown ocean.
Pinzon, though evidently much displeased, was fain to
obey, and, after a short but a sharp and loud altercation
with the admiral, the commander of the Pinta caused her
to sheer towards the felucca to execute the order.
Martin Alonzo beginneth to waver, Columbus
observed
to Luis. He is a bold and exceeding skilful
mariner
,
but steadiness of object is not his greatest quality.
He must be restrained from following the impulses of his
weakness, by the higher hand of authority. Cathay!
Cathay is my aim!
After midnight the wind increased, and for two hours the
caravels glanced through the smooth ocean at their greatest
speed, which equalled nine English miles the hour. Few
now undressed, except to change their clothes; and
Columbus
slumbered on the poop that night, using an old sail
for his couch. Luis was his companion, and both were up
and on the deck with the first appearance of dawn. A
common feeling seemed to exist among all, that land was
near, and that a great discovery was about to be made. An
annuity of ten thousand maravedis had been promised by
the sovereigns to him who should first descry land, and
every eye was on the gaze, whenever opportunity
permitted
,
to gain the prize.
As the light diffused itself downward towards the margin
6 *
of the ocean, in the western horizon, all thought there was
the appearance of land, and sail was eagerly crowded on
the different vessels, in order to press forward as fast as
possible, that their respective crews might enjoy the earliest
and the best chances of obtaining the first view. In this
respect, circumstances singularly balanced the advantages
and disadvantages between the competitors. The Nia was
the fastest vessel in light airs and smooth water, but she
was also the smallest. The Pinta came next in general
speed, holding a middle place in size, and beating her
consorts
with a fresh breeze; while the Santa Maria, the last
in point of sailing, had the highest masts, and consequently
swept the widest range of horizon.
There is a good feeling uppermost to-day, Seor Don
Christopher, said Luis, as he stood at the admiral's side,
watching the advance of the light; and if eyes can do
it, we may hope for the discovery of land. The late run
hath awakened all our hopes, and land we must have, even
if we raise it from the bottom of the ocean.
Yonder is Pepe, the dutiful husband of Monica, perched
on our highest yard, straining his eyes towards the west,
in the hope of gaining the reward! said Columbus,
smiling. Ten thousand maravedis, yearly, would, in
sooth, be some atonement to carry back to the grieved
mother and the deserted boy!
Martin Alonzo is in earnest, also, Seor. See how he
presseth forward in the Pinta; but Vicente Yaez hath the
heels of him, and is determined to make his salutations
first to the Great Khan, neglectful of the elder brother's
rights.
Seor!  Seores! shouted Sancho from the spar on
which he was seated as composedly as a modern lady
would recline on her ottoman  the felucca is speaking
in signals.
This is true  cried Columbus  Vicente Yaez
showeth the colours of the queen, and there goeth a
lombarda
to announce some great event!
As these were the signals directed in the event that either
vessel should discover land before her consorts, little doubt
was entertained that the leading caravel had, at last, really
announced the final success of the expedition. Still, the
recent and grave disappointment was remembered, and
though all devoutly poured out their gratitude in mental
offerings, their lips were sealed until the result should show
the truth. Every rag of canvass was set, however, and
the vessels seemed to hasten their speed towards the west,
like birds tired with an unusual flight, which make new
efforts with their wearied wings as the prospect of alighting
suddenly breaks on their keen vision and active instincts.
Hour passed after hour, however, and brought no
confirmation
of the blessed tidings. The western horizon
looked heavy and clouded throughout the morning, it is
true, often deceiving even the most practised eyes; but as
the day advanced, and the vessels had passed more than
fifty miles further towards the west, it became impossible
not to ascribe the hopes of the morning to another optical
illusion. The depression of spirits that succeeded this new
disappointment was greater than any that had before
existed
,
and the murmurs that arose were neither equivocal
nor suppressed. It was urged that some malign influence
was leading the adventurers on, finally to abandon them
to despair and destruction, in a wilderness of waters. This
is the moment when, it has been said, Columbus was
compelled
to make conditions with his followers, stipulating to
abandon the enterprise altogether, should it fail of success
in a given number of days. But this weakness has been
falsely ascribed to the great navigator, who never lost the
fullest exercise of his authority, even in the darkest
moments
of doubt; maintaining his purpose, and asserting
his power, with the same steadiness and calmness, in what
some thought this distant verge of the earth, as he had
done in the rivers of Spain. Prudence and policy at last
dictated a change of course, however, which he was neither
too obstinate nor too proud to submit to, and he accordingly
adopted it of his own accord.
We are now quite a thousand leagues from Ferro, by
my private reckoning, friend Luis, said Columbus to his
young companion, in one of their private conferences,
which took place after nightfall, and it is really time to
expect the continent of Asia. Hitherto I have looked for
nought but island, and not with much expectation of seeing
even them, though Martin Alonzo and the pilots have been
so sanguine in their hopes. The large flocks of birds,
however, that have appeared to-day, would seem to invite
us to follow their flights,land, out of doubt, being their
aim. I shall accordingly change our course more to the
south, though not as far as Pinzon desireth, Cathay being
still my goal.
Columbus gave the necessary orders, and the two other
caravels were brought within hail of the Santa Maria, when
their commanders were directed to steer west-south-west.
The reason for this change was the fact that so many birds
had been seen flying in that direction. The intention of
the admiral was to pursue this course for two days.
Notwithstanding
this alteration, no land was visible in the
morning; but, as the wind was light, and the vessels had
only made five leagues since the course was changed, the
disappointment produced less despondency than usual. In
spite of their uncertainty, all in the vessels now rioted in
the balmy softness of the atmosphere, which was found so
fragrant that it was delicious to breathe it. The weeds, too,
became more plenty, and many of them were as fresh as
if torn from their native rocks only a day or two
previously
.
Birds, that unequivocally belonged to the land,
were also seen, in considerable numbers, one of which was
actually taken; whilst ducks abounded, and another
pelican
was met. Thus passed the 8th of October, the
adventurers
filled with hope, though the vessels only increased
their distance from Europe some forty miles in the course
of the twenty-four hours. The succeeding day brought no
other material change than a shift of wind, which
compelled
the admiral to alter his course to west by north, for
a few hours. This caused him some uneasiness, for it was
his wish to proceed due west, or west-southerly; though it
afforded considerable relief to many among his people, who
had been terrified by the prevalence of the winds in one
direction. Had the variation still existed, this would have
been, in fact, steering the very course the admiral desired
to go; but by this time, the vessels were in a latitude and
longitude where the needle resumed its powers and became
faithful to its direction. In the course of the night, the
trades also resumed their influence; and early on the
morning
of the 10th the vessels again headed towards the
west-south-west
,
by compass, which was, in truth, the real
course, or as near to it as might be.
Such was the state of things when the sun rose on the
morning of the 10th October, 1492. The wind had
freshened
,
and all three of the vessels were running free the
whole day, at a rate varying from five knots to nine. The
signs of the proximity of land had been so very numerous
of late, that, at every league of ocean they passed over,
the adventurers had the strongest expectations of
discovering
it, and nearly every eye in all three of the ships
was kept constantly bent on the western horizon, in the
hope of its owner's being the first to make the joyful
announcement
of its appearance. The cry of land had
been so frequent of late, however, that Columbus caused it
to be made known that he who again uttered it
causelessly
,
should lose the reward promised by the sovereigns,
even should he happen to be successful in the end. This
information induced more caution, and not a tongue
betrayed
its master's eagerness on this all-engrossing
subject
,
throughout the anxious and exciting days of the 8th,
9th, and 10th October. But, their progress in the course
of the 10th, exceeding that made in the course of both
the other days, the evening sky was watched with a
vigilance
even surpassing that which had attended any
previous
sunset. This was the moment most favourable for
examining the western horizon, the receding light
illuminating
the whole watery expanse in that direction, in a way
to give up all its secrets to the eye.
Is that a hummock of land? asked Pepe of Sancho,
in a low voice, as they lay together on a yard, watching
the upper limb of the sun, as it settled, like a glimmering
star, beneath the margin of the oceanor is it some of
this misguiding vapour that hath so often misled us of
late?
'T is neither, Pepe, returned the more cool and
experienced
Sancho; but a rise of the sea, which is ever thus
tossing itself upward on the margin of the ocean. Didst
ever see a calm so profound, that the water left a straight
circle on the horizon? No  no  there is no land to be
seen in the west to-night; the ocean, in that quarter,
looking
as blank as if we stood on the western shore of Ferro,
and gazed outward, into the broad fields of the Atlantic.
Our noble admiral may have truth of his side, Pepe; but
as yet he hath no other evidence of it than is to be found
in his reasons.
And dost thou, too, take sides against him, Sancho, and
say that he is a madman who is willing to lead others to
destruction, as well as himself, so that he die an admiral in
fact, and a viceroy in fancy?
I take sides against no man whose doblas take sides
with me, Pepe; for that would be quarrelling with the best
friend that both the rich and poor can make, which is gold.
Don Christopher is doubtless very learned, and one thing
hath he settled to my satisfaction, even though neither he
nor any of us ever see a single jewel of Cathay, or pluck
a hair from the beard of the Great Khan, and that is, that
this world is round; had it been a plain, all this water
would not be placed at the outer side, since it would clearly
run off, unless dammed up by land. Thou canst conceive
that, Pepe?
That do I; it is reasonable and according to every
man's experience. Monica thinketh the Genoese a saint!
Harkee, Pepe; thy Monica is no doubt an
uncommonly
sensible woman, else would she never have taken
thee for a husband, when she might have chosen among a
dozen of thy fellows. I once thought of the girl myself,
and might have told her so, had she seen fit to call me a
saint, too, which she did not, seeing that she used a very
different epithet. But, admitting the Seor Colon to be a
saint, he would be none the better admiral for it, inasmuch
as I never yet met with a saint, or even with a virgin, that
could understand the bearings and distances of a run as
short as that from Cadiz to Barcelona.
Thou speakest irreverently, Sancho, of virgins and
saints, seeing that they know every thing
Ay, every thing but that. Our Lady of Rabida does
not know south-east-and-by-southe-half-southe, from
north-west-and-by-noathe-half-noathe
.
I have tried her, in this
matter, and I tell thee she is as ignorant of it as thy
Monica
is ignorant of the manner in which the Duchess of
Medina Sidonia saluteth the noble duke her husband, when
he returneth from hawking.
I dare say the duchess would not know, either, what to
say, were she in Monica's place, and were she called on to
receive me, as Monica will be, when we return from this
great expedition. If I have never hawked, neither hath the
duke ever sailed for two-and-thirty days, in a west course
from Ferro, and this, too, without once seeing land!
Thou say'st true, Pepe; nor hast thou ever yet done
this and returned to Palos. But what meaneth all this
movement on deck? Our people seem to be much moved
by some feeling, while I can swear it is not from having
discovered Cathay, or from having seen the Great Khan,
shining like a carbuncle, on his throne of diamonds.
It is rather that they do not see him thus, that the men
are moved. Dost not hear angry and threatening words
from the mouths of the troublesome ones?
By San Iago! were I Don Christopher, but I would
deduct a dobla from the wages of each of the rascals, and
give the gold to such peaceable men as you and me, Pepe,
who are willing to starve to death, ere we will go back
without a sight of Asia.
'T is something of this sort, of a truth, Sancho. Let
us descend, that his Excellency may see that he hath some
friends among the crew.
As Sancho assented to this proposition, he and Pepe
stood on the deck in the next minute. Here, indeed, the
people were found in a more mutinous state than they had
been since the fleet left Spain. The long continuation of
fair winds, and pleasant weather, had given them so much
reason to expect a speedy termination of their voyage, that
nearly the whole crew were now of opinion it was due to
themselves to insist on the abandonment of an expedition
that seemed destined to lead to nothing but destruction.
The discussion was loud and angry, even one or two of
the pilots inclining to think, with their inferiors, that further
perseverance would certainly be useless, and might be fatal.
When Sancho and Pepe joined the crowd, it had just been
determined to go in a body to Columbus, and to demand, in
terms that could not be misconceived, the immediate return
of the ships to Spain. In order that this might be done
with method, Pedro Alonzo Nio, one of the pilots, and an
aged seaman called Juan Martin, were selected as
spokesmen
.
At this critical moment, too, the admiral and Luis
were seen descending from the poop, with an intent to
retire
to their cabin, when a rush was made aft, by all on
deck, and twenty voices were heard simultaneously
crying
Seor  Don Christopher  Your Excellency  Seor
Almirante!
Columbus stopped, and faced the people with a calmness
and dignity that caused the heart of Nio to leap towards
his mouth, and which materially checked the ardour of
most of his followers.
What would ye? demanded the admiral, sternly.
Speak! Ye address a friend.
We come to ask our precious lives, Seor, answered
Juan Martin, who thought his insignificance might prove
a shieldnay, what is more, the means of putting bread
into the mouths of our wives and children. All here are
weary of this profitless voyage, and most think if it last
any longer than shall be necessary to return, it will be the
means of our perishing of want.
Know ye the distance that lieth between us and Ferro,
that ye come to me with this blind and foolish request?
Speak, Nio; I see that thou art also of their number,
notwithstanding thy hesitation.
Seor, returned the pilot, we are all of a mind. To
go farther into this blank and unknown ocean, is tempting
God to destroy us, for our wilfulness. It is vain to suppose
that this broad belt of water hath been placed by
Providence
around the habitable earth for any other purpose
than to rebuke those who audaciously seek to be admitted
to mysteries beyond their understanding. Do not all the
churchmen, Seorthe pious prior of Santa Maria de
Rabida
,
your own particular friend, included  tell us
constantly
of the necessity of submitting to a knowledge we
can never equal, and to believe without striving to lift a
veil that covers incomprehensible things?
I might retort on thee, honest Nio, with thine own
words, answered Columbus, and bid thee confide in
those whose knowledge thou canst never equal, and to
follow
submissively where thou art totally unfitted to lead.
Go to; withdraw with thy fellows, and let me hear no
more of this.
Nay, Seor, cried two or three in a breath, we
cannot
perish without making our complaints heard. We have
followed too far already, and, even now, may have gone
beyond the means of a safe return. Let us then turn the
heads of the caravels towards Spain, this night, lest we
never live to see that blessed country again.
This toucheth on revolt! Who among ye dare use
language so bold, to your admiral?
All of us, Seor, answered twenty voices together.
Men need be bold, when their lives would be forfeited by
silence.
Sancho, art thou, too, of the party of these mutineers?
Dost thou confess thy heart to be Spain-sick, and thy
unmanly
fears to be stronger than thy hopes of imperishable
glory and thy longings for the riches and pleasures of
Cathay?
If I do, Seor Don Almirante, set me to greasing
masts, and take me from the helm, for ever, as one unfit
to watch the whirlings of the north star. Sail with the
caravels, into the hall of the Great Khan, and make fast
to his throne, and you will find Sancho at his post, whether
it be at the helm or at the lead. He was born in a
ship-yard
,
and hath a natural desire to know what a ship
can do.
And thou, Pepe? Hast thou so forgotten thy duty as
to come with this language to thy commander? to the
admiral
and viceroy of thy sovereign, the Doa Isabella?
Viceroy over what? exclaimed a voice from the
crowd, without permitting Pepe to answer. A viceroy
over sea-weed, and one that hath tunny-fish, and whales,
and pelicans, for subjects! We tell you, Seor Colon, that
this is no treatment for Castilians, who require more
substantial
discoveries than fields of weeds, and islands of
clouds!
Home!  Home!Spain!Spain!Palos!Palos!
cried nearly all together, Sancho and Pepe having quitted
the throng and ranged themselves at the side of Columbus.
We will no further west, which is tempting God; but
demand
Vol. II.  7
to be carried back whence we came, if, indeed, it be
not already too late for so happy a deliverance.
To whom speak ye in this shameless manner,
graceless
knaves? exclaimed Luis, unconsciously laying a hand
where it had been his practice to carry a rapier. Get ye
gone, or
Be tranquil, friend Pedro, and leave this matter with
me, interrupted the admiral, whose composure had scarce
been deranged by the violent conduct of his subordinates.
Listen to what I have to say, ye rude and rebellious men,
and let it be received as my final answer to any and all
such demands as ye have just dared to make. This
expedition
hath been sent forth by the two sovereigns, your
royal master and mistress, with the express design of
crossing the entire breadth of the vast Atlantic, until it
might reach the shores of India. Now, let what will
happen
,
these high expectations shall not be disappointed; but
westward we sail, until stopped by the land. For this
determination
,
my life shall answer. Look to it, that none
of yours be endangered by resistance to the royal orders,
or by disrespect and disobedience to their appointed
substitute
;
for, another murmur, and I mark the man that
uttereth
it, for signal punishment. In this ye have my full
determination, and beware of encountering the anger of
those whose displeasure may prove more fatal than these
fancied dangers of the ocean.
Look at what ye have before ye, in the way of fear,
and then at what ye have before ye, in the way of hope.
In the first case, ye have every thing to dread from the
sovereigns' anger, should ye proceed to a violent resistance
of their authority, or, what is as bad, something like a
certainty
of your being unable to reach Spain, for want of
food and water, should ye revolt against your lawful
leaders and endeavour to return. For this, it is now too
late. The voyage east must, as regards time, be double
that we have just made, and the caravels are beginning to
be lightened in their casks. Land, and land in this region,
hath become necessary to us. Now look at the other side
of the picture. Before ye, lieth Cathay, with all its riches,
its novelties and its glories! A region more wonderful than
any that hath yet been inhabited by man, and occupied by
a race as gentle as they are hospitable and just. To this
must be added the approbation of the sovereigns, and the
credit that will belong to even the meanest mariner that
hath manfully stood by his commander in achieving so
great an end.
If we will obey three days longer, Seor, will you then
turn towards Spain, should no land be seen? cried a voice
from the crowd.
Never returned Columbus, firmly. To India am
I bound, and for India will I steer, though another month
be needed to complete the journey. Go then to your posts
or your hammocks, and let me hear no more of this.
There was so much natural dignity in the manner of
Columbus, and when he spoke in anger, his voice carried
so much of rebuke with it, that it exceeded the daring of
ordinary men to presume to answer when he commanded
silence. The people sullenly dispersed, therefore, though
the disaffection was by no means appeased. Had there
been only a single vessel in the expedition, it is quite
probable
that they would have proceeded to some act of
violence
;
but, uncertain of the state of feeling in the Pinta
and the Nia, and holding Martin Alonzo Pinzon in as
much habitual respect as they stood in awe of Columbus,
the boldest among them were, for the present, fain to give
vent to their dissatisfaction in murmurs, though they
secretly
meditated decided measures, as soon as an
opportunity
for consultation and concert, with the crews of the
other vessels, might offer.
This looketh serious, Seor, said Luis, as soon as he
and the admiral were alone again in their little cabin, and,
by St. Luke! it might cool the ardour of these knaves, did
your Excellency suffer me to cast two or three of the most
insolent of the vagabonds into the sea.
Which is a favour that some among them have
actually
contemplated conferring upon thee and me, answered
Columbus. Sancho keepeth me well informed of the
feeling among the people, and it is now many days since
he hath let me know this fact. We will proceed peaceably,
if possible, Seor Gutierrez, or de Muos, whichever name
thou most affectest, as long as we can; but should there
truly arise an occasion to resort to force, thou wilt find that
Christofero Colombo knoweth how to wield a sword as well
as he knoweth how to use his instruments of science.
How far do you really think us from land, Seor
Almirante
?
I ask from curiosity and not from dread; for
though the ship floated on the very verge of the earth,
ready to fall off into vacuum, you should hear no murmur
from me.
I am well assured of this, young noble, returned
Columbus
,
affectionately squeezing the hand of Luis, else
would'st thou not be here. I make our distance from Ferro
exceed a thousand marine leagues: this is about the same
as that at which I have supposed Cathay to lie from Europe,
and it is, out of question, sufficiently far to meet with many
of the islands that are known to abound in the seas of
Asia. The public reckoning maketh the distance a little
more than eight hundred leagues; but, in consequence of
the favourable currents of which we have lately had so
much, I doubt if we are not fully eleven hundred from the
Canaries, at this moment, if not even farther. We are
doubtless a trifle nearer to the Azores, which are situated
farther west, though in a higher latitude.
Then you think, Seor, that we may really expect
land, ere many days?
So certain do I feel of this, Luis, that I should have
little apprehension of complying with the terms of these
audacious men, but for the humiliation. Ptolemy divided
the earth into twenty-four hours, of fifteen degrees each,
and I place but some five or six of these hours in the
Atlantic
.
Thirteen hundred leagues, I feel persuaded, will
bring us to the shores of Asia, and eleven of these thirteen
hundred leagues do I believe we have come.
To-morrow may then prove an eventful day, Seor
Almirante; and now to our cots, where I shall dream of a
fairer land than Christian eye ever yet looked upon, with
the fairest maiden of Spain  nay, by San Pedro! of
Europe
beckoning
me on!
Columbus and Luis now sought their rest. In the
morning
,
it was evident by the surly looks of the people, that
feelings like a suppressed volcano were burning in their
bosoms, and that any untoward accident might produce an
eruption. Fortunately, however, signs, of a nature so
novel, soon appeared, as to draw off the attention of the
most disaffected from their melancholy broodings. The
wind was fresh, as usual fair, and, what was really a
novelty
since quitting Ferro, the sea had got up, and the
vessels
were riding over waves which removed that appearance
of an unnatural calm that had hitherto alarmed the men
with its long continuance. Columbus had not been on deck
five minutes, when a joyful cry from Pepe drew all eyes
towards the yard on which he was at work. The seaman
was pointing eagerly at some object in the water, and
rushing
to the side of the vessel, all saw the welcome sign that
had caught his gaze. As the ship lifted on a sea, and shot
ahead, a rush, of a bright fresh green, was passed, and the
men gave a loud shout, for all well knew that this plant
certainly came from some shore, and that it could not
have been long torn from the spot of its growth.
This is truly a blessed omen! said Columbus: rushes
cannot grow without the light of heaven, whatever may be
the case with weeds.
This little occurrence changed, or at least checked, the
feelings of the disaffected. Hope once more resumed its
sway, and all who could, ascended the rigging to watch the
western horizon. The rapid motion of the vessels, too,
added to this buoyancy of feeling, the Pinta and Nia
passing and repassing the admiral, as it might be in pure
wantonness. A few hours later, fresh weeds were met, and
about noon Sancho announced confidently that he had seen
a fish which is known to live in the vicinity of rocks. An
hour later, the Nia came sheering up towards the admiral,
with her commander in the rigging, evidently desirous of
communicating some tidings of moment.
What now, good Vicente Yaez? called out
Columbus
:
thou seemest the messenger of welcome news!
I think myself such, Don Christopher, answered the
other. We have just passed a bush bearing roseberries,
quite newly torn from the tree! This is a sign that cannot
deceive us.
Thou say'st true, my friend. To the west!  to the
west! Happy will he be whose eyes first behold the
wonders
of the Indies!
It would not be easy to describe the degree of hope and
7 *
exultation that now began to show itself among the people.
Good-natured jests flew about the decks, and the laugh was
easily raised where so lately all had been despondency and
gloom. The minutes flew swiftly by, and every man had
ceased to think of Spain, bending his thoughts again on
the as yet unseen west.
A little later, a cry of exultation was heard from the
Pinta, which was a short distance to windward and ahead
of the admiral. As this vessel shortened sail and hove-to,
lowering a boat, and then immediately kept away, the Santa
Maria soon came foaming up under her quarter, and spoke
her.
What now, Martin Alonzo? asked Columbus,
suppressing
his anxiety in an appearance of calmness and
dignity
.
Thou and thy people seem in an ecstasy!
Well may we be so! About an hour since, we passed
a piece of the cane-plant, of the sort of which sugar is
made in the East, as travellers say, and such as we often
see in our own ports. But this is a trifling symptom of
land compared to the trunk of a tree that we have also
passed. As if Providence had not yet dealt with us with
sufficient kindness, all these articles were met floating near
each other; and we have thought them of sufficient value
to lower a boat, that we might possess them.
Lay thy sails to the mast, good Martin Alonzo, and
send thy prizes hither, that I may judge of their value.
Pinzon complied, and the Santa Maria being hove-to, at
the same time, the boat soon touched her side. Martin
Alonzo made but one bound from the thwart to the gunwale
of the ship, and was soon on the deck of the admiral.
Here he eagerly displayed the different articles that his
men tossed after him, all of which had been taken out of
the sea, not an hour before.
See, noble Seores, said Martin Alonzo, almost
breathless
with haste to display his treasuresthis is a sort of
board, though of unknown wood, and fashioned with
exceeding
care: here is also another piece of cane: this is a
plant that surely cometh from the land; and most of all,
this is a walking-stick, fashioned by the hand of man, and
that, too, with exceeding care!
All this is true, said Columbus, examining the different
articles, one by one; God, in his might and power, be
praised for these comfortable evidences of our near
approach
to a new world! None but a malignant infidel can
now doubt of our final success.
These things have questionless come from some boat
that hath been upset, which will account for their being so
near each other in the water, said Martin Alonzo, willing
to sustain his physical proofs by a plausible theory. It
would not be wonderful were drowned bodies near.
Let us hope not, Martin Alonzo, answered the
admiral
;
let us fancy nought so melancholy. A thousand
accidents may have thrown these articles together, into the
sea; and once there, they would float in company for a
twelvemonth, unless violently separated. But, come they
whence they may, to us, they are infallible proofs that not
only land is near, but land which is the abiding place of
men.
It is not easy to describe the enthusiasm that now
prevailed
in all the vessels. Hitherto they had met with only
birds, and fishes, and weeds, signs that are often
precarious
;
but here was such proof of their being in the
neighbourhood
of their fellow-creatures, as it was not easy to
withstand. It was true, articles of this nature might drift,
in time, even across the vast distance they had come; but
it was not probable that they would drift so far in
company
.
Then, the berries were fresh, the board was of an
unknown wood, and the walking-stick, in particular, if
such indeed was its use, was carved in a manner that was
never practised in Europe. The different articles passed
from hand to hand, until all in the ship had examined
them; and every thing like doubt vanished before this
unlooked-for
confirmation of the admiral's predictions.
Pinzon
returned to his vessel, sail was again made, and the
fleet continued to steer to the west-south-west, until the
hour of sunset.
Something like a chill of disappointment again came
over the more faint-hearted of the people, however, as they
once more, or for the thirty-fourth time since quitting
Gomera
,
saw the sun sink behind a watery horizon. More
than a hundred vigilant eyes watched the glowing margin
of the ocean, at this interesting moment, and though the
heavens were cloudless, nought was visible but the
gloriously
tinted vault, and the outline of water, broken into
the usual ragged forms of the unquiet element.
The wind freshened as evening closed, and Columbus
having called his vessels together, as was usual with him
at that hour, he issued new orders concerning the course.
For the last two or three days they had been steering
materially
to the southward of west, and Columbus, who felt
persuaded that his most certain and his nearest direction,
from land to land, was to traverse the ocean, if possible,
on a single parallel of latitude, was anxious to resume his
favourite course, which was what he fancied to be due west.
Just as night drew around the mariners, accordingly, the
ships edged away to the required course, and ran off at the
rate of nine miles the hour, following the orb of day, as if
resolute to penetrate into the mysteries of his nightly
retreat
,
until some great discovery should reward the effort.
Immediately after this change in the course, the people
sang the vesper hymn, as usual, which, in that mild sea,
they often deferred until the hour when the watch below
sought their hammocks. That night, however, none felt
disposed to sleep; and it was late when the chant of the
seamen commenced, with the words of
Salve fac
Regina
.
It was a solemn thing to hear the songs of religious
praise, mingling with the sighings of the breeze and the
wash of the waters, in that ocean solitude; and the
solemnity
was increased by the expectations of the
adventurers
and the mysteries that lay behind the curtain they
believed themselves about to raise. Never before had this
hymn sounded so sweetly in the ears of Columbus, and
Luis found his eyes suffusing with tears as he recalled the
soft thrilling notes of Mercedes's voice, in her holy
breathings
of praise at this hour. When the office ended, the
admiral called the crew to the quarter-deck, and addressed
them earnestly from his station on the poop.
I rejoice, my friends, he said, that you have had the
grace to chant the vesper hymn in so devout a spirit, at a
moment when there is so much reason to be grateful to
God for his goodness to us throughout this voyage. Look
back at the past, and see if one of you, the oldest sailor
of your number, can recal any passage at sea, I will not
say of equal length, for that no one here hath ever before
made, but any equal number of days at sea, in which the
winds have been as fair, the weather as propitious, or the
ocean as calm, as on this occasion. Then what cheering
signs have encouraged us to persevere! God is in the
midst of the ocean, my friends, as well as in his
sanctuaries
of the land. Step by step, as it were, hath he led us
on, now filling the air with birds, now causing the sea to
abound with unusual fishes, and then spreading before us
fields of plants, such as are seldom met far from the rocks
where they grew. The last and best of his signs hath he
given us this day. My own calculations are in unison with
these proofs, and I deem it probable that we reach the land
this very night. In a few hours, or when we shall have
run the distance commanded by the eye, as the light left
us, I shall deem it prudent to shorten sail; and I call on
all of you to be watchful, lest we unwittingly throw
ourselves
on the strange shores. Ye know that the sovereigns
have graciously promised ten thousand maravedis, yearly,
and for life, to him who shall first discover land: to this
rich reward, I will add a doublet of velvet, such as it would
befit a grandee to wear. Sleep not, then; but, at the turn
of the night, be all vigilance and watchfulness. I am now
most serious with ye, and look for land this very blessed
night.
These encouraging words produced their full effect, the
men scattering themselves in the ship, each taking the best
position he could, to earn the coveted prizes. Deep
expectation
is always a quiet feeling, the jealous senses
seeming to require silence and intensity of concentration,
in order to give them their full exercise. Columbus
remained
on the poop, while Luis, less interested, threw
himself
on a sail, and passed the time in musing on Mercedes,
and in picturing to himself the joyful moment when he
might meet her again, a triumphant and successful
adventurer
.
The death-like silence that prevailed in the ship, added
to the absorbing interest of that important night. At the
distance of a mile was the little Nia, gliding on her course
with a full sail; while half a league still farther in advance
was to be seen the shadowy outline of the Pinta, which
preceded her consorts, as the swiftest sailer with a fresh
breeze. Sancho had been round to every sheet and brace,
in person, and never before had the admiral's ship held as
good way with her consorts as on that night, all three of
the vessels appearing to have caught the eager spirit of
those they contained, and to be anxious to outdo themselves.
At moments the men started, while the wind murmured
through the cordage, as if they heard unknown and strange
voices from a mysterious world; and fifty times, when the
waves combed upon the sides of the ship, did they turn
their heads, expecting to see a crowd of unknown beings,
fresh from the eastern world, pouring in upon their decks.
As for Columbus, he sighed often; for minutes at a
time would he stand looking intently towards the west, like
one who strove to penetrate the gloom of night, with
organs exceeding human powers. At length he bent his
body forward, gazed intently over the weather railing of
the ship, and then lifting his cap, he seemed to be offering
up his spirit in thanksgiving or prayer. All this Luis
witnessed
,
where he lay: at the next instant he heard himself
called.
Pero Gutierrez  Pedro de Muos  Luis  whatever
thou art termed, said Columbus, his fine masculine voice
trembling with eagerness,come hither, son; tell me if
thine eyes accord with mine. Look in this direction
here, more on the vessel's beam; seest thou aught
uncommon
?
I saw a light, Seor; one that resembled a candle,
being neither larger nor more brilliant; and to me it
appeared
to move, as if carried in the hand, or tossed by
waves.
Thy eyes did not deceive thee; thou seest it doth
not come of either of our consorts, both of which are
here on the bow.
What do you, then, take this light to signify, Don
Christopher?
Land! It is either on the land itself, rendered small
by distance, or it cometh of some vessel that is a stranger
to us, and which belongeth to the Indies. There is Rodrigo
Sanchez of Segovia, the comptroller of the fleet, beneath
us; descend and bid him come hither.
Luis did as required, and presently the comptroller was
also at the admiral's side. Half an hour passed, and the
light was not seen again; then it gleamed upward once or
twice, like a torch, and finally disappeared. This
circumstance
was soon known to all in the ship, though few
attached the same importance to it as Columbus himself.
This is land, quietly observed the admiral, to those
near his person: ere many hours we may except to behold
it. Now ye may pour out your souls in gratitude and
confidence
,
for in such a sign there can be no deception. No
phenomenon of the ocean resembleth that light; and my
reckoning placeth us in a quarter of the world where land
must
exist, else is the earth no sphere.
Notwithstanding this great confidence on the part of the
admiral, most of those in the ship did not yet feel the same
certainty in the result, although all felt the strongest hopes
of falling in with land next day. Columbus saying no
more on the subject, the former silence was soon resumed,
and, in a few minutes, every eye was again turned to the
west, in anxious watchfulness. In this manner the time
passed away, the ships driving ahead with a speed much
exceeding that of their ordinary rate of sailing, until the
night had turned, when its darkness was suddenly
illuminated
by a blaze of light, and the report of a gun from
the Pinta came struggling up against the fresh breeze of
the trades.
There speaketh Martin Alonzo! exclaimed the
admiral
;
and we may be certain that he hath not given the
signal idly. Who sitteth on the top-gallant yard, there, on
watch for wonders ahead?
Seor Don Almirante, it is I, answered Sancho. I
have been here since we sang the vesper hymn.
Seest thou aught unusual, westward? Look vigilantly,
for we touch on mighty things!
Nought, Seor, unless it be that the Pinta is lessening
her canvass, and the Nia is already closing with our fleet
consort  nay, I now see the latter shortening sail, also!
For these great tidings, all honour and praise be to
God! These are proofs that no false cry hath this time
misled their judgments. We will join our consorts, good
Bartolemeo, ere we take in a single inch of canvass.
Everything was now in motion on board the Santa Maria,
which went dashing ahead for another half hour, when she
came up with the two other caravels, both of which had
hauled by the wind, under short canvass, and were forging
slowly through the water, on different tacks, like coursers
cooling themselves after having terminated a severe
struggle
by reaching the goal.
Come hither, Luis, said Columbus, and feast thine
eyes with a sight that doth not often meet the gaze of the
best of Christians.
The night was far from dark, a tropical sky glittering
with a thousand stars, and even the ocean itself appearing
to emit a sombre melancholy light. By the aid of such
assistants it was possible to see several miles, and more
especially to note objects on the margin of the ocean.
When the young man cast his eyes to leeward, as directed
by Columbus, he very plainly perceived a point where the
blue of the sky ceased, and a dark mound rose from the
water, stretching for a few leagues southward, and then
terminated, as it had commenced, by a union between the
watery margin of the ocean and the void of heaven. The
intermediate space had the defined outline, the density, and
the hue of land, as seen at midnight.
Behold the Indies! said Columbus; the mighty
problem is solved! This is doubtless an island, but a
continent
is near. Laud be to God!
CHAPTER VI.
There is a Power, whose care
Teaches thy way along that pathless coast
The desert and illimitable air
Lone wandering, but not lost.
Bryant.
The
two or three hours that succeeded, were hours of
an extraordinary and intense interest. The three vessels
stood hovering off the dusky shore, barely keeping at a
safe distance, stripped of most of their canvass, resembling
craft that cruised leisurely at a given point, indifferent to
haste or speed. As they occasionally and slowly passed
each other, words of heart-felt congratulation were
exchanged
;
but no noisy or intemperate exultation was heard
on that all-important night. The sensations excited in the
adventurers, by their success, were too deep and solemn for
any such vulgar exhibition of joy; and perhaps there was
not one among them all who did not, at that moment,
inwardly
confess his profound submission to, and absolute
dependence on, a Divine Providence.
Columbus was silent. Emotions like his, seldom find
vent in words; but his heart was overflowing with gratitude
and love. He believed himself to be in the farther east,
and to have reached that part of the world by sailing west;
and it is natural to suppose that he expected the curtain of
day would rise on some of those scenes of oriental
magnificence
which had been so eloquently described by the
Polos and other travellers in those remote and little-known
regions. That this or other islands were inhabited, the little
he had seen sufficiently proved; but, as yet, all the rest
was conjecture of the wildest and most uncertain
character
.
The fragrance of the land, however, was very
perceptible
in the vessels, thus affording an opportunity to two
of the senses to unite in establishing their success.
At length the long wished-for day approached, and the
eastern sky began to assume the tints that precede the
appearance
of the sun. As the light diffused itself athwart
the dark blue ocean, and reached the island, the outlines of
the latter became more and more distinct: then objects
became
visible on its surface, trees, glades, rocks, and
irregularities
,
starting out of the gloom, until the whole picture
was drawn in the grey solemn colours of morning.
Presently
the direct rays of the sun touched it, gilding its
prominent points, and throwing others into shadow. It then
became apparent that the discovery was that of an island of
no great extent, well wooded, and of a verdant and
pleasant
aspect. The land was low, but possessed an outline
sufficiently graceful to cause it to seem a paradise in the
eyes of men who had seriously doubted whether they were
ever to look on solid ground again. The view of his
mother
Vol. II.  8
earth is always pleasant to the mariner who has long
gazed on nothing but water and sky; but thrice beautiful
did it now seem to men who not only saw in it their despair
cured, but their most brilliant hopes revived. From the
position of the land near him, Columbus did not doubt that
he had passed another island, on which the light had been
seen, and, from his known course, this conjecture has since
been rendered almost certain.
The sun had scarcely risen, when living beings were
seen rushing out of the woods, to gaze in astonishment at
the sudden appearance of machines, that were at first
mistaken
by the untutored islanders, for messengers from
heaven. Shortly after, Columbus anchored his little fleet,
and landed to take possession in the name of the two
sovereigns.
As much state was observed on this occasion as the
limited means of the adventurers would allow. Each
vessel
sent a boat, with her commander. The admiral, attired
in scarlet, and carrying the royal standard, proceeded in
advance, while Martin Alonzo, and Vicente Yaez Pinzon,
followed, holding banners bearing crosses, the symbol of
the expedition, with letters representing the initials of the
two sovereigns, or F and Y, for Fernando and Ysabel.
The forms usual to such occasions were observed on
reaching the shore. Columbus took possession, rendered
thanks to God for the success of the expedition, and then
began to look about him in order to form some estimate of
the value of his discovery.
*
*
It is a singular fact that the position and name of the
precise
island that was first fallen in with, on this celebrated voyage,
remain
to this day, if not a matter of doubt, at least a matter of
discussion
.
By most persons, some of the best authorities included, it is
believed that the adventurers made Cat Island, as the place is now
called, though the admiral gave it the appellation of San Salvador;
while others contend for what is now termed Turk's Island. The
reason
given for the latter opinion is the position of the island, and the
course subsequently steered in order to reach Cuba. Muoz is of
opinion that it was Watling's Island, which lies due east of Cat Island,
at the distance of a degree of longitude, or a few hours' run. As
respects
Turk's Island, the facts do not sustain the theory. The course
steered, after quitting the island, was not west, but south-west; and
we find Columbus anxious to get south to reach the island of Cuba,
which was described to him by the natives, and which he believed to
be Cipango. No reason is given by Muoz for his opinion; but
Watling's
Island does not answer the description of the great navigator,
while it is so placed as to have lain quite near his course, and was
doubtless passed unseen in the darkness. It is thought the light so
often observed by Columbus was on this island.
No sooner were the ceremonies observed, than the
people
crowded round the admiral, and began to pour out their
congratulations for his success, with their contrition for
their own distrust and disaffection. The scene has often
been described as a proof of the waywardness and
inconstancy
of human judgments; the being who had so lately
been scowled on as a reckless and selfish adventurer, being
now regarded as little less than a god. The admiral was no
more elated by this adulation, than he had been intimidated
by the previous dissatisfaction, maintaining his calmness of
exterior and gravity of demeanour, with those who pressed
around him, though a close observer might have detected
the gleaming of triumph in his eye, and the glow of
inward
rapture on his cheek.
These honest people are as inconstant in their
apprehensions
,
as they are extreme in their rejoicings, said
Columbus
to Luis, when liberated a little from the throng;
yesterday they would have cast me into the sea, and
to-day
they are much disposed to forget God, himself, in his
unworthy creature. Dost not see, that the men who gave
us most concern, on account of their discontent, are now
the loudest in their applause?
This is but nature, Seor; fear flying from panic to
exultation. These knaves fancy they are praising you,
when they are in truth rejoicing in their own escape from
some unknown but dreaded evil. Our friends Sancho and
Pepe seem not to be thus overwhelmed, for while the last
is gathering flowers from this shore of India, the first
seems to be looking about him with commendable coolness,
as if he might be calculating the latitude and longitude of
the Great Khan's doblas.
Columbus smiled, and, accompanied by Luis, he drew
nearer to the two men mentioned, who were a little apart
from the rest of the group. Sancho was standing with his
hands thrust into the bosom of his doublet, regarding the
scene with the coolness of a philosopher, and towards him
the admiral first directed his steps.
How is this, Sancho of the Shipyard-Gate! said the
great navigator, thou lookest on this glorious scene as
coolly as thou wouldst regard a street in Moguer, or a field
in Andalusia?
Seor Don Almirante, the same hand made both.
This is not the first island on which I have landed; nor
are yonder naked savages the first men I have seen who
were not dressed in scarlet doublets.
But hast thou no feeling for successno gratitude to
God for this vast discovery? Reflect, my friend, we are
on the confines of Asia, and yet have we come here by
holding a western course.
That the last is true, Seor, I will swear myself,
having
held the tiller in mine own hands no small part of the
way. Do you think, Seor Don Almirante, that we have
come far enough in this direction to have got to the back
side of the earth, or to stand, as it might be, under the
very feet of Spain?
By no means. The realms of the Great Khan will
scarcely occupy the position you mean.
Then, Seor, what will there be to prevent the doblas
of that country from falling off into the air, leaving us our
journey for our pains?
The same power that will prevent our caravels from
dropping out of the sea, and the water itself from
following
.
These things depend on natural laws, my friend, and
nature is a legislator that will be respected.
It is all Moorish to me, returned Sancho, rubbing his
eye-brows. Here we are, of a verity, if not actually
beneath
the feet of Spain, standing, as it might be, on the
side of the house; and yet I find no more difficulty in
keeping on an even keel, than I did in Moguerby Santa
Clara! less, in some particulars, good solid Xeres wine
being
far less plenty here than there.
Thou art no Moor, Sancho, although thy father's name
be a secret. And thou, Pepe, what dost thou find in those
flowers to draw thy attention so early from all these
wonders
?
Seor, I gather them for Monica. A female hath a
more delicate feeling than a man, and she will be glad to
see with what sort of ornaments God hath adorned the
Indies.
Dost thou fancy, Pepe, that thy love can keep those
flowers in bloom, until the good caravel shall recross the
Atlantic? demanded Luis, laughing.
Who knoweth, Seor Gutierrez? A warm heart
maketh a thriving nursery. You would do well, too, if
you prefer any Castilian lady to all others, to bethink you
of her beauty, and gather some of these rare plants to
deck her hair.
Columbus now turned away, the natives seeming
disposed
to approach the strangers, while Luis remained near
the young sailor, who still continued to collect the plants of
the tropics. In a minute our hero was similarly employed;
and long ere the admiral and the wondering islanders had
commenced their first parly, he had arranged a gorgeous
bouquet,
which he already fancied in the glossy dark hair
of Mercedes.
The events of a public nature that followed, are too
familiar
to every intelligent reader to need repetition here.
After passing a short time at San Salvador, Columbus
proceeded
to other islands, led on by curiosity, and guided by
real or fancied reports of the natives, until the 28th, when
he reached that of Cuba. Here he imagined, for a time,
that he had found the continent, and he continued coasting
it, first in a north-westerly, and then in a south-easterly
direction, for near a month. Familiarity with the novel
scenes that offered soon lessened their influence, and the
inbred feelings of avarice and ambition began to resume
their sway in the bosoms of several of those who had been
foremost in manifesting their submission to the admiral,
when the discovery of land so triumphantly proved the
justice
of his theories, and the weakness of their own
misgivings
.
Among others who thus came under the influence
of their nature, was Martin Alonzo Pinzon, who finding
himself almost entirely excluded from the society of the
young Count of Llera, in whose eyes he perceived he filled
but a very subordinate place, fell back on his own local
importance, and began to envy Columbus a glory that he
now fancied he might have secured for himself. Hot words
8 *
had passed between the admiral and himself, on more than
one occasion, before the land was made, and every day
something new occurred to increase the coldness between
them.
It forms no part of this work to dwell on the events that
followed, as the adventurers proceeded from island to island,
port to port, and river to river. It was soon apparent that
very important discoveries had been made; and the
adventurers
were led on day by day, pursuing their investigations,
and following directions that were ill comprehended, but
which, it was fancied, pointed to mines of gold.
Everywhere
they met with a gorgeous and bountiful nature,
scenery that fascinated the eye, and a climate that soothed
the senses; but, as yet, man was found living in the
simplest
condition of the savage state. The delusion of being
in the Indies was general, and every intimation that fell
from those untutored beings, whether by word or sign, was
supposed to have some reference to the riches of the east.
All believed that, if not absolutely within the kingdom
of the Great Khan, they were at least on its confines.
Under such circumstances, when each day actually
produced
new scenes, promising still greater novelties, few
bethought
them of Spain, unless it were in connexion with
the glory of returning to her, successful and triumphant.
Even Luis dwelt less intently in his thoughts on Mercedes,
suffering her image, beautiful as it was, to be momentarily
supplanted by the unusual spectacles that arose before his
physical sight in such constant and unwearied succession.
Little substantial, beyond the fertile soil and genial climate,
offered, it is true, in the way of realizing all the bright
expectations
of the adventurers in connexion with pecuniary
advantages; but each moment was fraught with hope, and
no one knew what a day would bring forth.
Two agents were at length sent into the interior to make
discoveries, and Columbus profited by the occasion to
careen
his vessels. About the time when this mission was
expected to return, Luis sallied forth with a party of armed
men to meet it, Sancho making one of his escort. The
ambassadors were met on their way back at a short day's
march from the vessels, accompanied by a few of the
natives
,
who were following with intense curiosity, expecting
at each moment to see their unknown visiters take their
flight towards heaven. A short halt was made for the
purpose
of refreshing themselves, after the two parties had
joined; and Sancho, as reckless of danger on the land as
on the ocean, stalked into a village that lay near the
halting
place. Here he endeavoured to make himself as
agreeable
to the inhabitants, as one of his appearance very well
could, by means of signs. Sancho figured in this little
hamlet under some such advantages as those that are
enjoyed
in the country by a great man from town; the
spectators
not being, as yet, sufficiently sophisticated to
distinguish
between the cut of a doublet and the manner of
wearing
it, as between a clown and a noble. He had not been
many minutes playing the grandee among these simple
beings
,
when they seemed desirous of offering to him some mark
of particular distinction. Presently, a man appeared,
holding
certain dark-looking and dried leaves, which he held
out to the hero of the moment in a deferential manner, as
a Turk would offer his dried sweet-meats, or an American
his cake. Sancho was about to accept the present, though
he would greatly have preferred a dobla, of which he had
not seen any since the last received from the admiral, when
a forward movement was made by most of the Cubans,
who humbly, and with emphasis, uttered the word tobacco
tobacco. On this hint, the person who held forth the
offering drew back, repeated the same word in an
apologizing
manner, and set about making what, it was now plain,
was termed a tobacco, in the language of that country.
This was soon effected, by rolling up the leaves in the form
of a rude segar, when a tobacco, duly manufactured,
was offered to the seaman. Sancho took the present,
nodded
his head condescendingly, repeated the words himself,
in the best manner he could, and thrust the tobacco into
his pocket. This movement evidently excited some
surprise
among the spectators, but, after a little consultation,
one of them lighted an end of a roll, applied the other to
his mouth, and began to puff forth volumes of a fragrant
light smoke, not only to his own infinite satisfaction, but
seemingly to that of all around him. Sancho attempted an
imitation, which resulted, as is common with the tyro in
this accomplishment, in his reeling back to his party with
the pallid countenance of an opium-chewer, and a nausea
that he had not experienced since the day he first ventured
beyond the bar of Saltes, to issue on the troubled surface
of the Atlantic.
This little scene might be termed the introduction of the
well-known American weed into civilized society, the
misapprehension
of the Spaniards, touching the appellation,
transferring the name of the roll to the plant itself. Thus
did Sancho, of the ship-yard gate, become the first Christian
tobacco smoker, an accomplishment in which he was so
soon afterwards rivalled by some of the greatest men of
his age, and which has extended down to our own times.
On the return of his agents, Columbus again sailed,
pushing his way along the north shore of Cuba. While
struggling against the trades, with a view to get to the
eastward
,
he found the wind too fresh, and determined to bear
up for a favourite haven in the island of Cuba, that he had
named Puerto del Principe. With this view a signal was
made to call the Pinta down, that vessel being far to
windward
;
and, as night was near, lights were carried in order
to enable Martin Alonzo to close with his commander.
The next morning, at the dawn of day, when Columbus
came on deck, he cast a glance around him, and beheld the
Nia, hove-to under his lee, but no signs of the other
caravel.
Have none seen the Pinta? demanded the admiral,
hastily, of Sancho, who stood at the helm.
Seor,
I
did, as long as eyes could see a vessel that
was striving to get out of view. Master Martin Alonzo
hath disappeared in the eastern board, while we have been
lying-to, here, in waiting for him to come down.
Columbus now perceived that he was deserted by the
very man who had once shown so much zeal in his behalf,
and who had given, in the act, new proof of the manner in
which friendship vanishes before self-interest and cupidity.
There had been among the adventurers many reports
of the existence of gold mines, obtained from the
descriptions
of the natives; and the admiral made no doubt that
his insubordinate follower had profited by the superior
sailing
of his caravel, to keep the wind, in the expectation to
be the first to reach the Eldorado of their wishes. As the
weather still continued unfavourable, however, the Santa
Maria and the Nia returned to port, where they waited for
a change. This separation occurred on the 21st of
November
,
at which moment the expedition had not advanced
beyond the north coast of Cuba.
From this time until the sixth of the following month,
Columbus continued his examination of this noble island,
when he crossed what has since been termed the
windward
passage, and first touched on the shores of Hayti.
All this time, there had been as much communication as
circumstances would allow, with the aborigines, the
Spaniards
making friends wherever they went, as a consequence
of the humane and prudent measures of the admiral. It
is true that violence had been done, in a few instances, by
seizing half a dozen individuals in order to carry them to
Spain, as offerings to Doa Isabella; but this act was easily
reconcilable to usage in that age, equally on account of
the deference that was paid to the kingly authority, and on
the ground that the seizures were for the good of the
captives'
souls.
The adventurers were more delighted with the bold, and
yet winning, aspect of Hayti, than they had been with even
the adjacent island of Cuba. The inhabitants were found
to be handsomer and more civilized than any they had yet
seen, while they retained the gentleness and docility that
had proved so pleasing to the admiral. Gold, also, was
seen among them in considerable quantities; and the
Spaniards set on foot a trade of some extent, in which the
usual incentive of civilized man was the great aim of one
side, and hawk's-bells appear to have been the principal
desideratum with the other.
In this manner, and in making hazardous advances
along the coast, the admiral was occupied until the 20th of
the month, when he reached a point that was said to be in
the vicinity of the residence of the Great Cacique of all
that portion of the island. This prince, whose name, as
spelt by the Spaniards, was Guacanagari, had many
tributary
caciques, and was understood, from the half-intelligible
descriptions of his subjects, to be a monarch that was much
beloved. On the 22d, while still lying in the Bay of Acl,
where the vessels had anchored two days previously, a
large canoe was seen entering the haven. It was shortly
after announced to the admiral that this boat contained an
ambassador from the Great Cacique, who brought presents
from his master, with a request that the vessels would move
a league or two farther east, and anchor off the town
inhabited
by the prince himself. The wind preventing an
immediate compliance, a messenger was dispatched with a
suitable answer, and the ambassador returned. Fatigued
with idleness, anxious to see more of the interior, and
impelled
by a constitutional love of adventure, Luis, who had
struck up a hasty friendship with a young man called
Mattinao
,
who attended the ambassador, asked permission to
accompany him, taking his passage in the canoe. Columbus
gave his consent to this proposal with a good deal of
reluctance
,
the rank and importance of our hero inducing
him to avoid the consequences of any treachery or
accident
.
The importunity of Luis finally prevailed,
however
,
and he departed with many injunctions to be discreet,
being frequently admonished of the censure that would await
the admiral in the event of anything serious occurring.
As a precaution, too, Sancho Mundo was directed to
accompany
the young man, in this chivalrous adventure, in
the capacity of an esquire.
No weapon more formidable than a blunt arrow having
yet been seen in the hands of the natives, the young
Count de Llera declined taking his mail, going armed only
with a trusty sword, the temper of which had been tried on
many a Moorish corslet and helm, in his foot encounters,
and protected by a light buckler. An arquebuse had been
put into his hand, but he refused it, as a weapon unsuited
to knightly hands, and as betraying a distrust that was not
merited by the previous conduct of the natives. Sancho,
however, was less scrupulous, and accepted the weapon.
In order, moreover, to divert the attention of his followers
from a concession that the admiral felt to be a departure
from his own rigid laws, Luis and his companions landed
and entered the canoe at a point concealed from the vessels,
in order that their absence might not be known. It is owing
to these circumstances, as well as to the general mystery
that was thrown about the connexion of the young grandee
with the expedition, that the occurrences we are about to
relate were never entered by the admiral in his journal,
and have, consequently, escaped the prying eyes of the
various historians who have subsequently collected so much
from that pregnant document.
CHAPTER VII.
Thou seemest to fancy's eye
An animated blossom born in air;
Which breathes and bourgeons in the golden sky,
And sheds its odours there.
Sutermeister.
Notwithstanding
his native resolution, and an
indifference
to danger that amounted to recklessness, Luis did
not find himself alone with the Haytians without, at least,
a lively consciousness of the novelty of his situation.
Still, nothing occurred to excite uneasiness, and he
continued
his imperfect communications with his new friends,
occasionally throwing in a remark to Sancho in Spanish,
who merely wanted encouragement to discourse by the
hour. Instead of following the boat of the Santa Maria,
on board which the ambassador had embarked, the canoe
pushed on several leagues farther east, it being understood
that Luis was not to present himself in the town of
Guacanagari
,
until after the arrival of the ships, when he was
to rejoin his comrades stealthily, or in a way not to attract
attention.
Our hero would not have been a true lover, had he
remained
indifferent to the glories of the natural scenery that
lay spread before his eyes, as he thus coasted the shores
of Espaola. The boldness of the landscape, as in the
Mediterranean, was relieved by the softness of a low
latitude
,
which throws some such witchery around rocks and
promontories, as a sunny smile lends to female beauty.
More than once did he burst out into exclamations of
delight
,
and as often did Sancho respond in the same temper,
if not exactly in the same language, the latter conceiving
it to be a sort of duty to echo all that the young noble said,
in the way of poetry.
I take it, Seor Conde, observed the seaman, when
they had reached a spot several leagues beyond that where
the launch of the ship had put to shore; I take it for
granted, Seor Conde, that your excellency knoweth
whither these naked gentry are paddling, all this time.
They seem in a hurry, and have a port in their minds, if
it be not in view.
Art thou uneasy, friend Sancho, that thou puttest thy
question thus earnestly?
If I am, Don Luis, it is altogether on account of the
family of Bobadilla, which would lose its head, did any
mishap befall your excellency. What is it to Sancho, of
the ship-yard gate, whether he is married to some princess
in Cipango, and gets to be adopted by the Great Khan, or
whether he is an indifferent mariner out of Moguer? It is
very much as if one should offer him the choice between
wearing a doublet and eating garlic, and going naked on
sweet fruits and a full stomach. I take it, Seor, your
excellency would not willingly exchange the castle of
Llera for the palace of this Great Cacique?
Thou art right, Sancho; even rank must depend on
the state of society in which we live. A Castilian noble
cannot envy a Haytian sovereign.
More especially, since my lord, the Seor Don
Almirante
,
hath publicly proclaimed, that our gracious lady,
the Doa Isabella, is henceforth and for ever to be queen
over him, returned Sancho, with a knowing glance of the
eye. Little do these worthy people understand the
honour that is in store for them, and least of all, his
Highness
,
King Guacanagari!
Hush, Sancho, and keep thy unpleasant intimations in
thine own breast. Our friends turn the head of the canoe
towards yonder river's mouth, and seem bent on landing.
By this time, indeed, the natives had coasted as far as
they intended, and were turning in towards the entrance of
a small stream, which, taking its rise among the noble
mountains that were grouped inland, found its way through
a smiling valley to the ocean. This stream was neither
broad nor deep, but it contained far more than water
sufficient
for any craft used by the natives. Its banks were
fringed with bushes; and as they glided up it, Luis saw
fifty sites where he thought he could be content to pass his
life, provided, always, that it might possess the advantage
of Mercedes's presence. It is scarcely necessary to add,
too, that in all these scenes he fancied his mistress attired
in the velvets and laces that were then so much used by
high-born dames, and that he saw her natural grace,
embellished
by the courtly ease and polished accessaries of
one who lived daily, if not hourly, in the presence of her
royal mistress.
As the canoe shut in the coast, by entering between the
two points that formed the river's mouth, Sancho pointed
out to the young noble a small fleet of canoes, that was
coming down before the wind from the eastward, apparently
bound, like so many more they had seen that day, to the
bay of Acl, on a visit to the wonderful strangers. The
natives in the canoe also beheld this little flotilla, which
was driving before the wind under cotton sails, and by their
smiles and signs showed that they gave it the same
destination
.
About this time, too, or just as they entered the
mouth of the stream, Mattinao drew from under a light
cotton robe, that he occasionally wore, a thin circlet of
pure gold, which he placed upon his head, in the manner
of a coronet. This Luis knew was a token that he was a
cacique, one of those who were tributary to Guacanagari,
and he arose to salute him at this evidence of his rank, an
act that was imitated by all of the Haytians also. From
this assumption of state, Luis rightly imagined that
Mattinao
had now entered within the limits of a territory that
acknowledged his will. From the moment that the young
cacique threw aside his incognito, he ceased to paddle, but
assuming an air of authority and dignity, he attempted to
converse with his guest in the best manner their imperfect
means of communication would allow. He often
pronounced
the word, Ozema, and Luis inferred from the
manner in which he used it, that it was the name of a
favourite wife, it having been already ascertained by the
Spaniards, or at least it was thought to be ascertained, that
the caciques indulged in polygamy, while they rigidly
restricted
their subjects to one wife.
Vol. II.  9
The canoe ascended the river several miles, until it
reached one of those tropical valleys in which nature seems
to expend her means of rendering this earth inviting.
While the scenery had much of the freedom of a wilderness,
the presence of man for centuries had deprived it of all its
ruder and more savage features. Like those who tenanted
it, the spot possessed the perfection of native grace,
unfettered
and uninvaded by any of the more elaborate devices
of human expedients. The dwellings were not without
beauty, though simple as the wants of their owners; the
flowers bloomed in mid-winter, and the generous branches
still groaned with the weight of their nutritious and
palatable
fruits.
Mattinao was received by his people with an eager
curiosity
,
blended with profound respect. His mild subjects
crowded around Luis and Sancho, with some such wonder
as a civilized man would gaze at one of the prophets, were
he to return to earth in the flesh. They had heard of the
arrival of the ships, but they did not the less regard their
inmates as visiters from heaven. This, probably, was not
the opinion of the more elevated in rank, for, even in the
savage state, the vulgar mind is far from being that of the
favoured few. Whether it was owing to his greater facility
of character, and to habits that more easily adapted
themselves
to the untutored notions of the Indians, or to their
sense of propriety, Sancho soon became the favourite with
the multitude; leaving the Count of Llera more especially
to the care of Mattinao, and the principal men of his tribe.
Owing to this circumstance, the two Spaniards were soon
separated, Sancho being led away by the
oi polloi
to a sort
of square in the centre of the village, leaving Don Luis in
the habitation of the Cacique.
No sooner did Mattinao find himself in the company of
our hero, and that of two of his confidential chiefs, than the
name of Ozema was repeated eagerly among the Indians.
A rapid conversation followed, a messenger was dispatched,
Luis knew not whither, and then the chiefs took their
departure
,
leaving the young Castilian alone with the Cacique.
Laying aside his golden band, and placing a cotton robe
about his person, which had hitherto been nearly naked,
Mattinao made a sign for his companion to follow him, and
left the building. Throwing the buckler over his shoulder,
and adjusting the belt of his sword in a way that the
weapon should not incommode him in walking, Luis obeyed
with as much confidence as he would have followed a friend
along the streets of Seville.
Mattinao led the way through a wilderness of sweets,
where tropical plants luxuriated beneath the branches of
trees loaded with luscious fruits, holding his course by a
footpath
which lay on the banks of a torrent that flowed from
a ravine, and poured its waters into the river below. The
distance he went might have been half a mile. Here he
reached a cluster of rustic dwellings that occupied a lovely
terrace on a hill-side, where they overlooked the larger town
below the river, and commanded a view of the distant ocean.
Luis saw at a glance that this sweet retreat was devoted to
the uses of the gentler sex, and he doubted not that it formed
a species of seraglio, set apart for the wives of the young
cacique. He was led into one of the principal dwellings,
where the simple but grateful refreshments used by the
natives
,
were again offered to him.
The intercourse of a month had not sufficed to render
either party very familiar with the language of the other.
A few of the commoner words of the Indians had been
caught by the Spaniards, and perhaps Luis was one of the
most ready in their use; still, it is highly probable, he was
oftener wrong than right, even when he felt the most
confident
of his success. But the language of friendship is
not easily mistaken, and our hero had not entertained a
feeling of distrust from the time he left the ships, down to
the present moment.
Mattinao had dispatched a messenger to an adjacent
dwelling when he entered that in which Luis was now
entertained
,
and when sufficient time had been given for the
last to refresh himself, the cacique arose, and by a courteous
gesture, such as might have become a master of
ceremonies
in the court of Isabella, he again invited the young
grandee to follow. They took their way along the terrace, to
a house larger than common, and which evidently contained
several subdivisions, as they entered into a sort of
anteroom
.
Here they remained but a minute; the cacique,
after a short parley with a female, removing a curtain
ingeniously
made of sea-weed, and leading the way to an
inner apartment. It had but a single occupant, whose
character Luis fancied to be announced in the use of the
single word Ozema, that the cacique uttered in a low
affectionate tone, as they entered. Luis bowed to this
Indian
beauty, as profoundly as he could have made his
reverence to a high-born damsel of Spain; then, recovering
himself, he fastened one long steady look of admiration on
the face of the curious but half-frightened young creature
who stood before him, and exclaimed, in such tones as only
indicate rapture, admiration and astonishment mingled
Mercedes!
The young cacique repeated this name in the best
manner
he could, evidently mistaking it for a Spanish term to
express admiration, or satisfaction; while the trembling
young thing, who was the subject of all this wonder, shrunk
back a step, blushed, laughed, and muttered in her soft low
musical voice, Mercedes, as the innocent take up and
renew any source of their harmless pleasures. She then
stood, with her arms folded meekly on her bosom,
resembling
a statue of wonder. But it may be necessary to
explain
why, at a moment so peculiar, the thoughts and tongue
of Luis had so suddenly resorted to his mistress. In order
to do this, we shall first attempt a short description of the
person and appearance of Ozema, as was, in fact, the name
of the Indian beauty.
All the accounts agree in describing the aborigines of
the West Indies, as being singularly well formed, and of a
natural grace in their movements, that extorted a common
admiration among the Spaniards. Their colour was not
unpleasant
,
and the inhabitants of Hayti, in particular, were
said to be but very little darker than the people of Spain.
Those who were but little exposed to the bright sun of that
climate, and who dwelt habitually beneath the shades of
groves, or in the retirement of their dwellings, like persons
of similar habits in Europe, might, by comparison, have
even been termed fair. Such was the fact with Ozema,
who, instead of being the wife of the young cacique, was
his only sister. According to the laws of Hayti, the
authority
of a cacique was transmitted through females, and
a son of Ozema was looked forward to, as the heir of his
uncle. Owing to this fact, and to the circumstances that
the true royal line, if a term so dignified can be applied to
a state of society so simple, was reduced to these two
individuals
,
Ozema had been more than usually fostered by
the tribe, leaving her free from care, and as little exposed
to hardships, as at all comported with the condition of her
people. She had reached her eighteenth year, without
having
experienced any of those troubles and exposures which
are more or less the inevitable companions of savage life;
though it was remarked by the Spaniards, that all the
Indians
they had yet seen seemed more than usually free
from evils of this character. They owed this exemption to
the generous quality of the soil, the genial warmth of the
climate, and the salubrity of the air. In a word, Ozema,
in her person, possessed just those advantages that freedom
from restraint, native graces, and wild luxuriance, might be
supposed to lend the female form, under the advantages of
a mild climate, a healthful and simple diet, and perfect
exemption
from exposure, care, or toil. It would not have
been difficult to fancy Eve such a creature, when she first
appeared to Adam, fresh from the hands of her divine
creator
,
modest, artless, timid, and perfect.
The Haytians used a scanty dress, though it shocked
none of their opinions to go forth in the garb of nature.
Still, few of rank were seen without some pretensions to
attire, which was worn rather as an ornament, or a mark
of distinction, than as necessary either to usage or to
comfort
.
Ozema herself, formed no exception to the general
rule. A cincture of Indian cloth, woven in gay colours,
circled her slender waist, and fell nearly as low as her
knees; a robe of spotless cotton, inartificially made, but
white as the driven snow, and of a texture so fine that it
might have shamed many of the manufactures of our own
days, fell like a scarf across a shoulder, and was loosely
united at the opposite side, dropping in folds nearly to the
ground. Sandals, of great ingenuity and beauty, protected
the soles of feet that a queen might have envied; and a
large plate of pure gold, rudely wrought, was suspended
from her neck by a string of small but gorgeous shells.
Bracelets of the latter were on her pretty wrists, and two
light bands of gold encircled ankles that were as faultless
9 *
as those of the Venus of Naples. In that region, the
fineness
of the hair was thought the test of birth, with better
reason than many imagine the feet and hands to be, in
civilized life. As power and rank had passed from female
to female in her family, for several centuries, the hair of
Ozema was silken, soft, waving, exuberant, and black as
jet. It covered her shoulders, like a glorious mantle, and
fell as low as her simple cincture. So light and silken was
this natural veil, that its ends waved in the gentle current
of air that was rather breathing than blowing through the
apartment.
Although this extraordinary creature was much the
loveliest
specimen of young womanhood that Luis had seen
among the wild beauties of the islands, it was not so much
her graceful and well-rounded form, or even the charms of
face and expression, that surprised him, as a decided and
accidental resemblance to the being he had left in Spain,
and who had so long been the idol of his heart. This
resemblance alone had caused him to utter the name of his
mistress, in the manner related. Could the two have been
placed together, it would have been easy to detect marked
points of difference between them, without being reduced to
compare the intellectual and thoughtful expression of our
heroine's countenance, with the wondering, doubting,
half-startled
look of Ozema; but still the general likeness was
so strong, that no person who was familiar with the face of
one, could fail to note it on meeting with the other. Side by
side, it would have been discovered that the face of
Mercedes
had the advantage in finesse and delicacy; that her
features and brow were nobler; her eye more illuminated
by the intelligence within; her smile more radiant with
thought and the feelings of a cultivated woman; her blush
more sensitive, betraying most of the consciousness of
conventional
habits; and that the expression generally was
much more highly cultivated, than that which sprung from
the artless impulses and limited ideas of the young
Haytian
.
Nevertheless, in mere beauty, in youth, and tint, and
outline, the disparity was scarcely perceptible, while the
resemblance was striking; and, on the score of animation,
native frankness, ingenuousness, and all that witchery
which ardent and undisguised feeling lends to woman,
many might have preferred the confiding
abandon
of the
beautiful young Indian, to the more trained and dignified
reserve of the Castilian heiress. What in the latter was
earnest, high-souled, native, but religious enthusiasm, in the
other was merely the outpourings of unguided impulses,
which, however feminine in their origin, were but little
regulated in their indulgence.
Mercedes! exclaimed our hero, when this vision of
Indian loveliness unexpectedly broke on his sight.
Mercedes
!
repeated Mattinao; Mercedes! murmured
Ozema
,
recoiling a step, blushing, laughing, and then resuming
her innocent confidence, as she several times uttered the
same word, which she also mistook for an expression of
admiration, in her own low, melodious voice.
Conversation being out of the question, there remained
nothing for the parties but to express their feelings by signs
and acts of amity. Luis had not come on his little
expedition
unprovided with presents. Anticipating an interview
with the wife of the cacique, he had brought up from the
village below, several articles that he supposed might suit
her untutored fancy. But the moment he beheld the vision
that actually stood before him, they all seemed unworthy
of such a being. In one of his onsets against the Moors,
he had brought off a turban of rich but light cloth, and he
had kept it as a trophy, occasionally wearing it, in his
visits to the shore, out of pure caprice, and as a sort of
ornament that might well impose on the simple-minded
natives. These vagaries excited no remarks, as mariners
are apt to indulge their whims in this manner, when far
from the observations of those to whom they habitually
defer. This turban was on his head at the moment he
entered the apartment of Ozema, and, overcome with the
delight of finding so unexpected a resemblance, and,
possibly
,
excited by so unlooked-for an exhibition of feminine
loveliness, he gallantly unrolled it, threw out the folds of
rich cloth, and cast it over the shoulders of the beautiful
Ozema as a mantle.
The expressions of gratitude and delight that escaped
this unsophisticated young creature, were warm, sincere,
and undisguised. She cast the ample robe on the ground
before her, repeated the word Mercedes, again and
again, and manifested her pleasure with all the warmth of
a generous and ingenuous nature. If we were to say that
this display of Ozema was altogether free from the
childlike
rapture that was, perhaps, inseparable from her
ignorance
,
it would be attributing to her benighted condition the
experience and regulated feelings of advanced civilization;
but, notwithstanding the guileless simplicity with which she
betrayed her emotions, her delight was not without much
of the dignity and tone that usually mark the conduct of
the superior classes all over the world. Luis fancied it as
graceful as it was
nave
and charming. He endeavoured
to imagine the manner in which the Lady of Valverde
might receive an offering of precious stones from the
gracious
hands of Doa Isabella, and he even thought it very
possible that the artless grace of Ozema was not far behind
what he knew would be the meek self-respect, mingled with
grateful pleasure, that Mercedes could not fail to exhibit.
While thoughts like these were passing through his mind,
the Indian girl laid aside her own less enticing robe,
without
a thought of shame, and then she folded her faultless
form in the cloth of the turban. This was no sooner done,
with a grace and freedom peculiar to her unfettered mind,
than she drew the necklace of shells from her person, and
advancing a step or two towards our hero, extended the
offering
with a half-averted face, though the laughing and
willing eyes more than supplied the place of language.
Luis accepted the gift with suitable eagerness, nor did he
refrain from using the Castilian gallantry of kissing the
pretty hand from which he took the bauble.
The cacique, who had been a pleased spectator of all
that passed, now signed for the count to follow him, leading
the way towards another dwelling. Here Don Luis was
introduced
to other young females, and to two or three
children
,
the former of whom, he soon discovered, were the
wives of Mattinao, and the latter his offspring. By dint of
gestures, a few words, and such other means of
explanation
as were resorted to between the Spaniards and the
natives
,
he now succeeded in ascertaining the real affinity
which existed between the cacique and Ozema. Our hero
felt a sensation like pleasure when he discovered that the
Indian beauty was not married; and he was fain to refer
the feelingperhaps justlyto a sort of jealous
sensitiveness
that grew out of her resemblance to Mercedes.
The remainder of that, and the whole of the three
following
days, were passed by Luis with his friend, the
cacique
,
in this, the favourite and sacred residence of the
latter. Of course our hero was, if anything, a subject of
greater interest to all his hosts, than they could possibly
be to him. They took a thousand innocent liberties with his
person; examining his dress, and the ornaments he wore,
not failing to compare the whiteness of his skin with the
redder tint of that of Mattinao. On these occasions Ozema
was the most reserved and shy, though her look followed
every movement, and her pleased countenance denoted the
interest she felt in all that concerned the stranger. Hours
at a time, did Luis lie stretched on fragrant mats near this
artless and lovely creature, studying the wayward
expression
of her features, in the fond hope of seeing stronger
and stronger resemblances to Mercedes, and sometimes
losing himself in that which was peculiarly her own. In
the course of the time passed in these dwellings, efforts
were made by the count to obtain some useful information
of the island; and whether it was owing to her superior
rank, or to a native superiority of mind, or to a charm of
manner, he soon fancied that the cacique's beautiful sister
succeeded better in making him understand her meaning,
than either of the wives of Mattinao, or the cacique himself.
To Ozema, then, Luis put most of his questions; and ere
the day had passed, this quick-witted and attentive girl had
made greater progress in opening an intelligible
understanding
between the adventurers and her countrymen, than had
been accomplished by the communications of the two
previous
months. She caught the Spanish words with a
readiness
that seemed instinctive, pronouncing them with an
accent that only rendered them prettier and softer to the
ear.
Luis de Bobadilla was just as good a Catholic as a rigid
education, a wandering life, and the habits of the camp,
would be apt to make one of his rank, years, and
temperament
.
Still, that was an age in which most laymen had a
deep reverence for religion, whether they actually submitted
to its purifying influence, or not. If there were any
freethinkers
,
at all, they existed principally among those who
passed their lives in their closets, or were to be found
among the churchmen, themselves; who often used the
cowl as a hood to conceal their infidelity. His close
association
with Columbus, too, had contributed to strengthen
our hero's tendency to believe in the constant supervision
of Providence; and he now felt a strong inclination to
fancy that this extraordinary facility of Ozema's in
acquiring
languages, was one of its semi-miraculous
provisions
,
made with a view to further the introduction of the
religion of the cross among her people. Often did he
flatter himself, as he sat gazing into the sparkling, and yet
mild, eyes of the girl, listening to her earnest efforts to
make him comprehend her meaning, that he was to be the
instrument of bringing about this great good, through so
young and charming an agent. The admiral had also
enjoined
on him the importance of ascertaining, if possible,
the position of the mines, and he had actually succeeded
in making Ozema comprehend his questions on a subject
that was all-engrossing with most of the Spaniards. Her
answers were less intelligible, but Luis thought they never
could be sufficiently full; flattering himself, the whole time,
that he was only labouring to comply with the wishes of
Columbus.
The day after his arrival, our hero was treated to an
exhibition
of some of the Indian games. These sports have
been too often described to need repetition here; but, in all
their movements and exercises, which were altogether
pacific
,
the young princess was conspicuous for grace and
skill. Luis, too, was required to show his powers, and
being exceedingly athletic and active, he easily bore away
the palm from his friend Mattinao. The young cacique
manifested neither jealousy nor disappointment at this
result
,
while his sister laughed and clapped her hands with
delight, when he was outdone, even at his own sports, by
the greater strength or greater efforts of his guest. More
than once, the wives of Mattinao seemed to utter gentle
reproaches at this exuberance of feeling, but Ozema
answered
with smiling taunts, and Luis thought her, at such
moments, more beautiful than even imagination could draw,
and perhaps with justice; for her cheeks were flushed, her
eyes became as brilliant as ornaments of jet, and the teeth
that were visible between lips like cherries, resembled rows
of ivory. We have said that the eyes of Ozema were
black, differing in this particular, from the deep-blue
melancholy
orbs of the enthusiastic Mercedes; but still they
were alike, so often uttering the same feelings, more
especially
touching matters in which Luis was concerned.
More than once, during the trial of strength, did the young
man fancy that the expression of the rapture which fairly
danced in the eyes of Ozema, was the very counterpart of
that of the deep-seated delight which had so often beamed on
him, from the glances of Mercedes in the tourney; and, at
such times, it struck him that the resemblance between the
two was so strong as, after some allowance had been made
for dress and other sufficiently striking circumstances, to
render them almost identical.
The reader is not to suppose from this, that our hero was
actually inconstant to his ancient love. Far from it.
Mercedes
was too deeply enshrined in his heartand Luis, with
all his faults, was as warm-hearted and true-hearted a
cavalier
as breathedto be so easily dispossessed. But he was
young, distant from her he had so long adored, and was,
withal, not altogether insensible to admiration so artlessly
and winningly betrayed by the Indian girl. Had there been
the least immodest glance, any proof that art or design lay
at the bottom of Ozema's conduct, he would at once have
taken the alarm, and been completely disenthralled from
his temporary delusion; but, on the contrary, all was so
frank and natural with this artless girl; when she most
betrayed
the hold he had taken of her imagination, it was
done with a simplicity so obvious, a
navet
so irrepressible,
and an ingenuousness so clearly the fruit of innocence,
that it was impossible to suspect artifice. In a word, our
hero merely showed that he was human, by yielding in a
certain degree to a fascination that, under the
circumstances
,
might well have made deeper inroads on the faith
even of men who enjoyed much better reputations for
stability
of purpose.
In situations of so much novelty, time flies swiftly, and
Luis himself was astonished when, on looking back, he
remembered that he had now been several days with
Mattinao
,
most of which period had actually been passed in
what might not inaptly be termed the seraglio of the
cacique
.
Sancho of the ship-yard gate had not been in the
least neglected all this time. He had been a hero, in his
own circle, as well as the young noble, nor had he been at
all forgetful of his duty on the subject of searching for
gold. Though he had neither acquired a single word of
the Haytian language, nor taught a syllable of Spanish to
even one of the laughing nymphs who surrounded him, he
had decorated the persons of many of them with
hawk's-bells
,
and had contrived to abstract from them, in return,
every ornament that resembled the precious metal, which
they possessed. This transfer, no doubt, was honestly
effected, however, having been made on that favourite
principle
of the free trade theorists, which maintains that trade
is merely an exchange of equivalents; overlooking all the
adverse circumstances which may happen, just at the
moment
,
to determine the standard of value. Sancho had his
notions of commerce as well as the modern philosophers,
and, as he and Luis occasionally met during their sojourn
with Mattinao, he revealed a few of his opinions on this
interesting subject, in one of their interviews.
I perceive thou hast not forgotten thy passion for
doblas
,
friend Sancho, said Luis, laughing, as the old seaman
exhibited the store of dust and golden plates he had
collected
;
there is sufficient of the metal in thy sack to coin
a score of them, each having the royal countenances of
our lord the King, and our lady the Queen!
Double that, Seor Conde; just double that, and all for
the price of some seventeen hawk's-bells, that cost but a
handful of maravedis. By the mass! this is a most just
and holy trade, and such as it becomes us Christians to
carry on. Here are these savages, they think no more of
gold than your excellency thinks of a dead Moor, and to
be revenged on them, I hold a hawk's-bell just as cheap.
Let them think as poorly as they please of their ornaments
and yellow dust, they will find me just as willing to part
with the twenty hawk's-bells that remain. Let them barter
away, they will find me as ready as they possibly can be,
to give nothing for nothing.
Is this quite honest, Sancho, to rob an Indian of his
gold, in exchange for a bauble that copper so easily
purchaseth
?
Remember thou art a Castilian, and henceforth
give
two
hawk's-bells, where thou hast hitherto given but
one.
I never forget my birth, Seor, for happily the
ship-yard
of Moguer is in old Spain. Is not the value of a
thing to be settled by what it will bring in the market? ask
any of our traders and they will tell you this, which is
clear as the sun in the heavens. When the Venetians lay
before Candia, grapes and figs, and Greek wine, could be
had for the asking in that island, while western articles
commanded any price. Oh, nothing is plainer than the fact
that every thing hath its price, and it is real trade to give
one worthless commodity for another.
If it be honest to profit by the ignorance of another,
answered Luis, who had a nobleman's contempt for
commerce
,
then it is just to deceive the child and the idiot.
God forbid, and especially St. Andrew, my patron, that
I should do anything so wicked. Hawk's-bells are of more
account than gold, in Hayti, Seor, and happening to know
it, I am willing to part with the precious things for the
dross. You see I am generous instead of being avaricious,
for all parties are in Hayti, where the value of the articles
must be settled. It is true, that after running great risks at
sea, and undergoing great pains and chances, by carrying
this gold to Spain, I may be requited for my trouble, and
get enough benefit to make an honest livelihood. I hope
Doa Isabella will have so much feeling for these, her new
subjects, as to prevent their ever going into the shipping
business,a most laborious and dangerous calling, as we
both well know.
And why art thou so particular in desiring this favour
in behalf of these poor islanders, and that too, Sancho, at
the expense of thine own bones?
Simply, Seor, answered the knave, with a cunning
loer, lest it unsettle trade, which ought to be as free and
unencumbered as possible. Here now, if we Spaniards
come to Hayti, we sell one hawk's-bell for a dobla in gold;
whereas, were we to give these savages the trouble to come
to Spain, a dobla of their gold would buy a hundred
hawk's-bells
!
No  no  it is right as it is; and may a double
Vol. II.  10
allowance of Purgatory be the lot of him who wishes to
throw any difficulties in the way of a good, honest, free and
civilizing trade, say I.
Sancho was thus occupied in explaining his notions of
free trade, the great mystification of modern philanthropists,
when there arose such a cry in the village of Mattinao, as
is only heard in moments of extreme jeopardy and sudden
terror. The conversation took place in the grove, about
midway between the town and the private dwellings of the
cacique; and so implicit had become the confidence the
two Spaniards reposed in their friends, that neither had any
other arms about his person, than those furnished by nature.
Luis had left both sword and buckler, half an hour earlier,
at the feet of Ozema, who had been enacting a mimic hero,
with his weapons, for their mutual diversion; while Sancho
had found the arquebuse much too heavy to be carried
about for a plaything. The last was deposited in the room
where he had taken up his comfortable quarters.
Can this mean treachery, Seor? exclaimed Sancho.
Have these blackguards found out the true value of
hawk's-bells, after all, and do they mean to demand the
balance due them?
My life on it, Mattinao and all his people are true,
Sancho
.
This uproar hath a different meaninghark! is not
that the cry of `Caonabo?'
The very same, Seor! That is the name of the
Carib
cacique, who is the terror of all these tribes.
Thy arquebuse, Sancho, if possible; then join me at
the dwellings above. Ozema and the wives of our good
friend must be defended, at every hazard!
Luis had no sooner given these orders, than he and
Sancho
separated, the latter running towards the town, which
by this time was a scene of wild tumult, while our hero,
slowly and sullenly, retired towards the private dwellings
of the cacique, occasionally looking back, as if he longed to
plunge into the thickest of the fray. Twenty times did he
wish for his favourite charger and a stout lance, when,
indeed, it would not have been an extraordinary feat for a
knight of his prowess to put to flight a thousand enemies
like those who now menaced him. Often had he singly
broken whole ranks of Christian foot-soldiers, and it is well
known that solitary individuals, when mounted,
subsequently
drove hundreds of the natives before them.
The alarm reached the dwellings of Mattinao before our
hero. When he entered the house of Ozema, he found its
mistress surrounded by fifty females, some of whom had
already ascended from the town below, each of whom was
eagerly uttering the terrible name of Caonabo. Ozema
herself was the most collected of them all, though it was
apparent that, from some cause, she was an object of
particular
solicitude with those around her. As Luis entered
the apartment, the wives of Mattinao were pressing around
the princess; and he soon gathered from their words and
entreaties, that they urged her to fly, lest she should fall
into the hands of the Carib chief. He even fancied, and he
fancied it justly, that the rest of the females supposed the
seizure of the cacique's beautiful sister to be the real object
of the sudden attack. This conjecture in no manner
lessened
Luis's ardour in the defence. The moment Ozema
caught sight of him, she flew to his side, clasping her
hands, and uttering the name of Caonabo, in a tone that
would have melted a heart of stone. At the same time,
her eyes spoke a language of hope, confidence and petition
that was not necessary to enlist our hero's resolution on
her side. In a moment the sword of the young cavalier
was in his hand, and the buckler on his arm. He then
assured the princess of his zeal, in the best manner he
could, by placing the buckler before her throbbing breast,
and waving the sword, as in defiance of her enemies: no
sooner was this pledge given, than every other female
disappeared
,
some flying to the rescue of their children, and
all endeavouring to find places of concealment. By this
singular and unexpected desertion, Luis found himself, for
the first time since they had met, alone with Ozema.
To remain in the house would be to suffer the enemy to
approach unseen, and the shrieks and cries sufficiently
announced
that, each moment, the danger drew nearer. Luis
accordingly made a sign for the girl to follow him, first
rolling
the turban into a bundle and placing it on her arm, that
it might serve her, at need, as a species of shield against
the hostile arrows. While he was thus employed, Ozema's
head fell upon his breast, and the excited girl burst into
tears. This display of weakness, however, lasted but a
moment, when she aroused herself, smiled through her
tears, pressed the arm of Luis convulsively and became
the Indian heroine again. They then left the building
together.
Luis soon perceived that his retreat from the house had
not been made a moment too soon. The family of
Mattinao
had already disappeared, and a strong party of the
invaders was in full view, rushing madly up the grove,
silent, but evidently bent on seizing their prey. He felt
Ozema, who clung to his arm, tremble violently, and then
he heard her murmuring,
Caonabo,nonono!
The young Indian princess had caught the Spanish
monosyllable
of dissent, and Luis understood this exclamation
to express her strong disinclination to become a wife of the
Carib chief. His resolution to protect her, or to die, was
in no manner lessened by this involuntary betrayal of her
feelings, which he could not but think might have some
connexion
with himself; for, while our hero was both
honourable
and generous, he was human, and, consequently, well
disposed to take a favourable view of his own powers of
pleasing. It was only in connexion with Mercedes, that
Luis de Bobadilla was humble.
A soldier almost from childhood, the young count looked
hastily around him for a position that would favour his means
of defence, and which would render his arms the most
available
.
Luckily, one offered so near him, that it required
but a minute to occupy it. The terrace lay against a
precipice
of rocks, and, a hundred feet from the house, was a
spot where the face of this precipice was angular, throwing
forward a wall on each side to some distance, while the
cliff above overhung the base sufficiently to remove all
danger
from falling stones. In the angle were several large
fragments of rock that would afford shelter against arrows,
and, there being a sufficient space of greensward before
them, on which a knight might well display his prowess
when in possession of this position, our hero felt himself
strong, if not impregnable, since he could be assailed only
in front. Ozema was stationed behind one of the fragments
of the fallen rocks, her person only half concealed,
however
,
concern for Luis, and curiosity as related to her
enemies
,
equally inducing her to expose her head and
beautiful
bust.
Luis was scarcely in possession of this post, ere a dozen
Indians were drawn up in a line at the distance of fifty
yards in his front. They were armed with bows,
war-clubs
,
and spears. Being without other defensive armour
than his buckler, the young man would have thought his
situation sufficiently critical, did he not know that the
archery of the natives was anything but formidable. Their
arrows would kill, certainly, when shot at short distances,
and against the naked skin, but it might be questioned if
they would penetrate the stout velvet in which Luis was
encased
,
and fifty yards was not near enough to excite undue
alarm. The young man did not dare to retreat to the rocks,
as a clear space was indispensable for the free use of his
good sword, and to that weapon alone he looked for his
eventual triumph.
It was, perhaps, fortunate for our hero that Caonabo
himself was not with the party which beleagured him.
That redoubtable chieftain, who had been led to a distance
in pursuit of the flying females, under a belief that she he
sought was among them, would doubtless have brought the
matter to an immediate issue by a desperate charge, when
numbers might have prevailed against courage and skill.
The actual assailants chose a different course, and began
to poise their bows. One of the most skilful among them
drew an arrow to the head, and let it fly. The missile
glanced from the buckler of the knight, and struck the hill
behind him, as lightly as if the parties had been at their
idle sports. Another followed, and Luis turned it aside
with his sword, disdaining to raise his shield against such
a trifle. This cool manner of receiving their assaults caused
the Indians to raise a shout, whether in admiration or rage,
Luis could not tell.
The next attack was more judicious, being made on a
principle that Napoleon is said to have adopted in directing
discharges of his artillery. All those who had bows, some
six or eight, drew their arrows together, and the weapons
came rattling on the buckler of the assailed in a single
flight. It was not easy to escape altogether from such a
10 *
combined assault, and our hero received one or two bruises
from glancing arrows, though no blood followed the blows.
A second attempt of the same nature was about to be made,
when the alarmed girl rushed from her place of
concealment
,
and, like the Pocahontas of our own history, threw
herself before Luis, with her arms meekly placed on her
bosom. As soon as she appeared, there was a cry of
Ozema  Ozema, among the assailants, who were
not Caribs, as all will understand who are familiar with the
island history, but milder Haytians, governed by a Carib
chief.
In vain Luis endeavoured to persuade the devoted girl to
withdraw. She thought his life in danger, and no language,
had he been able to exert his eloquence on the occasion,
could have induced her to leave him exposed to such a
danger. As the Indians were endeavouring to obtain
chances at the person of Luis without killing the princess,
he saw there remained no alternative but a retreat behind
the fragments of rock. Just as he obtained this
temporary
security, a fierce-looking warrior joined the
assailants
,
who immediately commenced a vociferous explanation
of the actual state of the attack.
Caonabo? demanded Luis, of Ozema, pointing towards
the new-comer.
The girl shook her head, after taking an anxious look at
the stranger's face, at the same time clinging to our hero's
arm, with seductive dependence.
Nonono she said, eagerly. No Caonabo
nonono.
Luis understood the first part of this answer to mean
that the stranger was not the Carib chief; and the last to
signify Ozema's strong and settled aversion to becoming
his wife.
The consultation among the assailants was soon ended.
Six of them then poised their war-clubs and spears, and
made a rush for the citadel of the besieged. When they
were within twenty feet of his cover, our hero sprang
lightly forward on the sward to meet his foes. Two of the
spears he received on his buckler, severing both shafts
with a single blow of his keen and highly-tempered sword.
As he recovered from the effort, with an upward cut he met
the raised arm of the club-man most in advance. Hand
and club fell at his feet with the skilful touch. Making a
sweep with the weapon in his front, its point seamed the
breasts of the two astonished spearsmen, whose distance
alone saved them from more serious injuries.
This rapid and unlooked-for execution struck the
assailants
with awe and dread. Never before had they witnessed
the power of metal as used in war; and the sudden
amputation
of the arm struck them as something miraculous.
Even the ferocious Carib fell back in dismay, and Luis felt
hopes of victory. This was the first occasion on which the
Spaniards had come to blows with the mild inhabitants of
the islands they had discovered, though it is usual with
the historians to refer to an incident of still later
occurrence
,
as the commencement of strife, the severe privacy
which has ever been thrown over the connexion of Don
Luis with the expedition, having completely baffled their
slight and superficial researches. Of course, the efficiency
of a weapon like that used by our hero, was as novel to
the Haytians as it was terrific.
At this instant a shout among the assailants, and the
appearance
of a fresh body of the invaders, with a tall and
commanding chief at their head, announced the arrival of
Caonabo in person. This warlike cacique was soon made
acquainted with the state of affairs, and it was evident that
the prowess of our hero struck him as much with admiration
as with wonder. After a few minutes, he directed his
followers
to fall back to a greater distance, and, laying aside his
club, he advanced fearlessly towards Luis, making signs of
amity.
When the two adversaries met, it was with mutual
respect
and confidence. The Carib made a short and
vehement
speech, in which the only word that was intelligible to
our hero, was the name of the beautiful young Indian. By
this time Ozema had also advanced, as if eager to speak,
and her rude suitor turned to her, with an appeal that was
passionate, if not eloquent. He laid his hand frequently
on his heart, and his voice became soft and persuasive.
Ozema replied earnestly, and in the quick manner of one
whose resolution was settled. At the close of her speech,
the colour mounted to the temples of the ardent girl, and, as
if purposely to make her meaning understood by our hero,
she ended by saying, in Spanish,
Caonabo  no  no  no!  Luis  Luis!
The aspect of the hurricane of the tropics is not darker,
or more menacing, than the scowl with which the Carib
chief heard this unequivocal rejection of his suit,
accompanied
,
as it was, by so plain a demonstration in favour of the
stranger. Waving his hand in defiance, he strode back to
his people, and issued orders for a fresh assault.
This time, a tempest of arrows preceded the rush, and
Luis was fain to seek his former cover behind the rocks.
Indeed, this was the only manner in which he could save
the life of Ozema; the devoted girl resolutely persevering
in standing before his body, in the hope it would shield him
from his enemies. There had been some words of reproach
from Caonabo to the Carib chief, who had retreated from
the first attack, and the air was yet filled with arrows, as
this man rushed forward, singly, to redeem his name. Luis
met him, firm as the rock behind him. The shock was
violent, and the blow that fell on the buckler would have
crushed an arm less enured to such rude encounters; but
it glanced obliquely from the shield, and the club struck
the earth with the weight of a beetle. Our hero saw that
all now depended on a deep impression. His sword flashed
in the bright sun, and the head of the Carib tumbled by the
side of his club, actually leaving the body erect for an
instant
,
so keen was the weapon, and so dexterous had been
the blow.
Twenty savages were on the spring, but they stopped,
like men transfixed, at this unexpected sight. Caonabo,
however, undaunted even when most surprised, roared out
his orders like a maddened bull, and the wavering crowd
was again about to advance, when the loud report of an
arquebuse was heard, followed by the whistling of its deadly
missives. A second Haytian fell dead in his tracks. It
exceeded the powers of savage endurance to resist this
assault
,
which, to their uninstructed minds, appeared to come
from heaven. In two minutes, neither Caonabo nor any of
his followers were visible. As they rushed down the hill,
Sancho appeared from a cover, carrying the arquebuse,
which he had taken the precaution to reload.
The circumstances did not admit of delay. Not a being
of Mattinao's tribe was to be seen in any direction; and Luis
made no doubt they had all fled. Determined to save
Ozema
at every hazard, he now took his way to the river, in
order to escape in one of the canoes. In passing through
the town, it was seen that not a house had been plundered;
and the circumstance was commented on by the Spaniards,
Luis pointing it out to his companion.
CaonabonononoOzema!Ozema! was the
answer of the girl, who well knew the real object of the
inroad.
A dozen canoes lay at the landing, and five minutes
sufficed for the fugitives to enter one, and to commence
their retreat. The current flowed towards the sea, and in
a couple of hours they were on the ocean. As the wind
blew constantly from the eastward, Sancho soon rigged
an apology for a sail, and, an hour before the sun set, the
party landed on a point that concealed them from the bay;
Luis being mindful of the admiral's injunction, to conceal
his excursion, lest others might claim a similar favour.
CHAPTER VIII.
Three-score and ten I can remember well,
Within the volume of which time I have seen
Hours dreadful, and things strange, but this sore sight
Hath trifled former knowings.
Macbeth.
A sight
that struck our hero with a terror and awe,
almost as great as those experienced by the ignorant
Haytians
at the report and effect of the arquebuse, awaited him,
as he came in view of the anchorage. The Santa Maria,
that vessel of the admiral, which he had left only four days
before in her gallant array and pride, lay a stranded wreck
on the sands, with fallen masts, broken sides, and all the
other signs of nautical destruction. The Nia was
anchored
in safety, it is true, at no great distance, but a sense
of loneliness and desertion came over the young man, as
he gazed at this small craft, which was little more than a
felucca, raised to the rank of a ship for the purposes of the
voyage. The beach was covered with stores, and it was
evident that the Spaniards and the people of Guacanagari
toiled in company, at the construction of a sort of fortress;
an omen that some great change had come over the
expedition
.
Ozema was immediately left in the house of a
native
,
and the two adventurers hurried forward to join their
friends, and to ask an explanation of what they had seen.
Columbus received his young friend kindly, but in deep
affliction. The manner in which the ship was lost has been
often told, and Luis learned that, the Nia being too small
to carry all away, a colony was to be left in the fortress,
while the remainder of the adventurers hastened back to
Spain. Guacanagari had shown himself full of sympathy,
and was kindness itself, while every one had been too
much occupied with the shipwreck to miss our hero, or to
hearken to rumours of an event as common as an inroad
from a Carib chief, to carry off an Indian beauty.
Perhaps
the latter event was still too recent to have reached
the shore.
The week that succeeded the return of Luis, was one of
active exertion. The Santa Maria was wrecked on the
morning of Christmas day, 1492, and on that of the 4th
of January following, the Nia was ready to depart on her
return voyage. During this interval, Luis had seen Ozema
but once, and then he had found her sorrowing, mute, and
resembling a withered flower, that retained its beauty even
while it drooped. On the evening of the third, however,
while lingering near the new-finished fortress, he was
summoned
by Sancho to another interview. To the surprise
of our hero, he found the young cacique with his sister.
Although language was wanting, on this occasion, the
parties easily understood each other. Ozema was no
longer sorrowful, and borne down with grief: the smile
and the laugh came easily from her young and buoyant
spirits, and Luis thought he had never seen her so winning
and lovely. She had arranged her scanty toilet with
Indian
coquetry, and the bright warm colour of her cheeks
added new lustre to her brilliant eyes. Her light, agile
form, a model of artless grace, seemed so ethereal as
scarce to touch the earth. The secret of this sudden
change was not long hid from Luis. The brother and
sister
,
after discussing all their dangers and escapes, and
passing
in review the character and known determination of
Caonabo, had come to the conclusion that there was no
refuge for Ozema but in flight. What most determined the
brother to consent that his sister should accompany the
strangers to their distant home, it would be useless to
inquire; but the motive of Ozema herself, can be no secret
to the reader. It was known that the admiral was desirous
of carrying to Spain a party of natives; and three females,
one of whom was of Ozema's rank, had already consented
to go. This chieftain's wife was not only known to Ozema,
but she was a kinswoman. Every thing seemed propitious
to the undertaking; and as a voyage to Spain was still a
mystery to the natives, who regarded it as something like
an extended passage from one of their islands to another,
no formidable difficulties presented themselves to the
imagination
of either the cacique or his sister.
This proposition took our hero by surprise. He was
both flattered and pleased at the self-devotion of Ozema,
even while it troubled him. Perhaps there were moments
when he a little distrusted himself. Still Mercedes reigned
in his heart, and he shook off the feeling as a suspicion that
a true knight could not entertain without offering an insult
to his own honour. On second thoughts, there were fewer
objections to the scheme than he had at first fancied; and,
after an hour's discussion, he left the place to go and
consult
the admiral.
Columbus was still at the fortress, and he heard our hero
gravely and with interest. Once or twice Luis's eyes
dropped under the searching glance of his superior; but,
on the whole, he acquitted himself of the task he had
undertaken
,
with credit.
The sister of a cacique, thou say'st, Don Luis,
returned
the admiral, thoughtfully. The virgin sister of a
cacique?
Even so, Don Christopher; and of a grace, birth, and
beauty, that will give our Lady, the Queen, a most exalted
idea of the merits of our discovery.
Thou wilt remember, Seor Conde, that nought but
purity may be offered to purity. Doa Isabella is a model
for all queens, and mothers, and wives; and I trust
nothing
to offend her angelic mind can ever come from her
favoured servants. There has been no deception practised
on this wild girl, to lead her into sin and misery?
Don Christopher, you can scarce think this of me. Doa
Mercedes herself is not more innocent than the girl I mean,
nor could her brother feel more solicitude in her fortunes,
than I feel. When the king and queen have satisfied their
curiosity, and dismissed her, I propose to place her under
the care of the Lady of Valverde.
The rarer the specimens that we take, the better, Luis.
This will gratify the sovereigns, and cause them to think
favourably of our discoveries, as thou sayest. It might be
done without inconvenience. The Nia is small, of a
verity, but we gain much in leaving this large party
behind
us. I have given up the principal cabin to the other
females, since thou and I can fare rudely for a few weeks.
Let the girl come, and see thou to her comfort and
convenience
.
This settled the matter. Early next morning Ozema
embarked, carrying with her the simple wealth of an Indian
princess, among which the turban was carefully preserved.
Her relative had an attendant, who sufficed for both. Luis
paid great attention to the accommodations, in which both
comfort and privacy were duly respected. The parting
with Mattinao was touchingly tender, for the domestic
affections
appear to have been much cultivated among these
simple-minded and gentle people; but the separation, it was
supposed, would be short, and Ozema had, again and again,
assured her brother that her repugnance to Caonabo,
powerful
cacique as he might be, was unconquerable. Each
hour increased it, strengthening her resolution never to
become
his wife. The alternative was to secrete herself in
the island, or to make this voyage to Spain; and there was
glory as well as security in the latter. With this
consolation
the brother and sister parted.
Columbus had intended to push his discoveries much
farther
,
before he returned to Europe; but the loss of the
Santa Maria, and the desertion of the Pinta, reduced him
to the necessity of bringing the expedition to a close, lest,
by some untoward accident, all that had actually been
achieved should be for ever lost to the world. Accordingly,
in the course of the 4th of January, 1493, he made sail to
the eastward, holding his course along the shores of Hayti.
His great object now was to get back to Spain before his
remaining little bark should fail him, when his own name
would perish with the knowledge of his discoveries.
Fortunately
,
however, on the 6th, the Pinta was seen coming
down before the wind, Martin Alonzo Pinzon having
effected
one of the purposes for which he had parted
company
,
that of securing a quantity of gold, but failed in
discovering any mines, which is believed to have been his
principal motive.
It is not important to the narrative to relate the details of
the meeting that followed. Columbus received the offending
Pinzon with prudent reserve, and, hearing his explanations,
he directed him to prepare the Pinta for the return passage.
After wooding and watering accordingly, in a bay
favourable
to such objects, the two vessels proceeded to the
eastward
in company; still following the north shore of Hayti,
Espaola, or Little Spain, as the island had been named
by Columbus.
*
*
The fortunes of this beautiful island furnish a remarkable proof
of the manner in which abuses are made, by the providence of God, to
produce their own punishments. This island, which is about
two-thirds
the size of the state of New York, was the seat of Spanish
authority
,
in the New World, for many years. The mild aborigines, who
were numerous and happy when discovered, were literally exterminated
by the cruelties of their new masters; and it was found necessary to
import negroes from Africa, to toil in the cane-fields. Towards the
middle of the sixteenth century, it is said that two hundred of the
aborigines
were not to be found in the island, although Ovando had decoyed
no less than forty thousand from the Bahamas, to supply the places of
the dead, as early as 1513! At a later day, Espaola passed into the
hands of the French, and all know the terrible events by which it has
gone into the exclusive possession of the descendants of the children
of Africa. All that has been said of the influence of the white
population
of this country, as connected with our own Indians, sinks into
insignificance, as compared with these astounding facts.
It was the 16th of the month, ere the adventurers finally
took their leave of this beautiful spot. They had scarcely
got clear of the land, steering a north-easterly course, when
the favourable winds deserted them, and they were again
Vol. II.  11
met by the trades. The weather was moderate, however,
and by keeping the two vessels on the best tack, by the 10th
of February, the admiral, making sundry deviations from a
straight course, however, had stretched across the track of
ocean in which these constant breezes prevailed, and
reached a parallel of latitude as high as Palos, his port. In
making this long slant, the Nia, contrary to former
experience
,
was much detained by the dull sailing of the Pinta,
which vessel, having sprung her after-mast, was unable to
bear a press of sail. The light breezes also favoured the
first, which had ever been deemed a fast craft, in smooth
water and gentle gales.
Most of the phenomena of the outward passage were
observed
on the homeward; but the tunny-fish no longer
excited
hopes, nor did the sea-weed awaken fears. These
familiar objects were successfully, but slowly passed, and
the variable winds were happily struck again in the first
fortnight. Here the traverses necessarily became more and
more complicated, until the pilots, unused to so long and
difficult a navigation, in which they received no aids from
either land or water, got confused in their reckonings,
disputing
hotly among themselves concerning their true
position
.
Thou hast heard to-day, Luis, said the admiral smiling,
in one of his renewed conferences with our hero, the
contentions
of Vicente Yaez, with his brother, Martin Alonzo,
and the other pilots, touching our distance from Spain.
These constant shifts of wind have perplexed the honest
mariners, and they fancy themselves in any part of the
Atlantic, but that in which they really are!
Much depends on you, Seor; not only our safety, but
the knowledge of our great discoveries.
Thou sayest true, Don Luis. Vicente Yaez, Sancho
Ruiz, Pedro Alonzo Nio, and Bartolemeo Roldan, to say
nothing of the profound calculators in the Pinta, place the
vessels in the neighbourhood of Madeira, which is nearer to
Spain, by a hundred and fifty leagues, than the truth would
show. These honest people have followed their wishes,
rather than their knowledge of the ocean and the heavens.
And you, Don Christopher, where do you place the
caravels, since there is no motive to conceal the truth?
We are south of Flores, young count, fully twelve
degrees
west of the Canaries, and in the latitude of Naf, in
Africa. But I would that they should be bewildered, until
the right of possession to our discoveries be made a matter
of certainty. Not one of these men now doubts his ability to
do all I have done, and yet neither is able to grope his
way back again, after crossing this track of water to Asia!
Luis understood the admiral, and the size of the vessels
rendering the communication of secrets hazardous, the
conversation changed.
Up to this time, though the winds were often variable, the
weather had been good. A few squalls had occurred, as
commonly happens at sea, but they had proved to be neither
long nor severe. All this was extremely grateful to
Columbus
,
who, now he had effected the great purpose for
which he might have been said to live, felt some such
concern
lest the important secret should be lost to the rest of
mankind, as one who carries a precious object through
scenes of danger experiences for the safety of his charge.
A change, however, was at hand, and at the very moment
when the great navigator began to hope the best, he was
fated to experience the severest of all his trials.
As the vessels advanced north, the weather became cooler,
as a matter of course, and the winds stronger. During
the night of the 11th of February, the caravels made a
great run on their course, gaining more than a hundred
miles between sunset and sunrise. The next morning many
birds were in sight, from which fact Columbus believed
himself
quite near the Azores, while the pilots fancied they
were in the immediate vicinity of Madeira. The following
day the wind was less favourable, though strong, and a
heavy sea had got up. The properties of the little Nia
now showed themselves to advantage, for, ere the turn of
the day, she had to contend with such a struggle of the
elements, as few in her had ever before witnessed.
Fortunately
,
all that consummate seamanship could devise to
render her safe and comfortable had been done, and she
was in as perfect a state of preparation for a tempest, as
circumstances would allow. The only essential defect was
her unusual lightness, since, most of her stores as well
as her water being nearly exhausted, her draught of
water was materially less than it should have been. The
caravel was so small, that this circumstance, which is of
little consequence to the safety of large vessels, got to be
one of consideration in a craft whose means of endurance
did not place her above the perils of squalls. The reader
will understand the distinction better when he is told that
ships of size can only lose their spars by sudden gusts of
wind, seldom being thrown on their beam-ends, as it is
termed, unless by the power of the waves; whereas, smaller
craft incur the risk of being capsized, when the spread
of their canvass is disproportioned to their stability.
Although
the seamen of the Nia perceived this defect in their
caravel, which, in a great measure, proceeded from the
consumption of the fresh water, they hoped so soon to gain
a haven, that no means had been taken to remedy the evil.
Such was the state of things, as the sun set on the night
of the 12th of February, 1493. As usual, Columbus was
on the poop, vessels of all sizes then carrying these clumsy
excrescences, though this of the Nia was so small as
scarce to deserve the name. Luis was at his side, and
both watched the aspect of the heavens and the ocean in
grave silence. Never before had our hero seen the elements
in so great commotion, and the admiral had just remarked,
that even he had not viewed many nights as threatening.
There is a solemnity about a sunset at sea, when the clouds
appear threatening, and the omens of a storm are brooding,
that is never to be met with on the land. The loneliness
of a ship, struggling through a waste of dreary-looking
water, contributes to the influence of the feelings that are
awakened, as there appears to be but one object on which
the wild efforts of the storm can expend themselves. All
else seem to be in unison to aid the general strife; ocean,
heavens, and the air, being alike accessaries in the murky
picture. When the wintry frowns of February are thrown
around all, the gloomy hues of the scene are deepened to
their darkest tints.
This is a brooding night-fall, Don Luis, Columbus
remarked
,
just as the last rays that the sun cast upwards on
the stormy-looking clouds disappeared from their ragged
outlinesI have rarely seen another as menacing.
One has a double confidence in the care of God, while
sailing under your guidance, Seor; first in his goodness,
and next in the knowledge of his agent's skilfulness.
The power of the Almighty is sufficient to endue the
feeblest mortal with all fitting skill, when it is his divine
will to spare; or to rob the most experienced of their
knowledge, when his anger can only be appeased by the
worldly destruction of his creatures.
You look upon the night as portentous, Don
Christopher
!
I
have
seen omens as ill, though very seldom. Had
not the caravel this burthensome freight, I might view our
situation less anxiously.
You surprise me, sir admiral! the pilots have regretted
that our barque is so light.
True, as to material substance; but it beareth a cargo
of knowledge, Luis, that it would be grievous to see wasted
on these vacant waters. Dost thou not perceive how fast
and gloomily the curtain of night gathereth about us, and
the manner in which the Nia is rapidly getting to be our
whole world? Even the Pinta is barely distinguishable,
like a shapeless shadow on the foaming billows, serving
rather as a beacon to warn us of our own desolation, than
as a consort to cheer us with her presence and
companionship
.
I have never known you thus moody, excellent Seor,
on account of the aspect of the weather!
'Tis not usual with me, young lord; but my heart
is loaded with its glorious secret. Behold!dost thou
remark
that further sign of the warring of the elements?
The admiral, as he spoke, was standing with his face
towards Spain, while his companion's gaze was fastened on
the portentous-looking horizon of the west, around which
still lingered sufficient light to render its frowns as chilling
as they were visible. He had not seen the change that
drew the remark from Columbus, but, turning quickly, he
asked an explanation. Notwithstanding the season, the
horizon at the north-east had been suddenly illuminated
by a flash of lightning, and even while the admiral was
relating
the fact, and pointing out the quarter of the heavens
in which the phenomenon had appeared, two more flashes
followed each other in quick succession.
11 *
Seor Vicentecalled out Columbus, leaning forward
in a way to overlook a group of dusky figures that was
collected on the half-deck beneath himIs Seor Vicente
Yaez of your number?
I am here, Don Christopher, and note the omen. It is
the sign of even more wind.
We shall be visited with a tempest, worthy Vicente,
and it will come from that quarter of the heavens, or its
opposite
.
Have we made all sure in the caravel?
I know not what else is to be done, Seor Almirante.
Our canvass is at the lowest, everything is well lashed, and
we carry as little aloft as can be spared. Sancho Ruiz,
look you to the tarpaulins, lest we ship more water than will
be safe.
Look well to our light, too, that our consort may not
part from us in the darkness. This is no time for sleep,
Vicenteplace your most trusty men at the tiller.
Seor, they are selected with care. Sancho Mundo,
and young Pepe of Moguer, do that duty, at present; others
as skilled await to relieve them, when their watch ends.
'T is well, good Pinzonneither you nor I can close
an eye to-night.
The precautions of Columbus were not uncalled for.
About an hour after the unnatural flashes of lightning had
been seen, the wind rose from the south-west, favourably as
to direction, but fearfully as to force. Notwithstanding his
strong desire to reach port, the admiral found it prudent to
order the solitary sail that was set, to be taken in; and
most of the night the two caravels drove before the gale,
under bare poles, heading to the north-east. We say both,
for Martin Alonzo, practised as he was in stormy seas, and
disposed as he was to act only for himself, now the great
problem was solved, kept the Pinta so near the Nia, that
few minutes passed without her being seen careering on the
summit of a foaming sea, or settling bodily into the
troughs, as she drove headlong before the tempest;
keeping
side by side with her consort, however, as man clings
to man in moments of dependency and peril.
Thus passed the night of the 13th, the day bringing
with it a more vivid picture of the whole scene, though it
was thought that the wind somewhat abated in its force as
the sun arose. Perhaps this change existed only in the
imaginations of the mariners, the light usually lessening
the appearance of danger, by enabling men to face it.
Each caravel, however, set a little canvass, and both went
foaming ahead, hurrying towards Spain with their
unlooked-for
tidings. As the day advanced, the fury of
the gale sensibly lessened; but as night drew on again, it
returned with renewed force, more adverse, and compelling
the adventurers to take in every rag of sail they had
ventured
to spread. Nor was this the worst. The caravels, by
this time, had driven up into a tract of ocean where a heavy
cross-sea was raging, the effects of some other gale that had
recently blown from a different quarter. Both vessels
struggled
manfully to lay up to their course, under these adverse
circumstances; but they began to labour in a way to excite
uneasiness in those who comprehended the fullest powers
of the machines, and who knew whence the real sources
of danger were derived. As night approached, Columbus
perceived that the Pinta could not maintain her ground, the
strain on her after-mast proving too severe to be borne,
even without an inch of canvass spread. Reluctantly did
he order the Nia to edge away towards her consort,
separation
,
at such a moment, being the evil next to positive
destruction.
In this manner the night of the 14th drew around our
lone and sea-girt adventurers. What had been merely
menace and omens the previous night, were now a dread
reality. Columbus, himself, declared he had never known
a barque to buffet a more furious tempest, nor did he affect
to conceal from Luis the extent of his apprehensions. With
the pilots, and before the crew, he was serene and even
cheerful; but when alone with our hero, he became frank
and humble. Still was the celebrated navigator always calm
and firm. No unmanly complaint escaped him, though his
very soul was saddened at the danger his great discoveries
ran of being for ever lost.
Such was the state of feeling that prevailed with the
admiral, as he sat in his narrow cabin, in the first hours
of that appalling night, watching for any change,
relieving
or disastrous, that might occur. The howling of
the winds, which fairly scooped up from the surface of the
raging Atlantic, the brine in sheets, was barely audible
amid the roar and rush of the waters. At times, indeed,
when the caravel sunk helplessly between two huge waves,
the fragment of sail she still carried, would flap, and the air
seemed hushed and still; and then, again, as the buoyant
machine struggled upward, like a drowning man who gains
the surface by frantic efforts, it would seem as if the
columns of air were about to bear her off before them, as
lightly as the driving spray. Even Luis, albeit little apt
to take alarm, felt that their situation was critical, and his
constitutional buoyancy of spirits had settled down in a
thoughtful gravity, that was unusual with him. Had a
column of a thousand hostile Moors stood before our hero,
he would have thought rather of the means of overturning
it than of escape; but this warring of the elements
admitted
of no such relief. It appeared actually like
contending
with the Almighty. In such scenes, indeed, the
bravest find no means of falling back on their resolution
and intrepidity; for the efforts of man seem insignificant
and bootless as opposed to the will and power of God.
'T is a wild night, Seor, our hero observed calmly,
preserving an exterior of more unconcern than he really
felt. To me this surpasseth all I have yet witnessed of
the fury of a tempest.
Columbus sighed heavily; then he removed his hands
from his face, and glanced about him, as if in search of
the implements he wanted.
Count of Llera, he answered, with dignity, there
remaineth a solemn duty to perform. There is parchment
in the draw on your side of this table, and here are the
instruments for writing. Let us acquit ourselves of this
important trust while time is yet mercifully given us, God
alone knowing how long we have to live.
Luis did not blanch at these portentous words, but he
looked earnest and grave. Opening the draw, he took out
the parchment and laid it upon the table. The admiral
now seized a pen, beckoning to his companion to take
another
,
and both commenced writing as well as the incessant
motion of the light caravel would allow. The task was
arduous, but it was clearly executed. As Columbus wrote
a sentence, he repeated it to Luis, who copied it word for
word, on his own piece of parchment. The substance of
this record was the fact of the discoveries made, the
latitude
and longitude of Espaola, with the relative positions
of the other islands, and a brief account of what he had
seen. The letter was directed to Ferdinand and Isabella.
As soon as each had completed his account, the admiral
carefully enveloped his missive in a covering of waxed
cloth, Luis imitating him in all things. Each then took a
large cake of wax, and scooping a hole in it, the packet
was carefully secured in the interior, when it was covered
with the substance that had been removed. Columbus now
sent for the cooper of the vessel, who was directed to
inclose
each cake in a separate barrel. These vessels abound
in ships; and ere many minutes, the two letters were
securely
inclosed in the empty casks. Each taking a barrel,
the admiral and our hero now appeared again on the
half-deck
.
So terrific was the night, that no one slept, and most
of the people of the Nia, men as well as officers, were
crowded together on the gratings near the main-mast,
where alone, with the exception of the still more privileged
places, they considered themselves safe from being swept
overboard. Indeed, even here they were constantly covered
with the wash of the sea, the poop itself not being
protected
from rude visits of this nature.
As soon as the admiral was seen again, his followers
crowded round him, solicitous to hear his opinion, and
anxious to learn his present object. To have told the truth,
would have been to introduce despair where hope had
already nearly ceased; and, merely intimating that he
performed
a religious vow, Columbus, with his own hands,
cast his barrel into the hissing ocean. That of Luis was
placed upon the poop, in the expectation that it would float,
should the caravel sink.
Three centuries and a half have rolled by, since
Columbus
took this wise precaution, and no tidings have ever
been obtained of that cask. Its buoyancy was such that
it might continue to float for ages. Covered with barnacles,
it may still be drifting about the waste of waters, pregnant
with its mighty revelations. It is possible, it may have
been repeatedly rolled upon some sandy beach, and as
frequently
swept off again; and it may have been passed
unheeded
,
on a thousand occasions, by different vessels,
confounded
with its vulgar fellows that are so often seen
drifting
about the ocean. Had it been found, it would have
been opened; and had it been opened by any civilized man,
it is next to impossible that an occurrence of so much
interest
should have been totally lost.
This duty discharged, the admiral had leisure to look
about him. The darkness was now so great, that, but for
the little light that was disengaged from the troubled water,
it would have been difficult to distinguish objects at the
length of the caravel. No one, who has merely been at
sea in a tall ship, can form any just idea of the situation of
the Nia. This vessel, little more than a large felucca, had
actually sailed from Spain with the latine rig, that is so
common to the light coasters of southern Europe; a rig
that had only been altered in the Canaries. As she floated
in a bay, or a river, her height above the water could not
have exceeded four or five feet, and now that she was
struggling
with a tempest, in a cross sea, and precisely in that
part of the Atlantic where the rake of the winds is the
widest, and the tumult of the water the greatest, it seemed
as if she were merely some aquatic animal, that occasionally
rose to the surface to breathe. There were moments when
the caravel appeared to be irretrievably sinking into the
abyss of the ocean; huge black mounds of water rising
around her in all directions, the confusion in the waves
having destroyed all the ordinary symmetry of the rolling
billows. Although so much figurative language has been
used, in speaking of mountainous waves, it would not be
exceeding the literal truth to add, that the Nia's yards
were often below the summits of the adjacent seas, which
were tossed upward in so precipitous a manner, as to create
a constant apprehension of their falling in cataracts on her
gratings; for, midship-deck, strictly speaking, she had
none. This, indeed, formed the great source of danger;
since one falling wave might have filled the little vessel, and
carried her, with all in her, hopelessly to the bottom. As
it was, the crests of seas were constantly tumbling inboard,
or shooting athwart the hull of the caravel, in sheets of
glittering foam, though happily never with sufficient power
to overwhelm the buoyant fabric. At such perilous instants,
the safety of the craft depended on the frail tarpawlings.
Had these light coverings given way, two or three
successive
waves would infallibly have so far filled the hold, as to
render the hull water-logged; when the loss of the vessel
would have followed as an inevitable consequence.
The admiral had ordered Vicente Yaez to carry the
foresail close reefed, in the hope of dragging the caravel
through this chaos of waters, to a part of the ocean where
the waves ran more regularly. The general direction of
the seas too, so far as they could be said to have a general
direction at all, had been respected, and the Nia had
struggled
onward  it might be better to say waded onward
some five or six leagues, since the disappearance of the day,
and found no change. It was getting to be near midnight,
and still the surface of the ocean presented the same wild
aspect of chaotic confusion. Vicente Yaez approached
the admiral, and declared that the barque could no longer
bear the rag of sail she carried.
The jerk, as we rise on the sea, goes near to pull the
stern out of the craft, he said, and the backward flap, as
we settle into the troughs, is almost as menacing. The
Nia will bear the canvass no longer, with safety.
Who has seen aught of Martin Alonzo within the
hour? demanded Columbus, looking anxiously in the
direction
in which the Pinta ought to be visible. Thou hast
lowered the lantern, Vicente Yaez.
It would stand the hurricane no longer. From time to
time it hath been shown, and each signal hath been
answered
by my brother.
Let it be shown once more. This is a moment when the
presence of a friend gladdens the soul, even though he be
helpless as ourselves.
The lantern was hoisted, and, after a steady gaze, a faint
and distant light was seen glimmering in the rack of the
tempest. The experiment was repeated, at short intervals,
and as often was the signal answered, at increasing
distances
,
until the light of their consort was finally lost
altogether
.
The Pinta's mast is too feeble to bear even its gear, in
such a gale, observed Vicente Yaez; and my brother
hath found it impossible to keep as near the wind as we
have done. He goes off more to leeward.
Let the foresail be secured, answered Columbus, as
thou sayest. Our feeble craft can no longer bear these
violent surges.
Vicente Yaez now mustered a few of his ablest men,
and went forward himself to see this order executed. At
the same moment the helm was righted, and the caravel
slowly fell off, until she got dead before the gale. The task
of gathering in the canvass was comparatively easy, the
yard being but a few feet above the deck, and little besides
the clews being exposed. Still it required men of the
firmest nerve and the readiest hands to venture aloft at
such an instant. Sancho took one side of the mast and
Pepe the other, both manifesting such qualities as mark the
perfect seaman, only.
The caravel was now drifting at the mercy of the winds
and waves, the term scudding being scarcely applicable to
the motion of a vessel so low, and which was so perfectly
sheltered from the action of the wind by the height of the
billows. Had the latter possessed their ordinary regularity,
the low vessel must have been pooped; but, in a measure,
her exemption from this calamity was owing to an
irregularity
that was only the source of a new danger. Still, the
Nia drove ahead, and that swiftly, though not with the
velocity necessary to outstrip the chasing water, had the
waves followed with their customary order and rapidity.
The cross seas defeated this; wave meeting wave, actually
sending those crests which otherwise would have rolled
over in combing foam, upward in terrific
jets d'eau.
This was the crisis of the danger. There was an hour
when the caravel careered amid the chaotic darkness with
a sort of headlong fury, not unfrequently dashing forward
with her broadside to the sea, as if the impatient stern was
bent on overtaking the stem, and exposing all to the
extreme
jeopardy of receiving a flood of water on the beam.
This imminent risk was only averted by the activity of the
man at the helm, where Sancho toiled with all his skill and
energy, until the sweat rolled from his brow, as if exposed
again to the sun of the tropics. At length the alarm
became
so great and general, that a common demand was
made to the admiral to promise the customary religious
oblations. For this purpose, all but the men at the helm
assembled aft, and preparations were made to cast lots for
the penance.
Ye are in the hands of God, my friends, said
Columbus
,
and it is meet that ye all confess your dependence
on his goodness, placing your security on his blessings and
favour alone. In this cap which ye see in the hands of the
Seor de Muos, are the same number of peas that we
are of persons. One of these peas bears the mark of the
Holy Cross, and he who shall draw forth this blessed
emblem
,
stands pledged to make a pilgrimage to Santa Maria
de Guadalupe, bearing a waxen taper of five pounds weight.
As the chiefest sinner amongst you, no less than as your
admiral, the first trial shall be mine.
Here Columbus put his hand into the cap, and on
drawing
forth a pea, and holding it to the lantern, it was found
to bear on its surface the mark he had mentioned.
This is well, Seor, said one of the pilots; but
replace
the pea, and let the chance be renewed for a still
heavier penance, and that at a shrine which is most in
request
with all good Christians; I mean that of our Lady
of Loretto. One pilgrimage to that shrine is worth two to
any other.
In moments of emergency the religious sentiment is apt
to be strong; and this proposition was seconded with
warmth. The admiral cheerfully consented; and when all
had drawn, the marked pea was found in the hands of a
common seaman, of the name of Pedro de Villa; one who
bore no very good name for either piety or knowledge.
'T is a weary and costly journey, grumbled the chosen
penitent, and cannot cheaply be made.
Heed it not, friend Pedro, answered Columbus: the
bodily pains shall limit thy sufferings, for the cost of the
journey shall be mine. This night groweth more and more
terrifice, good Bartolemeo Roldan.
That doth it, Seor Admiral, and I am little content
with such a pilgrim as Pedro here, although it may seem
as if heaven itself directed the choice. A mass in Santa
Clara de Moguer, with a watcher all night in that chapel,
Vol. II.  12
will be of more account than your distant journeys made
by such an one as he.
This opinion wanted not for supporters among the
seamen
of Moguer, and a third trial was made to determine
the person. Again the pea was withdrawn from the cap by
the admiral. Still the danger did not diminish, the caravel
actually threatening to roll over amid the turbulence of the
waves.
We are too light, Vicente Yaez, said Columbus, and
desperate as the undertaking seemeth, we must make an
effort to fill our empty casks with sea-water. Let hose be
carefully introduced beneath the tarpawlings, and send
careful hands below to make sure that the water do not
get into the hold instead of the casks.
This order was obeyed, and several hours passed in
efforts to execute this duty. The great difficulty was in
protecting the men who raised the water from the sea, for
while the whole element was raging in such confusion
around them, it was no easy matter to secure a single drop
in a useful manner. Patience and perseverance, however,
prevailed in the end, and, ere the light returned, so many
empty casks had been filled, as evidently to aid the
steadiness
of the vessel. Towards morning it rained in torrents,
and the wind shifted from south to west, losing but little of
its force, however. At this juncture the foresail was again
got on the barque, and she was dragged by it, through a
tremendous sea, a few miles to the eastward.
When the day dawned, the scene was changed for the
better. The Pinta was nowhere to be seen, and most in the
Nia believed she had gone to the bottom. But the clouds
had opened a little, and a sort of mystical brightness rested
on the ocean, which was white with foam, and still hissing
with fury. The waves, however, were gradually getting
to be more regular, and the seamen no longer found it
necessary
to lash themselves to the vessel, in order to prevent
being washed overboard. Additional sail was got on the
caravel, and as her motion ahead increased, she became
steadier, and more certain in all her movements.
CHAPTER IX.
For now, from sight of land diverted clear,
They drove uncertain o'er the pathless deep;
Nor gave the adverse gale due course to steer,
Nor durst they the design'd direction keep:
The gathering tempest quickly raged so high,
The wave-encompass'd boat but faintly reach'd my eye.
Vision of Patience.
Such
was the state of things on the morning of the 15th,
and shortly after the sun arose, the joyful cry of land was
heard from aloft. It is worthy of being mentioned that
this land was made directly ahead, so accurate were all the
admiral's calculations, and so certain did he feel of his
position
on the chart. A dozen opinions, however, prevailed
among the pilots and people concerning this welcome sight;
some fancying it the continent of Europe, while others
believed
it to be Madeira. Columbus, himself, publicly
announced
it to be one of the Azores.
Each hour was lessening the distance between this
welcome
spot of earth and the adventurers, when the gale
chopped directly round, bringing the island dead to
windward
.
Throughout a long and weary day the little barque
kept turning up against the storm, in order to reach this much
desired haven, but the heaviness of the swell and the foul
wind made their progress both slow and painful. The sun set
in wintry gloom again, and the land still lay in the wrong
quarter, and apparently at a distance that was unattainable.
Hour after hour passed, and still in the darkness the Nia
was struggling to get nearer to the spot where the land had
been seen. Columbus never left his post throughout all
these anxious scenes, for to him it seemed as if the fortunes
of his discoveries were now suspended, as it might be, by
a hair. Our hero was less watchful, but even he began to
feel more anxiety in the result, as the moment approached
when the fate of the expedition was to be decided.
As the sun arose every eye turned inquiringly around
the watery view, and, to the common disappointment, no
land was visible. Some fancied all had been illusion, but
the admiral believed they had passed the island in the
darkness, and he hove about, with a view to stand farther
south. This change in the course had not been made more
than an hour or two, when land was again dimly seen
astern, and in a quarter where it could not have been
previously
perceived. For this island the caravel tacked, and
until dark she was beating up for it, against a strong gale
and a heavy sea. Night again drew around her, and the
land once more vanished in the gloom.
At the usual hour of the previous night, the people of
the Nia had assembled to chant the
salve fac, regina,
or
the evening hymn to the Virgin, for it is one of the touching
incidents of this extraordinary voyage, that these rude
sailors first carried with them into the unknown wastes of
the Atlantic the songs of their religion, and the Christian's
prayers. While thus employed, a light had been made to
leeward, which was supposed to be on the island first seen,
thus encouraging the admiral in his belief that he was in
the centre of a group, and that by keeping well to
windward
,
he would certainly find himself in a situation to reach
a port in the morning. That morning, however, had
produced
no other change than the one noted, and he was now
preparing to pass another night, or that of the 17th, in
uncertainty
,
when the cry of land ahead suddenly cheered
the spirits of all in the vessel.
The Nia stood boldly in, and before midnight she was
near enough to the shore to let go an anchor; so heavy
were both wind and sea, however, that the cable parted,
thus rejecting them, as it were, from the regions to which
they properly belonged. Sail was made, and the effort to
get to windward renewed, and by daylight the caravel was
enabled to run in and get an anchorage on the north side
of the island. Here the wearied and almost exhausted
mariners
learned that Columbus was right, as usual, and that
they had reached the island of St. Mary, one of the Azores.
It does not belong to this tale to record all the incidents
that occurred while the Nia lay at this port. They
embraced
an attempt to seize the caravel, on the part of the
Portuguese, who, as they had been the last to harass the
admiral on his departure from the old world, were the first
to beset him on his return. All their machinations failed,
however, and after having the best portion of his crew in
their power, and actually having once sailed from the island
without the men, the admiral finally arranged the matter,
and took his departure for Spain, with all his people on
board, on the 24th of the month.
Providence seemed to favour the passage of the
adventurers
,
for the first few days; the wind being favourable
and the sea smooth. Between the morning of the 24th and
the evening of the 26th, the caravel had made nearly a
hundred leagues directly on her course to Palos, when she
was met by a foul wind and another heavy sea. The gale
now became violent again, though sufficiently favourable to
allow them to steer east, a little northerly, occasionally
hauling more ahead. The weather was rough, but as the
admiral knew he was drawing in with the continent of
Europe
,
he did not complain, cheering his people with the
hopes of a speedy arrival. In this manner the time passed
until the turn of the day, Saturday, March 2d, when
Columbus
believed himself to be within a hundred miles of
the coast of Portugal, the long continuance of the scant
southerly winds having set him thus far north.
The night commenced favourably, the caravel struggling
ahead through a tremendous sea that was sweeping down
from the south, having the wind abeam, blowing so fresh,
as to cause the sails to be reduced within manageable size.
The Nia was an excellent craft, as had been thoroughly
proved, and she was now steadier than when first assailed
by the tempests, her pilots having filled still more of the
casks, than they had been able to do during the late storm.
Thou hast lived at the helm, Sancho Mundo, since the
late gales commenced, said the admiral cheerfully, as,
about the last hour of the first watch, he passed near the
post of the old mariner. It is no small honour to hold
that station in the cruel gales we have been fated to
endure
.
I so consider it, Seor Don Almirante; and I hope
their illustrious and most excellent Highnesses, the two
Sovereigns, will look upon it with the same eyes, so far as
the weight of the duty is concerned.
And why not as respects the honour, friend Sancho?
12 *
put in Luis, who had become a sworn friend of the seaman,
since the rescue of the rocks.
Honour, Seor Master Pedro, is cold food and sits ill on
a poor man's stomach. One dobla is worth two dukedoms
to such a man as I am, since the dobla would help to gain me
respect, whereas the dukedoms would only draw down
ridicule
upon my head. No, noMaster Pedro, your worship,
give me a pocket full of gold, and leave honours to such as
have a fancy for them. If a man must be raised in the
world, begin at the beginning, or lay a solid foundation;
after which he may be made a knight of St. James, if the
sovereigns have need of his name to make out their list.
Thou art too garrulous for a helmsman, Sancho, though
so excellent otherwise, observed the admiral, gravely.
Look to thy course; doblas will not be wanting, when
the voyage is ended.
Many thanks, Seor Almirante; and, as a proof that
my eyes are not shut, even though the tongue wags, I will
just desire your excellency, and the pilots, to study that rag
of a cloud that is gathering up here, at the south-west, and
ask yourselves if it means evil, or good.
By the mass! the man is right, Don Christopher!
exclaimed
Bartolemeo Roldan, who was standing near; that
is a most sinister-looking cloud, and is not unlike those that
give birth to the white squalls of Africa.
See to itsee to itgood Bartolemeo, returned
Columbus
,
hastily. We have, indeed, counted too much on
our good fortune, and have culpably overlooked the aspect
of the heavens. Let Vicente Yaez and all our people be
called; we may have need of them.
Columbus now ascended to the poop, where he got a
wider and a better view of the ocean and the skies. The
signs were, indeed, as portentous as they had been sudden
in their appearance. The atmosphere was filled with a
white mist, that resembled a light smoke, and the admiral
had barely time to look about him, when a roar that
resembled
the trampling of a thousand horse passing a bridge at
full speed, came rushing down with the wind. The ocean
was heard hissing, as is usual at such moments, and the
tempest burst upon the little bark, as if envious demons
were determined she should never reach Spain, with the
glorious tidings she bore.
A report like that of a heavy discharge of musketry,
was the first signal that the squall had struck the Nia. It
came from the rent canvass, every sail having given way
at the same instant. The caravel heeled until the water
reached her masts, and there was a breathless instant, when
the oldest seaman feared that she would be forced over
entirely
upon her side. Had not the sails split, this calamity
might truly have occurred. Sancho, too, had borne the tiller
up in season, and when the Nia recovered from the shock,
she almost flew out of the water, as she drove before the
blast.
This was the commencement of a new gale, which even
surpassed in violence that from which they had so recently
escaped. For the first hour, awe and disappointment
almost
paralyzed the crew, as nothing was or could be done
to relieve them from the peril they were in. The vessel
was already scudding  the last resource of seamen  and
even the rags of the canvass were torn, piece by piece,
from the spars, sparing the men the efforts that would have
been necessary to secure them. In this crisis, again the
penitent people resorted to their religious rites; and again
it fell to the lot of the admiral to make a visit to some
favourite
shrine. In addition, the whole crew made a vow to
fast on bread and water, the first Saturday after they should
arrive.
It is remarkable, Don Christopher, said Luis, when the
two were again alone on the poop, it is remarkable that
these lots should fall so often on you. Thrice have you
been selected by Providence to be an instrument of
thankfulness
and penitence.  This cometh of your exceeding
faith!
Say, rather, Luis, that it cometh of my exceeding sins.
My pride, alone, should draw down upon me stronger
rebukes
than these. I fear me, I had forgotten that I was
merely an agent chosen by God, to work his own great
ends, and was falling into the snares of Satan, by fancying
that I, of my own wisdom and philosophy, had done this
great exploit, which cometh so truly of God.
Do you believe us in danger, Seor?
Greater hazard besets us now, Don Luis, than hath
befallen us since we left Palos. We are driving towards
the continent, which cannot be thirty leagues distant; and,
as thou seest, the ocean is becoming more troubled every
hour. Happily, the night is far advanced, and with the
light we may find the means of safety.
The day did re-appear as usual; for whatever
disturbances
occur on its surface, the earth continues its daily
revolutions
in the sublimity of its vastness, affording at each
change to the mites on its surface, the indubitable proofs
that an omnipotent power reigns over all its movements.
The light, however, brought no change in the aspects of
the ocean and sky. The wind blew furiously, and the Nia
struggled along amid the chaos of waters, driving nearer
and nearer to the continent that lay before her.
About the middle of the afternoon, signs of land became
quite apparent, and no one doubted the vicinity of the
vessel to the shores of Europe. Nevertheless, nought was
visible but the raging ocean, the murky sky, and the sort
of supernatural light with which the atmosphere is so
often charged in a tempest. The spot where the sun set,
though known by means of the compass, could not be
traced by the eye; and again night closed on the wild,
wintry scene, as if the little caravel was abandoned by
hope as well as by the day. To add to the apprehensions
of the people, a high cross sea was running; and, as ever
happens with vessels so small, in such circumstances, tons'
weight of water were constantly falling inboard, threatening
destruction to the grantings and their frail coverings of
tarred
cloth.
This is the most terrible night of all, son Luis, said
Columbus, about an hour after the darkness had drawn
around them. If we escape this night, well may we deem
ourselves favoured of God!
And yet you speak calmly, Seor; as calmly as if your
heart was filled with hope.
The seaman that cannot command his nerves and voice,
even in the utmost peril, hath mistaken his calling. But I
feel
calm, Luis, as well as
seem
calm. God hath us in his
keeping, and will do that which most advanceth his own
holy will. My boysmy two poor boys trouble me sorely;
but even the fatherless are not forgotten!
If we perish, Seor, the Portuguese will remain
masters
of our secret: to them only is it now known, ourselves
excepted, since, for Martin Alonzo, I should think, there is
little hope.
This is another source of grief; yet have I taken such
steps as will probably put their highnesses on the
maintenance
of their rights. The rest must be trusted to heaven.
At that moment was heard the startling cry of land.
This word, which so lately would have been the cause of
sudden bursts of joy, was now the source of new
uneasiness
.
Although the night was dark, there were moments
when the gloom opened, as it might be, for a mile or two
around the vessel, and when objects as prominent as a coast
could be seen with sufficient distinctness. Both Columbus
and our hero hastened to the forward part of the caravel, at
this cry, though even this common movement was perilous,
in order to obtain the best possible view of the shore.
It was, indeed, so near, that all on board heard, or fancied
they heard, the roar of the surf against the rocks. That it
was Portugal, none doubted, and, to stand on in the present
uncertainty of their precise position, or without a haven to
enter, would be inevitable destruction. There remained
only the alternative to ware with the caravel's head off
shore, and endeavour to keep an offing until morning.
Columbus had no sooner mentioned this necessity, than
Vicente Yaez set about its execution in the best manner
circumstances would allow.
Hitherto the wind had been kept a little on the starboard
quarter, the caravel steering east, a point or two north, and
it was now the aim to lay her head so far round as to
permit
her to steer north, a point or two west. By the manner
in which the coast appeared to trend, it was thought that
this variation in the direction might keep them, for a few
hours, at a sufficient distance from the shore. But this
manoeuvre
could not be effected without the aid of canvass, and
an order was issued to set the foresail. The first flap of
the canvass, as it was loosened to the gale, was tremendous,
the jerk threatening to tear the foremast from its step, and
then all was still as death forward, the hull sinking so low
behind a barrier of water, as actually to becalm the sail.
Sancho and his associate seized the favourable moment to
secure the clews, and, as the little barque struggled upward
again, the canvass filled with some such shock as is felt at
the sudden checking of a cable. From this moment the
Nia drew slowly off to sea again, though her path lay
through such a scene of turbulent water, as threatened, at
each instant, to overwhelm her.
Luis! said a soft voice, at our hero's elbow, as the
latter stood clinging to the side of the door of the cabin
appropriated
to the femalesLuisHayti betterMattinao
bettermuch bad, Luis!
It was Ozema, who had risen from her pallet to look out
upon the appalling view of the ocean. During the mild
weather of the first part of the passage, the intercourse
between
Luis and the natives on board, had been constant
and cheerful. Though slightly incommoded by her
situation
,
Ozema had always received his visits with guileless
delight, and her progress in Spanish had been such as to
astonish even her teacher. Nor were the means of
communication
confined altogether to the advance of Ozema,
since Luis, in his endeavours to instruct her, had acquired
nearly as many words of her native tongue, as he had
taught her of his own. In this manner they conversed,
resorting to both dialects for terms, as necessity dictated.
We shall give a free translation of what was said,
endeavouring
,
at the same time, to render the dialogue characteristic
and graphic.
Poor Ozema! returned our hero, drawing her gently
to a position where he could support her against the effects
of the violent motion of the caravel  thou must regret
Hayti, indeed, and the peaceful security of thy groves!
Caonabo there, Luis.
True, innocent girl; but even Caonabo is not as terrible
as this anger of the elements.
No  no  no  Caonabo much bad. Break Ozema's
heart. No Caonabono Hayti.
Thy dread of the Carib chief, dear Ozema, hath upset
thy reason, in part. Thou hast a God, as well as we
Christians, and, like us, must put thy trust in him; he
alone can now protect thee.
What protect?
Care for thee, Ozema. See that thou dost not come to
harm. Look to thy safety and welfare.
Luis protect Ozema. So promise Mattinaoso promise
Ozemaso promise heart.
Dear girl, so will I, to the extent of my means. But
what can I do against this tempest?
What Luis do against Caonabo?kill himcut Indians
make him run away!
This was easy to a Christian knight, who carried a
good sword and buckler, but it is impossible against a
tempest
.
We have only one hope, and that is to trust in the
Spaniard's God.
Spaniards greathave great God.
There is but one God, Ozema, and he ruleth all,
whether
in Hayti or in Spain. Thou rememberest what I have
told thee of his love, and of the manner of his death, that
we might all be saved, and thou didst then promise to
worship him, and to be baptised when we should reach my
country.
God!  Ozema do, what Ozema say. Love Luis's
God already.
Thou hast seen the holy cross, Ozema, and hast
promised
me to kiss it, and bless it.
Where cross? See no cross  up in heaven?  or
where? Show Ozema cross, now  Luis's cross  cross
Luis love.
The young man wore the parting gift of Mercedes near
his heart, and raising a hand he withdrew the small jewel,
pressed it to his own lips with pious fervour, and then
offered it to the Indian girl.
Seehe saidthis is a cross; we Spaniards
revere
and bless it. It is our pledge of happiness.
That Luis's God? inquired Ozema, in a little surprise.
Not so, my poor benighted girl
What benighted? interrupted the quick-witted Haytian,
eagerly, for no term that the young man could or did apply
to her, fell unheeded on her vigilant and attentive ear.
Benighted means those who have never heard of the
cross, or of its endless mercies.
Ozema no benighted now, exclaimed the other,
pressing
the bauble to her bosom. Got crosskeep cross
no benighted again, never. Cross, Mercedesfor, by one
of those mistakes that are not unfrequent in the
commencement
of all communications between those who speak
different
tongues, the young Indian had caught the notion,
from many of Luis's involuntary exclamations, that
Mercedes
meant all that was excellent.
I would, indeed, that she of whom thou speakest had
thee in her gentle care, that she might lead thy pure soul
to a just knowledge of thy Creator! That cross cometh
of Mercedes, if it be not Mercedes herself, and thou dost
well in loving it, and in blessing it. Place the chain around
thy neck, Ozema, for the precious emblem may help in
preserving thee, should the gale throw us on the coast, ere
morning.
That cross is a sign of undying love.
The girl understood enough of this, especially as the
direction
was seconded by a little gentle aid, on the part of
our hero, to comply, and the chain was soon thrown around
her neck, with the holy emblem resting on her bosom.
The change in the temperature, as well as a sense of
propriety
,
had induced the admiral to cause ample robes of
cotton to be furnished all the females, and Ozema's beautiful
form was now closely enveloped in one, and beneath its
folds she had hidden the jewel, which she fondly hugged to
her heart, as a gift of Luis. Not so did the young man,
himself, view the matter. He had merely meant to lend,
in a moment of extreme peril, that which the superstitious
feeling of the age seriously induced him to fancy might
prove a substantial safeguard. As Ozema was by no means
expert in managing the encumbrance of a dress to which
she was unaccustomed, even while native taste had taught
her to throw it around her person gracefully, the young
man had half unconsciously assisted in placing the cross
in its new position, when a violent roll of the vessel
compelled
him to sustain the girl by encircling her waist with
an arm. Partly yielding to the motion of the caravel,
which was constantly jerking even the mariners from their
feet, and probably as much seduced by the tenderness of
her own heart, Ozema did not rebuke this liberty, the first
our hero had ever offered, but stood, in confiding innocence,
upheld by the arm that, of all others, it was most grateful
to her feelings to believe destined to perform that office for
life. In another moment, her head rested on his bosom,
and her face was turned upward, with the eyes fastened on
the countenance of the young noble.
Thou art less alarmed at this terrific storm, Ozema,
than I could have hoped. Apprehension for thee has made
me more miserable than I could have thought possible, and
yet thou seemest not to be disturbed.
Ozema no unhappyno want Haytino want
Mattinao
no
want any thingOzema happy now. Got cross.
Sweet, guileless innocent, may'st thou never know any
other feelings!confide in thy cross.
Cross, Mercedes  Luis, Mercedes. Luis and Ozema
keep cross for ever.
It was perhaps fortunate for this high-prized happiness
of the girl, that the Nia now took a plunge that
unavoidably
compelled our hero to release his hold of her person,
or to drag her with him headlong towards the place where
Columbus stood, sheltering his weatherbeaten form from a
portion of the violence of the tempest. When he recovered
his feet, he perceived that the door of the cabin was closed,
and that Ozema was no longer to be seen.
Dost thou find our female friends terrified by this
appalling
scene, son Luis? Columbus quietly demanded, for,
though his own thoughts had been much occupied by the
situation of the caravel, he had noted all that had just
passed so near him. They are stout of heart, but even
an amazon might quail at this tempest.
They heed it not, Seor, for I think they understand it
not. The civilized man is so much their superior that both
men and women appear to have every confidence in our
means of safety. I have just given Ozema a cross, and
bade her place her greatest reliance on that.
Thou hast done well; it is now the surest protector
of us all. Keep the head of the caravel as near to the
wind as may be, Sancho, when it lulls, every inch off shore
being so much gained in the way of security.
The usual reply was made, and then the conversation
ceased; the raging of the elements, and the fearful manner
in which the Nia was compelled to struggle literally to
keep on the surface of the ocean, affording ample matter
for the reflections of all who witnessed the scene.
In this manner passed the night. When the day broke,
Vol. II.  13
it opened on a scene of wintry violence. The sun was not
visible that day, the dark vapour driving so low before the
tempest, as to lessen the apparent altitude of the vault of
heaven one-half, but the ocean was an undulating sheet of
foam. High land soon became visible nearly abeam of the
caravel, and all the elder mariners immediately pronounced
it to be the rock of Lisbon. As soon as this important fact
was ascertained, the admiral wore with the head of the
caravel in-shore, and laid his course for the mouth of the
Tagus. The distance was not great, some twenty miles
perhaps; but the necessity of facing the tempest, and of
making sail, on a wind, in such a storm, rendered the
situation of the caravel more critical than it had been in all
her previous trials. At that moment, the policy of the
Portuguese was forgotten, or held to be entirely a secondary
consideration, a port or shipwreck appearing to be the
alternative
.
Every inch of their weatherly position became of
importance to the navigators, and Vicente Yaez placed
himself near the helm to watch its play with the vigilance
of experience and authority. No sail but the lowest could
be carried, and these were reefed as closely as their
construction
would allow.
In this manner the tempest-tossed little barque struggled
forward, now sinking so low in the troughs, that land,
ocean, and all but the frowning billows, with the clouds above
their heads, were lost to view; and now rising, as it might
be, from the calm of a sombre cavern, into the roaring,
hissing, and turbulence of a tempest. These latter
moments
were the most critical. When the light hull reached
the summit of a wave, falling over to windward by the
yielding of the element beneath her, it seemed as if the next
billow must inevitably overwhelm her; and yet, so vigilant
was the eye of Vicente Yaez, and so ready the hand of
Sancho, that she ever escaped the calamity. To keep the
wash of the sea entirely out, was, however, impossible; and
it often swept athwart the deck, forward, like the sheets of
a cataract, that part of the vessel being completely
abandoned
by the crew.
All now depends on our canvass, said the admiral,
with a sigh; if that stand, we are safer than when
scudding
,
and I think God is with us. To me it seemeth as if
the wind was a little less violent than in the night.
Perhaps it is, Seor. I believe we gain on the place
you pointed out to me.
It is you rocky point.
That
weathered, and we are
safe. That not weathered, and we see our common grave.
The caravel behaveth nobly, and I will still hope.
An hour later, and the land was so near that human
beings were seen moving on it. There are moments when
life and death may be said to be equally presented to the
seaman's sight. On one side is destruction; on the other
security. As the vessel drew slowly in towards the shore,
not only was the thunder of the surf upon the rocks audible,
but the frightful manner in which the water was tossed
upward
in spray, gave additional horrors to the view. On
such occasions, it is no uncommon thing to see
jets d'eau
hundreds of feet in height, and the driving spray is often
carried to a great distance inland, before the wind. Lisbon
has the whole rake of the Atlantic before it, unbroken by
island or headland; and the entire coast of Portugal is one
of the most exposed of Europe. The south-west gales, in
particular, drive across twelve hundred leagues of ocean,
and the billows they send in upon its shores, are truly
appalling
.
Nor was the storm we are endeavouring to
describe
,
one of common occurrence. The season had been
tempestuous, seldom leaving the Atlantic any peace; and
the surges produced by one gale had not time to subside,
ere another drove up the water in a new direction, giving
rise to that irregularity of motion which most distresses a
vessel, and which is particularly hazardous to small ones.
She looks up better, Don Christopher! exclaimed Luis,
as they got within musket-shot of the desired point,
another
ten minutes, of as favourable a slant, and we do it!
Thou art right, son, answered the admiral calmly.
Were any calamity to throw us ashore on yonder rocks,
two planks of the Nia would not hold together five
minutes
.
Ease her  good Vicente Yaez  ease her, quite a
point, and let her go through the water. All depends on
the canvass, and we can spare that point. She moves,
Luis!Regard the land, and thou wilt now see our motion.
True, Seor, but the caravel is drawing frightfully
near the point!
Fear not; a bold course is often the safest. It is a deep
shore, and we need but little water.
No one now spoke. The caravel was dashing in towards
the point with appalling speed, and every minute brought
her perceptibly nearer to the cauldron of water that was
foaming around it. Without absolutely entering within this
vortex, the Nia flew along its edge, and, in five minutes
more, she had a direct course up the Tagus open before her.
The mainsail was now taken in, and the mariners stood
fearlessly on, certain of a haven, and security.
Thus, virtually, ended the greatest marine exploit the
world has ever witnessed. It is true that a run round to
Palos was subsequently made, but it was insignificant in
distance, and not fruitful in incidents. Columbus had
effected
his vast purpose, and his success was no longer a
secret. His reception in Portugal is known, as well as all
the leading occurrences that took place at Lisbon. He
anchored
in the Tagus on the 4th of March, and left it again
on the 13th. On the morning of the 14th, the Nia was
off Cape St. Vincent, when she hauled in to the eastward,
with a light air from the north. At sunrise on the 15th
she was again off the bar of Saltes, after an absence of
only two hundred and twenty-four days.
CHAPTER X.
One evening-tide, as with her crones she sate,
Making sweet solace of some scandall new,
A boisterous noise came thondring at the gate,
And soon a sturdie boy approach'd in view;
With gold far glitteraund were his vestments blue,
And pye-shaped hat, and of the silver sheen
An huge broad buckle glaunst in either shoe,
And round his necke an Indian kerchiefe clean,
And in his hand a switch;a jolly wight I ween.
Mickle.
Notwithstanding
the noble conceptions that lay at the
bottom of the voyage we have just related, the
perserverance
and self-devotion that were necessary to its
accomplishment
,
and the magnificence of the consequences that
were dependent on its success, it attracted very little
attention
,
amid the stirring incidents and active selfishness of the
age, until the result was known. Only a month before the
arrangement was made with Columbus, the memorable
edict of the two sovereigns, for the expulsion of the Jews,
had been signed; and this uprooting of so large a portion
of the Spanish nation was, of itself, an event likely to
draw off the eyes of the people from an enterprise deemed
as doubtful, and which was sustained by means so
insignificant
,
as that of the great navigator. The close of the
month of July had been set as the latest period for the
departure
of these persecuted religionists; and thus, at the
very time, almost on the very day, when Columbus sailed
from Palos, was the attention of the nation directed towards
what might be termed a great national calamity. The
departure was like the setting forth from Egypt, the
highways
being thronged with the moving masses, many of
which were wandering they knew not whither.
The king and queen had left Granada in May, and after
remaining two months in Castile, they passed into Aragon,
about the commencement of August, in which kingdom
they happened to be when the expedition sailed. Here
13 *
they remained throughout the rest of the season, settling
affairs of importance, and, quite probably, disposed to avoid
the spectacle of the misery their Jewish edict had inflicted,
Castile having contained much the greater portion of that
class of their subjects. In October, a visit was paid to the
turbulent Catalans; the court passing the entire winter in
Barcelona. Nor did momentous events cease to occupy
them while in this part of their territories. On the 7th of
December an attempt was made on the life of Ferdinand;
the assassin inflicting a severe, though not a fatal, wound,
by a blow on the neck. During the critical weeks in which
the life of the king was deemed to be in danger, Isabella
watched at his bed-side, with the untiring affection of a
devoted
wife; and her thoughts dwelt more on her affections
than on any worldly aggrandisement. Then followed the
investigations into the motives of the criminal; conspiracies
ever being distrusted in such cases, although history would
probably show that much the greater part of these wicked
attempts on the lives of sovereigns, are more the results of
individual fanaticism, than of any combined plans to destroy.
Isabella, whose gentle spirit grieved over the misery her
religious submission had induced her to inflict on the Jews,
was spared the additional sorrow of mourning for a
husband
,
taken away by means so violent. Ferdinand
gradually
recovered. All these occurrences, together with the
general cares of the state, had served to divide the thoughts
of even the queen from the voyage; while the politic
Ferdinand
,
in his mind, had long since set down the gold
expended
in the outfit as so much money lost.
The balmy spring of the south opened as usual, and the
fertile province of Catalonia had already become delightful
with the fresh verdure of the close of March. The king
had, for some weeks, resumed his usual occupations, and
Isabella, relieved from her conjugal fears, had again fallen
into the quiet current of her duties and her usual acts of
beneficence. Indisposed to the gorgeousness of her station
by the recent events, and ever pining for the indulgence of
the domestic affections, this estimable woman,
notwithstanding
the strong natural disposition she had always felt for
that sort of life, had lived more among her children and
confidants, of late, than had been even her wont. Her
earliest
friend, the Marchioness of Moya, as a matter of course,
was ever near her person, and Mercedes passed most of her
time either in the immediate presence of her royal mistress,
or in that of her children.
There had been a small reception one evening, near the
close of the month; and Isabella, glad to escape from such
scenes, had withdrawn to her private apartments, to indulge
in conversation in the circle she so much loved. It was
near the hour of midnight, the king being at work, as usual,
in an adjoining closet. There were present, besides the
members of the royal family and Doa Beatriz with her
lovely niece, the Archbishop of Granada, Luis de St.
Angel
,
and Alonzo de Quintanilla, the two last of whom had
been summoned by the prelate, to discuss some question of
clerical finance before their illustrious mistress. All
business
,
however, was over, and Isabella was rendering the
circle agreeable with the condescension of a princess, and
the gentle grace of a woman.
Are there fresh tidings from the unfortunate and
deluded
Hebrews, Lord Archbishop? demanded Isabella,
whose kind feelings ever led her to regret the severity
which religious dependence on her confessors had induced
her to sanction. Our prayers should surely attend them,
notwithstanding our policy and duty have demanded their
expulsion.
Seora, answered Fernando de Talavera, they are
doubtless serving Mammon among the Moors and Turks,
as they served him in Spain. Let not your Highness'
gracious
mind be disturbed on account of these descendants of
the enemies and crucifiers of Christ, who, if they suffer at
all, do but suffer justly, for the unutterable sin of their
forefathers
.
Let us rather inquire, my gracious mistress, of
the Seores St. Angel and Quintanilla here, what hath
become
of their favourite Colon, the Genoese; and when they
look for his return, dragging the Great Khan, a captive, by
the beard!
We know nought of him, holy prelate, put in de St.
Angel briskly, since his departure from the Canaries.
The Canaries! interrupted the queen, in a little
surprise
.
Hath aught been received, that cometh from that
quarter?
By report only, Seora. Letters have not reached
any in Spain, that I can learn; but there is a rumour from
Portugal, that the admiral touched at Gomera and the Grand
Canary, where it would seem he had his difficulties, and
whence he shortly after departed, holding a western course;
since which time no tidings have been received from either
of the caravels.
By which fact, Lord Archbishop, added Quintanilla,
we can perceive that trifles are not likely to turn the
adventurers
back.
I 'll warrant ye, Seores, that a Genoese adventurer
who holdeth their Highnesses' commission as an admiral,
will be in no unseemly haste to get rid of the dignity!
rejoined the prelate, laughing without much deference to
his mistress's concessions in Columbus's favour. One
does not see rank, authority, and emolument, carelessly
thrown aside, when they may be retained by keeping aloof
from the power whence they spring.
Thou art unjust to the Genoese, holy sir, and judgest
him harshly, observed the queen. Truly, I did not
know of these tidings from the Canaries, and rejoice to
hear that Colon hath got thus far in safety. Hath not the
past been esteemed a most boisterous winter among
mariners
,
Seor de St. Angel?
So much so, your Highness, that I have heard the
seamen
here, in Barcelona, swear that, within the memory
of man, there hath not been another like it. Should ill
luck wait upon Colon, I trust this circumstance may be
remembered
as his excuse; though I doubt if he be very near
any of our tempests and storms.
Not he! exclaimed the bishop, triumphantly. It
will be seen that he hath been safely harboured in some
river of Africa; and we shall have some question yet to
settle about him with Dom Joao of Portugal.
Here is the king to give us his opinion, interposed
Isabella. It is long since I have heard him mention the
name of Colon. Have you entirely forgotten our Genoese
admiral, Don Fernando?
Before I am questioned on subjects so remote,
returned
the king, smiling, let me inquire into matters nearer
home. How long is it that your Highness holdeth court,
and giveth receptions, past the hour of midnight?
Call you this a court, Seor? Here are but our own
dear children, Beatriz and her niece, with the good
archbishop
,
and those two faithful servants of your own.
True; but you overlook the ante-chambers, and those
who await your pleasure without.
None can await without at this unusual hour; surely
you jest, my lord.
Then your own page, Diego de Ballesteros, hath
reported
falsely. Unwilling to disturb your privacy, at this
unreasonable hour, he hath come to me, saying that one
of strange conduct and guise is in the palace, insisting on
an interview with the queen, let it be late or early. The
accounts of this man's deportment are so singular, that I
have ordered him to be admitted, and have come myself to
witness the interview. The page telleth me that he swears
all hours are alike, and that night and day are equally
made for our uses.
Dearest Don Fernando, there may be treason in this!
Fear not, Isabella; assassins are not so bold, and
the trusty rapiers of these gentlemen will prove sufficient
for our protectionHist! there are footsteps, and we must
appear calm, even though we apprehend a tumult.
The door opened, and Sancho Mundo stood in the royal
presence. The air and appearance of so singular a being
excited both astonishment and amusement, and every eye
was fastened on him in wonder; and this so much the more,
because he had decked his person with sundry ornaments
from the imaginary Indies, among which were one or two
bands of gold. Mercedes alone detected his profession by
his air and attire, and she rose involuntarily, clasping her
hands with energy, and suffering a slight exclamation to
escape her. The queen perceived this little pantomime,
and it at once gave a right direction to her own thoughts.
I am Isabella, the queen, she said, rising, without any
further suspicion of danger; and thou art a messenger
from Colon, the Genoese?
Sancho, who had found great difficulty in gaining
admittance
,
now that his end was obtained, took matters with his
native coolness. His first act was to fall on his knees, as
he had been particularly enjoined by Columbus to do. He
had caught the habit of using the weed of Hayti and Cuba,
from the natives, and was, in fact, the first seaman who
ever chewed tobacco. The practice had already got to be
confirmed with him, and before he answered, or as soon as
he had taken this, for him, novel position, he saw fit to fill
a corner of his mouth with the attractive plant. Then,
giving his wardrobe a shake, for all the decent clothes he
owned were on his person, he disposed himself to make a
suitable reply.
SeoraDoayour Highness, he answered, any
one might have seen that at a glance. I am Sancho Mundo,
of the Ship-Yard Gate; one of your Highness' Excellency's
most faithful subjects and mariners, being a native and
resident
of Moguer.
Thou comest from Colon, I say?
Seora, I do; many thanks to your Royal Grace for
the information. Don Christopher hath sent me across the
country from Lisbon, seeing that the wily Portuguese would
be less likely to distrust a simple mariner, like myself, than
one of your every-day, booted couriers. 'T is a weary
road, and there is not a mule between the stables of Lisbon
and the palace of Barcelona, fit for a Christian to bestride.
Then, hast thou letters? One like thee can scarcely
bear aught else.
Therein, your Grace's Highness, Doa Reya, is
mistaken; though I am far from bearing half the number
of doblas I had at starting. Mass! the innkeepers took me
for a grandee, by the manner in which they charged!
Give the man gold, good Alonzohe is one that liketh
his reward ere he will speak.
Sancho coolly counted the pieces that were put into his
hand, and, finding them greatly to exceed his hopes, he had
no longer any motive for prevarication.
Speak fellow! cried the king. Thou triflest, where
thou owest thy duty and obedience.
The sharp, quick voice of Ferdinand had much more
effect
on the ear of Sancho, than the gentler tones of Isabella,
notwithstanding even his rude nature had been impressed
with the matronly beauty and grace of the latter.
If your Highness would condescend to let me know
what you wish to hear, I will speak in all gladness.
Where is Colon? demanded the queen.
At Lisbon, lately, Seora, though I think now at Palos
de Moguer, or in that neighbourhood.
Whither hath he been?
To Cipango, and the territories of the Great Khan;
forty days' sail from Gomera, and a country of marvellous
beauty and excellence!
Thou canst notdarest not trifle with me! Can we
put credit in thy words?
If your Highness only knew Sancho Mundo, you
would not feel this doubt. I tell you, Seora, and all these
noble cavaliers and dames, that Don Christopher Colon
hath discovered the other side of the earth, which we now
know to be round, by having circled it; and that he hath
found out that the north star journeyeth about in the
heavens, like a gossip spreading her news; and that he
hath taken possession of islands as large as Spain, in which
gold groweth, and where the holy church may employ itself
in making christians to the end of time.
The letterSanchogive me the letter. Colon would
scarce send thee as a verbal expositor.
The fellow now undid sundry coverings of cloth and
paper, until he reached the missive of Columbus, when,
without rising from his knees, he held it out towards the
queen, giving her the trouble to move forward several paces
to receive it. So unexpected and astounding were the
tidings, and so novel the whole scene, that no one interfered,
leaving Isabella to be the sole actor, as she was, virtually, the
sole speaker. Sancho having thus successfully acquitted
himself of a task that had been expressly confided to him
on account of his character and appearance, which, it was
thought, would prove his security from arrest and plunder,
settled down quietly on his heels, for he had been directed
not to rise until ordered; and drawing forth the gold he had
received, he began coolly to count it anew. So absorbing
was the attention all gave to the queen, that no one heeded
the mariner or his movements. Isabella opened the letter,
which her looks devoured, as they followed line after line.
As was usual with Columbus, the missive was long, and it
required many minutes to read it. All this time not an
individual
moved, every eye being fastened on the speaking
countenance of the queen. There, were seen the
heightening
flush of pleasure and surprise, the glow of delight and
wonder, and the look of holy rapture. When the letter
was ended, Isabella turned her eyes upward to heaven,
clasped her hands with energy, and exclaimed
Not unto us, O Lord, but to Thee, be all the honour
of this wonderful discovery, all the benefits of this great
proof of thy goodness and power!
Thus saying, she sunk into a seat and dissolved in tears.
Ferdinand uttered a slight ejaculation at the words of his
royal consort; and then he gently took the letter from her
unresisting hand, and read it with great deliberation and
care. It was not often that the wary King of Aragon was
as much affected, in appearance at least, as on this
occasion
.
The expression of his face, at first, was that of
wonder
;
eagerness, not to say avidity, followed; and when he
had finished reading, his grave countenance was
unequivocally
illuminated by exultation and joy.
Good Luis de St. Angel! he cried, and thou, honest
Alonzo de Quintanilla, these must be grateful tidings to
you both. Even thou, holy prelate, wilt rejoice that the
church is like to have acquisitions so gloriousalbeit, no
favourer of the Genoese of old. Far more than all our
expectations are realized, for Colon hath truly discovered
the Indies; increasing our dominions, and otherwise
advancing
our authority in a most unheard-of manner.
It was unusual to see Don Ferdinand so excited, and he
seemed conscious himself, that he was making an
extraordinary
exhibition, for he immediately advanced to the queen,
and taking her hand, he led her towards his own cabinet.
In passing out of the saloon, he indicated to the three
nobles that they might follow to the council. The king
made this sudden movement more from habitual wariness,
than any settled object, his mind being disturbed in a way
to which he was unaccustomed, while caution formed a part
of his religion, as well as of his policy. It is not surprising,
therefore, that when he and the party he invited to follow
him had left the room, there remained only the princesses,
the Marchioness of Moya, and Mercedes. No sooner had
the king and queen disappeared, than the royal children
retired to their own apartments, leaving our heroine, her
guardian, and Sancho, the sole occupants of the saloon.
The latter still remained on his knees, scarce heeding what
had passed, so intensely was he occupied with his own
situation
,
and his own particular sources of satisfaction.
Thou canst rise, friend, observed Doa Beatriz
their Highnesses are no longer present.
At this intelligence Sancho quitted his humble posture,
brushed his knees with some care, and looked about him
with the composure that he was wont to exhibit in studying
the heavens at sea.
Thou wert of Colon's company, friend, by the manner
in which thou hast spoken, and the circumstance that the
admiral hath employed thee as his courier?
You may well believe that, Seora, your Excellency,
for most of my time was passed at the helm, which was
within three fathoms of the very spot that Don Christopher
and the Seor de Muos loved so well, that they never
quitted
it, except to sleep, and not always then.
Hadst thou a Seor de Muos of thy party? resumed
the Marchioness, making a sign to her ward to control her
feelings.
That had we Seora, and a Seor Gutierrez, and a
certain Don Somebody Else, and they all three did not
occupy
more room than one common man. Prithee,
honourable
and agreeable Seora, is there one Doa Beatriz de
Cabrera, the Marchioness of Moya, a lady of the illustrious
house of Bobadilla, anywhere about the court of our
gracious
queen?
I am she, and thou hast a message for me, from this
very Seor de Muos, of whom thou hast spoken.
I no longer wonder that there are great lords with their
beautiful ladies, and poor sailors with wives, that no one
envies! Scarce can I open my mouth, but it is known
what I wish to say, which is knowledge to make one party
great, and the other party little! Mass!Don Christopher,
himself, will need all his wit, if he journeyeth as far as
Barcelona
!
Tell us of this Pedro de Muos; for thy message is to
me.
Vol. II.  14
Then, Seora, I will tell you of your own brave
nephew
,
the Conde de Llera, who goeth by two other names
in the caravel, one of which is supposed to be a sham, while
the other is still the greatest deception of the two.
Is it then known who my nephew really is? Are
many persons acquainted with his secret?
Certainly, Seora; it is known, firstly, to himself;
secondly
,
to Don Christopher; thirdly, to me; fourthly, to
Master Alonzo Pinzon, if he be still in the flesh, as most
probably he is not. Then it is known to your ladyship;
and this beautiful Seorita must have some suspicions of
the matter.
EnoughI see the secret is not public; though, how
one of thy class came to be of it, I cannot explain. Tell
me of my nephew:did he, too, write? if so, let me, at
once, peruse his letter.
Seora, my departure took Don Luis by surprise, and
he had no time to write. The admiral had given the princes
and princesses, that we brought from Espaola, in charge
to the Conde, and he had too much to do to be scribbling
letters, else would he have written sheets to an aunt as
respectable as yourself.
Princes and princesses!What mean you, friend, by
such high-sounding terms?
Only that we have brought several of these great
personages
to Spain, to pay their respects to their Highnesses.
We deal with none of the common fry, Seora, but with
the loftiest princes, and the most beautiful princesses of the
east.
And dost thou really mean that persons of this high
rank have returned with the admiral?
Out of all question, lady, and one of a beauty so rare,
that the fairest dames of Castile need look to it, if they
wish not to be outdone. She, in particular, is Don Luis's
friend and favourite.
Of whom speakest thou? demanded Doa Beatriz, in
the lofty manner in which she was wont to insist on being
answered directly. What is the name of this princess,
and whence doth she come?
Her name, your excellency, is Doa Ozema de Hayti,
of a part of which country her brother, Don Mattinao, is
cacique or king, Seora Ozema being the heiress, or next
of kin. Don Luis and your humble servant paid that court
a visit
Thy tale is most improbable, fellow  art thou one
whom Don Luis would be likely to select as a companion
on such an occasion?
Look at it as you will, Seora, it is as true as that this
is the court of Don Ferdinand and Doa Isabella. You
must know, illustrious Marchioness, that the young count
is a little given to roving about among us sailors, and on
one occasion, a certain Sancho Mundo, of Moguer,
happened
to be of the same voyage; and thus we became
known to each other. I kept the noble's secret, and he got
to be Sancho's friend. When Don Luis went to pay a visit
to Don Mattinao, the cacique, which word meaneth `your
Highness,' in the eastern tongue, Sancho must go with him,
and Sancho went. When King Caonabo came down from
the mountains to carry off the princess Doa Ozema, for a
wife, and the princess was unwilling to go, why there
remained nothing to be done, but for the Conde de Llera
and his friend Sancho of the Ship-Yard Gate, to fight the
whole army in her defence, which we did, gaining as great
a victory as Don Fernando, our sovereign master, ever
gained over the Moors.
Carrying off the princess yourselves, as would seem!
Friend Sancho, of the Ship-Yard Gate, if that be thy
appellation
,
this tale of thine is ingenious, but it lacketh
probability
.
Were I to deal justly by thee, honest Sancho, it
would be to order thee the stripes thou meritest so well, as
a reward for this trifling.
The man speaketh as he hath been taught, observed
Mercedes, in a low, unsteady voice; I fear, Seora, there
is too much truth in his tale!
You need fear nothing, beautiful Seorita, put in
Sancho
,
altogether unmoved at the menace implied by the words
of the Marchioness, since the battle hath been fought, the
victory hath been gained, and both the heroes escaped
uninjured
.
This illustrious Seora, to whom I can forgive
any thing, as the aunt of the best friend I have on earth
any thing
spoken
I meanwill remember that the Haytians
known nothing of arquebuses, by means of which we
defeated
Caonabo, and also, that many is the column of Moors
that Don Luis hath broken singly, and by means of his
own good lance.
Ay, fellow, answered Doa Beatriz, but that hath
been in the saddle, behind plaits of steel, and with a
weapon
that hath overturned even Alonzo de Ojedo!
Hast thou truly brought away with thee the princess
thou hast named? asked Mercedes earnestly.
I swear to it, Seora and Seorita, illustrious ladies
both, by the holy mass, and all the saints in the calendar!
A princess, moreover, surpassing in beauty the daughters
of our own blessed queen, if the fair ladies who passed out
of this room, even now, are they, as I suspect.
Out upon thee, knave! cried the indignant Beatriz
I will no more of this, and marvel that my nephew should
have employed one of so loose a tongue, on any of his
errands. Go to, and learn discretion ere the morning, or
the favour of even thy admiral will not save thy bones.
Mercedes, we will seek our restthe hour is late.
Sancho was immediately left alone, and in a minute a
page appeared to show him to the place where he was to
pass the night. The old mariner had grumbled a little to
himself, concerning the spirit of Don Luis's aunt, counted
anew his gold, and was about to take possession of his
pallet, when the same page re-appeared to summon him to
another interview. Sancho, who knew little distinction
between night and day, made no objections, especially when
he was told that his presence was required by the lovely
Seorita, whose gentle, tremulous voice had so much
interested
him, in the late interview. Mercedes received her
rude guest, in a small saloon of her own, after having
parted from her guardian for the night. As he entered,
her face was flushed, her eye bright, and her whole
demeanour, to one more expert in detecting female emotions,
would have betrayed intense anxiety.
Thou hast had a long and weary journey, Sancho,
said our heroine, when alone with the seaman, and, I
pray thee accept this gold, as a small proof of the
interest
with which I have heard the great tidings of which thou
hast been the bearer.
Seorita! exclaimed Sancho, affecting indifference to
the doblas that fell into his handI hope you do not
think me mercenary? the honour of being the messenger,
and of being admitted to converse with such illustrious
ladies, more than pays me for any thing I could do.
Still, thou may'st need money for thy wants, and wilt
not refuse that which a lady offereth.
On that ground, I would accept it, Doa Seorita, even
were it twice as much.
So saying, Sancho placed the money, with a suitable
resignation
,
by the side of that which he had previously
received by order of the queen. Mercedes now found
herself
in the situation that they who task their powers too
much, are often fated to endure; in other words, now she
had at command the means of satisfying her own doubts,
she hesitated about using them.
Sancho, Mercedes at length commenced, thou hast
been with the Seor Colon, throughout this great and
extraordinary
voyage, and must know much that it will be
curious
for us, who have lived quietly in Spain, to hear. Is all
thou hast said about the princes and princesses true?
As true, Seorita, as such things need be for a history.
Mass!Any one who hath been in a battle, or seen any
other great adventure, and then cometh to hear it read of,
afterwards, will soon learn to understand the difference
between the thing itself, and the history that may be given
of it. Now, I was
Never mind thy other adventures, good Sancho; tell
me only of this. Are there really a Prince Mattinao, and a
Princess Ozema his sister, and have both accompanied the
admiral to Spain?
I said not that, beautiful Seorita, for Don Mattinao
remained behind to rule his people. It is only his
handsome
sister, who hath followed Don Christopher and Don
Luis to Palos.
Followed!Do the admiral and the Conde de Llera
possess such influence over royal ladies, as to induce them
to abandon their native country and to
follow
them to a
foreign land!
Ay, Seorita, that might seem out of rule in Castile, or
Portugal, or even in France. But Hayti is not yet a
Christian
country, and a princess there may not be more than
14 *
a noble lady in Castile, and, in the way of wardrobe,
perhaps
not even as much. Still, a princess is a princess,
and a handsome princess is a handsome princess. Doa
Ozema, here, is a wonderful creature, and beginneth already
to prattle your pure Castilian, an' she had been brought up
at Toledo, or Burgos. But Don Luis is a most
encouraging
master, and no doubt made great head-way, during the
time he was living in her palace, as it might be alone with
her, before that incarnate devil Don Caonabo came down
with his followers to seize the lady.
Is this lady a Christian princess, Sancho?
Heaven bless your own pure soul, Doa Seorita, she
can boast of but little in that way; still, she hath made
something of a beginning, as I see she now weareth a cross
one small in size, it is true, but precious in material as,
indeed, it ought to be, seeing that it is a present from one
as noble and rich as the Count of Llera.
A cross, say'st thou, Sancho! interrupted Mercedes,
almost gasping for breath, yet so far subduing her feelings
as to prevent the old seaman from detecting them; hath
Don Luis succeeded in inducing her to accept of a cross?
That hath he, Seoritaone of precious stones, that he
once wore at his own neck.
Know'st thou the stones?  was it of turquoise,
embellished
with the finest gold?
For the gold I can answer, lady, though my learning
hath never reached as high as the precious stones. The
heavens of Hayti, however, are not bluer than the stones of
that cross. Doa Ozema calls it `Mercedes,' by which I
understand that she looketh for the mercies of the crucifixion
to help her benighted soul.
Is this cross, then, held so common, that it hath gotten
to be the subject of discourse even for men of thy class?
Hearkee, Seorita; a man like me is more valued, on
board a caravel, in a tossing sea, than he is like to be here,
in Barcelona, on solid ground. We went to Cipango to
set up crosses, and to make Christians; so that all hath
been in character. As for the lady Ozema, she taketh
more notice of me than of another, as I was in the battle
that rescued her from Caonabo, and so she showed me the
cross the day we anchored in the Tagus, or just before the
admiral ordered me to bring his letter to her Highness.
Then it was that she kissed the cross, and held it to her
heart, and said it was `Mercedes.'
This is most strange, Sancho! Hath this princess
attendants
,
befitting her rank and dignity?
You forget, Seorita, that the Nia is but a small craft,
as her name signifieth, and there would be no room for a
large train of lords and ladies. Don Christopher and Don
Luis are honourable enough to attend on any princess; and
for the rest, the Doa Ozema must wait until our gracious
queen can command her a retinue befitting her birth.
Besides
,
my lady, these Haytian dames are simpler than our
Spanish nobles, half of them thinking clothes of no great
use, in that mild climate.
Mercedes looked offended, and incredulous; but her
curiosity and interest were too active, to permit her to send
the man away without further question.
And Don Luis de Bobadilla was ever with the admiral?
she said, ever ready to support him, and foremost in all
hazards?
Seorita, you describe the count as faithfully as if you
had been present from first to last. Had you but seen him
dealing out his blows upon Caonabo's followers, and the
manner in which he kept them all at bay, with the Doa
Ozema near him, behind the rocks, it would have drawn
tears of admiration from your own lovely eyes.
The Doa Ozema near him  behind rocks  and
assailants
held at bay!
Si, Seora; you repeat it all like a book. It was much
as you say, though the Lady Ozema did not content herself
with being behind the rocks, for, when the arrows came
thickest, she rushed before the count, compelling the enemy
to withhold, lest they should slay the very prize they were
battling for; thereby saving the life of her knight.
Saving his life!  the life of Luis  of Don Luis de
Bobadilla  an Indian princess!
It is just as you say, and a most noble girl she is,
asking
pardon for speaking so light of one of her high rank.
Time and again, since that day, hath the young count told
me, that the arrows came in such clouds, that his honour
might have been tarnished by a retreat, or his life been lost,
but for the timely resolution of the Doa Ozema. She is a
rare creature, Seorita, and you will love her as a sister,
when you come to see and know her.
Sancho, said our heroine, blushing like the dawn,
thou said'st that the Conde de Llera bade thee speak of
him to his aunt; did he mention no one else?
No one, Seorita.
Art certain, Sancho? Bethink thee welldid he
mention
no other name to thee?
Not that I can swear. It is true, that either he, or old
Diego, the helmsman, spoke of one Clara that keepeth an
hosteria,
here in Barcelona, as a place famous for its wine;
but I think it more likely to have been Diego than the
count, as one thinketh much of these matters, and the other
would not be apt to know aught of Clara.
Thou canst retire, Sancho, said Mercedes, in a faint
voice. We will say more to thee in the morning.
Sancho was not sorry to be dismissed, and he gladly
returned
to his pallet, little dreaming of the mischief he had
done by the mixture of truth and exaggeration that he had
been recounting.
CHAPTER XI.
Mac-Homer, too, in prose or song,
By the state-papers of Buffon,
To deep researches led;
A Gallo-Celtic scheme may botch,
To prove the Ourang race were Scotch,
Who from the Highlands fled.
Lord John Townshend.
The
intelligence of the return of Columbus, and of the
important discoveries he had made, spread through Europe
like wild-fire. It soon got to be, in the general estimation,
the great event of the age. For several years afterwards,
or until the discovery of the Pacific by Balboa, it was
believed
that the Indies had been reached by the western
passage; and of course the problem of the earth's spherical
shape was held to be solved by actual experiment. The
transactions of the voyage, the wonders seen, the fertility
of the soil of the east, the softness of its climate, its
treasures
in gold, spices, and pearls, and the curious things that
the admiral had brought as proofs of his success, were all
the themes of the hour. Men never wearied in discussing
the subjects. For many centuries had the Spaniards been
endeavouring to expel the Moors from the Peninsula; but,
as that much-desired event had been the result of time and
a protracted struggle, even its complete success seemed
tame and insignificant compared with the sudden brilliancy
that shone around the western discoveries. In a word, the
pious rejoiced in the hope of spreading the gospel; the
avaricious
feasted their imaginations on untold hoards of gold;
the politic calculated the increase of the power of Spain;
the scientific exulted in the triumph of mind over prejudice
and ignorance, while they hoped for still greater accessions
of knowledge; and the enemies of Spain wondered, and
deferred, even while they envied.
The first few days that succeeded the arrival of
Columbus's
courier, were days of delight and curiosity. Answers
were sent soliciting his early presence, high honours were
proffered to him, and his name filled all mouths, as his
glory was in the heart of every true Spaniard. Orders
were issued to make the necessary outfits for a new voyage,
and little was talked of but the discovery and its
consequences
.
In this manner passed a month, when the
admiral arrived at Barcelona, attended by most of the
Indians he had brought with him from the islands. His
honours were of the noblest kind, the sovereigns receiving
him on a throne placed in a public hall, rising at his
approach
,
and insisting on his being seated himself, a
distinction
of the highest nature, and usually granted only to
princes of royal blood. Here the admiral related the
history
of his voyage, exhibited the curiosities he had brought
with him, and dwelt on his hopes of future benefits. When
the tale was told, all present knelt, and
Te Deum
was
chanted by the usual choir of the court; even Ferdinand's
stern nature dissolving into tears of grateful joy, at this
unlooked-for
and magnificent behest of heaven.
For a long time, Columbus was the mark of every eye;
nor did his honours and consideration cease, until he left
Spain, in command of the second expedition to the east, as
the voyage was then termed.
A few days previously to the arrival of the admiral at
court, Don Luis de Bobadilla suddenly appeared in
Barcelona
.
On ordinary occasions, the movements of one of
the rank and peculiarities of the young grandee would have
afforded a topic for the courtiers, that would not soon have
been exhausted, but the all-engrossing theme of the great
voyage afforded him a screen. His presence, however,
could not escape notice; and it was whispered, with the
usual smiles and shrugs, that he had entered the port in a
caravel, coming from the Levant; and it was one of the
received pleasantries of the hour to say, in an under tone,
that the young Conde de Llera had also made the
eastern
voyage. All this gave our hero little concern, and he was
soon pursuing his ordinary life, when near the persons of
the sovereigns. The day that Columbus was received in
state, he was present in the hall, attired in the richest
vestments
,
and no noble of Spain did more credit to his lineage,
or his condition, than Don Luis, by his mien and carriage.
It was remarked that Isabella smiled on him, during the
pageant; but the head of more than one wary observer
was shaken, as its owner remarked how grave the queen's
favourite appeared, for an occasion so joyous; a fact that
was attributed to the unworthy pursuits of her truant
nephew. No one, that day, gazed at Luis with more
delight
than Sancho, who lingered at Barcelona, to share in
the honours of his chief, and who, in virtue of his services,
was permitted to take his place among the courtiers
themselves
.
Not a little admiration was excited by the manner
in which he used the novel weed, called tobacco; and some
fifteen or twenty of his neighbours were nauseated by their
efforts to emulate his indulgence and satisfaction. One of
his exploits was of a character so unusual, and so well
illustrates
the feeling of the hour, that it may be well to
record
if in detail.
The reception was over, and Sancho was quitting the
hall with the rest of the crowd, when he was accosted by
a man apparently of forty, well attired, and of agreeable
manner, who desired the honour of his presence at a slight
entertainment, of which several had been prepared for the
admiral and his friends. Sancho, nothing loth, the delights
of distinction being yet so novel, cheerfully complied, and
he was quickly led to a room of the palace, where he found
a party of some twenty young nobles assembled to do him
honour; for happy was he that day in Barcelona who could
get even one of the meanest of Columbus's followers to
accept
of his homage. No sooner did the two enter the room,
than the young Castilian lords crowded around them,
covering
Sancho with protestations of admiration, and addressing
eager questions, a dozen at a time, to his companion, whom
they styled Seor Pedro  Seor Martir, and
occasionally
Seor Pedro Martir. It is scarcely necessary
to add, that this person was the historian who has become
known to us of these latter days as Peter Martyr, an
Italian, to whose care and instruction Isabella had entrusted
most of the young nobles of the court. The present
interview
had been got up to indulge the natural curiosity of the
youthful lords, and Sancho had been chosen for the
occasion
,
on the principle that when the best is denied us,
we must be content to accept information of an inferior
quality.
Congratulate me, Seores, cried Peter Martyr, as soon
as he could find an opportunity to speak, since my
success
surpasseth our own hopes. As for the Liguirian,
himself
,
and all of high condition about him, they are in the
hands of the most illustrious of Spain, for this day; but
here is a most worthy pilot, no doubt the second in
authority
on board one of the caravels, who consenteth to do us
honour, and to partake of our homely cheer. I drew him
from a crowd of applicants, and have not yet had an
opportunity
to enquire his name, which he is about to give us of
his own accord.
Sancho never wanted for self-possession, and had far too
much mother-wit to be either clownish or offensively
vulgar
,
though the reader is not now to be told that he was
neither qualified to be an academician, nor had the most
profound notions of natural philosophy. He assumed an
air of suitable dignity, therefore, and, somewhat practised
in his new vocation by the thousand interrogatories he had
answered in the last month, he disposed himself to do credit
to the information of a man who had visited the Indies.
I am called Sancho Mundo, Seores, at your service,
sometimes Sancho of the Ship-Yard-Gate, though I would
prefer now to be called Sancho of the Indies, unless, indeed,
it should suit his Excellency Don Christopher to take that
appellationhis claim being somewhat better than mine.
Here several protested that his claims were of the highest
order; and then followed sundry introductions to Sancho
of the Ship-Yard-Gate, of several young men of the first
families in Castile; for, though the Spaniards have not the
same mania for this species of politeness as the Americans,
the occasion was one in which native feeling got the
ascendency of conventional reserve. After this ceremony,
and the Mendozas, Guzmans, Cerdas, and Toledos, present,
felt honoured in knowing this humble seaman, the whole
party repaired to the banqueting-room, where a table was
spread that did credit to the cooks of Barcelona. During
the repast, although the curiosity of the young men made
some inroads on their breeding in this particular, no
question
could induce Sancho to break in upon the duty of the
moment, for which he entertained a sort of religious
veneration
.
Once, when pushed a little more closely than
common
,
he laid down his knife and fork, and made the
following
solemn reply:
Seores, he said, I look upon food as a gift from
God to man, and hold it to be irreverent to converse much,
when the bounties of the table invite us to do homage to
this great dispenser. Don Christopher is of this way of
thinking, I know, and all his followers imitate their beloved
and venerated chief. As soon as I am ready to converse,
Seores Don Hidalgos, you shall be told of it, and then
God help the ignorant and silly!
After this admonition, there remained nothing to be said
until Sancho's appetite was satisfied, when he drew a little
back from the table, and announced his readiness to proceed.
I profess to very little learning, Seor Pedro Martir,
he said; but what I have seen I have seen, and that which
is known, is as well known by a mariner, as by a doctor
of Salamanca. Ask your questions, then, o' heaven's sake,
and expect such answers as a poor but honest man can
give.
The learned Peter Martyr was fain to make the best of
his subject; for at that moment, any information that came
from what might be termed first hands, was greedily
received
;
he proceeded, therefore, to his inquiries as simply
and as directly as he had been invited to do so.
Well, Seor, commenced the man of learning, we
are willing to obtain knowledge on any terms. Prithee,
tell us, at once, which of all the wonderful things that you
witnessed on this voyage, hath made the deepest impression
on your mind, and striketh you as the most remarkable!
I know nothing to compare with the whiffling of the
north star, said Sancho, promptly. That star hath
always been esteemed among us seamen, as being
immovable
as the cathedral of Seville; but, in this voyage, it
hath been seen to change its place, with the inconstancy of
the winds.
That is indeed miraculous! exclaimed Peter Martyr,
who scarcely knew how to take the intelligence; perhaps
there is some mistake, Master Sancho, and you are not
accustomed
to sidereal investigations.
Ask Don Christopher; when the phernomerthon, as
the admiral called it, was first observed, we talked the
matter
over together, and came to the conclusion, that nothing
in this world was as permanent as it seemed to be. Depend
on it, Seor Don Pedro, the north star flits about like a
weathercock.
I shall inquire into this of the illustrious admiral; but,
next to this star, Master Sancho, what deem you most
worthy
of observation? I speak now of ordinary things,
leaving
science to future discussion.
This was too grave a question to be lightly answered,
and while Sancho was cogitating the matter, the door opened
and Luis de Bobadilla entered the room, in a blaze of manly
grace and rich attire. A dozen voices uttered his name,
and Peter Martyr rose to receive him, with a manner in
which kindness of feeling was blended with reproof.
I asked this honour, Seor Conde, he said, though
you have now been beyond my counsel and control some
Vol. II.  15
time, for it appeared to me that one fond of voyages as
yourself, might find a useful lesson, as well as enjoy a high
satisfaction, in listening to the wonders of an expedition as
glorious as this of Colon's. This worthy seaman, a pilot
no doubt much confided in by the admiral, hath consented
to share in our poor hospitalities on this memorable day,
and is about to give us many interesting facts and incidents
of the great adventure. Master Sancho Mundo, this is Don
Luis de Bobadilla, Conde de Llera, a grandee of high
lineage
,
and one that is not unknown to the seas, having often
traversed them in his own person.
It is quite unnecessary to tell me that, Seor Pedro,
answered Sancho, returning Luis' gay and graceful
salutation
,
with profound but awkward respect, since I see it at
a glance. His excellency hath been in the east as well as
Don Christopher and myself, though we went different
ways, and neither party went quite as far as Cathay. I
am honoured in your acquaintance, Don Luis, and shall
just say that the noble admiral will bring navigation more
in fashion than it hath been of late years. If you travel
in the neighbourhood of Moguer, I beg you will not pass
the door of Sancho Mundo without stopping to inquire if
he be within.
That I most cheerfully promise, worthy master, said
Luis laughing, and taking a seat, even though it lead me
to the Ship-Yard Gate. And now, Seor Pedro, let me not
interrupt the discourse, which I discovered was most
interesting
as I entered.
I have been thinking of this matter, Seores, resumed
Sancho, gravely, and the fact that appears most curious
to me, next to the whiffling of the North Star, is the
circumstance
that there are no doblas in Cipango. Gold is
not wanting, and it seemeth to me passing singular that a
people should possess gold, and not bethink them of the
convenience of striking doblas, or some similar coin.
Peter Martyr and his young pupils laughed at this sally,
and then the subject was pushed in another form.
Passing by this question, which belongeth rather to the
policy of States, than to natural phenomena, continued
Peter Martyr, what most struck you as remarkable, in
the way of human nature.
In that particular, Seor, I think the island of the
women
may be set down as the most extraordinary of all the
phernomerthons we fell in with. I have known women
shut themselves up in convents; and men too; but never
did I hear, before this voyage, of either shutting themselves
up in islands!
And is this true? inquired a dozen voicesdid you
really meet with such an island, Seor?
I believe we saw it at a distance, Seores, and I hold
it to be lucky that we went no nearer, for I find the gossips
of Moguer troublesome enough, without meeting a whole
island of them. Then there is the bread that grows like a
rootwhat think
you
of that, Seor Don Luis?Is it not
a most curious dish to taste of?
Nay, Master Sancho, that is a question of your own
putting, and it must be one of your own answering. What
know I of the wonders of Cipango, since Candia lieth in
an opposite course. Answer these matters for thyself,
friend.
True, illustrious Conde, and I humbly crave your
pardon
.
It is, indeed, the duty of him that seeth to relate, as
it is the duty of him that seeth not to believe. I hope all
here will perform their several duties.
Do these Indians eat flesh as remarkable as their
bread? inquired a Cerda.
That do they, noble sir, seeing that they eat each other.
Neither I nor Don Christopher, was invited to any of their
feasts of this sort; for, I suppose, they were well convinced
we would not go; but we had much information touching
them, and by the nearest calculation I could make, the
consumption
of men in the island of Bohio, must be about
equal to that of beeves in Spain.
The speaker was interrupted by twenty exclamations of
disgust, and Peter Martyr shook his head like one who
distrusted
the truth of the account. Still, as he had not
expected
any very profound philosophy, or deep learning in
one of Sancho's character, he pursued the conversation.
Know you any thing of the rare birds the admiral
exhibited to their Highnesses to-day? he asked.
Seor, I am well acquainted with several, more
particularly
with the parrots. They are sensible birds, and I
doubt not might answer some of the questions that are put
to me by many here, in Barcelona, to their perfect
satisfaction
.
Thou art a wag, I see, Seor Sancho, and lovest thy
joke, answered the man of learning, with a smile. Give
way to thy fancy, and if thou canst not improve us with
thy science, at least amuse us with thy conceits.
San Pedro knows that I would do any thing to oblige
you, Seores; but I was born with such a love of truth in
my heart, that I know not how to embellish. What I see I
believe, and having been in the Indies, I cannot shut my
eyes to their wonders. There was the sea of weeds, which
was no every-day miracle, since I make no doubt that the
devils piled all these plants on the water to prevent us from
carrying the cross to the poor heathens who dwell on the
other side of them. We got through that sea more by our
prayers, than by means of the winds.
The young men looked at Peter Martyr, to ascertain how
he received this theory, and Peter Martyr, if tinctured with
the superstition of the age, was not disposed to swallow all
that it pleased Sancho to assert, even though the latter had
made a voyage to the Indies.
Since you manifest so much curiosity, Seores, on the
subject of Colon, now admiral of the Ocean Sea, by their
Highnesses' honourable appointment, I will, in a measure,
relieve your minds on the subject, by recounting what I
know, said Luis, speaking calmly, but with dignity. Ye
know that I was much with Don Christopher before he
sailed, and that I had some little connexion with bringing
him back to Santa F, even when he had left the place, as
was supposed for the last time. This intimacy hath been
renewed since the arrival of the Great Genoese at
Barcelona
,
and hours have we passed together in private,
discoursing
on the events of the last few months. What I
have thus learned I am ready to impart, if ye will do me
the grace to listen.
The whole company giving an eager assent, Luis now
commenced a general narrative of the voyage, detailing all
the leading circumstances of interest, and giving the
reasons
that were most in favour at the time, concerning the
different phenomena that had perplexed the adventurers.
He spoke more than an hour; proceeding consecutively
from island to island, and dilating on their productions,
imaginary and real. Much that he related, proceeded from
the misconceptions of the admiral, and misinterpretations
of the signs and language of the Indians, as a matter of
course; but it was all told clearly, in elegant if not in
eloquent
language, and with a singular air of truth. In short,
our hero palmed upon his audience the results of his own
observation, as the narrative of the admiral, and more than
once was he interrupted by bursts of admiration at the
vividness and graphic beauties of his descriptions. Even
Sancho listened with delight, and when the young man
concluded, he rose from his chair, and exclaimed heartily;
Seores, you may take all this, as so much gospel!
Had the noble Seor witnessed himself, that which he hath
so well described, it could not have been truer, and I look
on myself to be particularly fortunate to have heard this
history of the voyage, which henceforth shall be my
history
,
word for word; for as my patron saint shall
remember
me, nought else will I tell to the gossips of Moguer,
when I get back to that blessed town of my childhood.
Sancho's influence was much impaired by the effects of
Luis's narrative, which Peter Martyr pronounced to be one
that would have done credit to a scholar who had
accompanied
the expedition. A few appeals were made to the
old seaman, to see if he would corroborate the statements
he had just heard, but his protestations became so much the
louder in behalf of the accuracy of the account.
It was wonderful how much reputation the Conde de
Llera obtained by this little deception. To be able to repeat,
with accuracy and effect, language that was supposed to
have fallen from the lips of Columbus, was a sort of
illustration
;
and Peter Martyr, who justly enjoyed a high
reputation
for intelligence, was heard sounding the praises of
our hero in all places, his young pupils echoing his words
with the ardour and imitation of youth! Such, indeed, was
the vast reputation obtained by the Genoese, that one gained
a species of reflected renown by being thought to live in his
confidence, and a thousand follies of the Count of Llera,
real or imaginary, were forgotten in the fact that the
admiral
had deemed him worthy of being the repository of
15 *
facts and feelings such as he had related. As Luis,
moreover
,
was seen to be much in the company of Don
Christopher
,
the world was very willing to give the young man
credit for qualities that, by some unexplained circumstance,
had hitherto escaped its notice. In this manner did Luis
de Bobadilla reap some advantages, of a public character,
from his resolution and enterprise, although vastly less than
would have attended an open admission of all that occurred.
How far, and in what manner, these qualities availed him
in his suit with Mercedes, will appear in our subsequent
pages.
CHAPTER XII.
Each look, each motion, waked a new-born grace,
That o'er her form its transient glory cast:
Some lovelier wonder soon usurp'd the place,
Chased by a charm still lovelier than the last.
Mason.
The
day of the reception of Columbus at Barcelona, had
been one of tumultuous feelings, and of sincere delight, with
the ingenuous and pure-minded Queen of Castile. She had
been the moving spirit of the enterprise, as it was connected
with authority and means, and never was a sovereign more
amply rewarded, by a consciousness of the magnitude of
the results that followed her well-meant and zealous efforts.
When the excitement and bustle of the day were over,
Isabella retired to her closet, and there, as was usual with
her on all great occasions, she poured out her thankfulness
on her knees, entreating the Divine Providence to sustain
her under the new responsibilities she felt, and to direct her
steps aright, equally as a sovereign, and as a Christian
woman. She had left the attitude of prayer but a few
minutes, and was seated with her head leaning on her hand,
in deep meditation, when a slight knock at the door called
her attention. There was but one person in Spain who
would be likely to take even this liberty, guarded and
modest as was the tap; rising, she turned the key, and
admitted the king.
Isabella was still beautiful. Her form, always of
admirable
perfection, still retained its grace. Her eyes had lost
but little of their lustre, and her smile, ever sweet and
beneficent
,
failed not to reflect the pure and womanly impulses
of her heart. In a word, her youthful beauty had been but
little impaired by the usual transition to the matronly
attractions
of a wife and a mother; but this night, all her
youthful
charms seemed to be suddenly renewed. Her cheek
was flushed with holy enthusiasm; her figure dilated with
the sublimity of the thoughts in which she had been
indulging
;
and her eyes beamed with the ennobling hopes of
religious enthusiasm. Ferdinand was struck with this little
change, and he stood admiring her, for a minute, in silence,
after he had closed the door.
Is not this a most wonderful reward, for efforts so
small, my husband and love? exclaimed the queen, who
fancied the king's thoughts similar to her own; a new
empire
thus cheaply purchased, with riches that the
imagination
cannot tell, and millions of souls to be redeemed from
eternal woe, by means of a grace that must be as unexpected
to themselves, as the knowledge of their existence hath been
to us!
Ever thinking, Isabella, of the welfare of souls! But
thou art right; for what are the pomps and glories of the
world to the hopes of salvation, and the delights of heaven!
I confess Colon hath much exceeded all my hopes, and
raised such a future for Spain, that the mind scarce
knoweth
where to place limits to its pictures.
Think of the millions of poor Indians that may live to
bless our sway, and to feel the influence and consolations
of holy church!
I trust that our kinsman and neighbour, Dom Joao, will
not give us trouble in this matter. Your Portuguese have
so keen an appetite for discoveries, that they little relish the
success of other powers; and it is said many dangerous
and wicked proposals were made to the king, even while
our caravels lay in the Tagus.
Colon assureth me, Fernando, that he doubteth if these
Indians have now any religious creed, so that our ministers
will have no prejudices to encounter, in presenting to their
simple minds the sublime truths of the gospel!
No doubt the admiral hath fully weighed these matters.
It is his opinion, that the island he hath called Espaola
wanteth but little of being of the full dimensions of Castile,
Leon, Aragon, Granada, and indeed of all our possessions
within the peninsula!
Didst thou attend to what he said, touching the
gentleness
and mildness of the inhabitants? And wert thou not
struck with the simple, confiding aspects of those he hath
brought with him? Such a people may readily be brought,
first, as is due, to worship the one true and living God, and
next, to regard their sovereigns as kind and benignant
parents.
Authority can ever make itself respected; and Don
Christopher hath assured me, in a private conference, that
a thousand tried lances would overrun all that eastern
region
.
We must make early application to the Holy Father
to settle such limits between us and Don John, as may
prevent
disputes, hereafter, touching our several interests. I
have already spoken to the cardinal on this subject, and he
flattereth me with the hope of having the ear of Alexander.
I trust that the means of disseminating the faith of the
cross will not be overlooked in the negotiation; for it
paineth
me to find churchmen treating of worldly things, to the
utter neglect of those of their Great Master.
Don Ferdinand regarded his wife intently for an instant,
without making any reply. He perceived, as often
happened
in questions of policy, that their feelings were not
exactly attuned, and he had recourse to an allusion that
seldom failed to draw the thoughts of Isabella from their
loftier aspirations to considerations more worldly, when
rightly applied.
Thy children, Doa Isabella, will reap a goodly
heritage
by the success of this, our latest and greatest stroke
of policy! Thy dominions and mine will henceforth
descend
in common to the same heir; then this marriage in
Portugal may open the way to new accessions of territory,
Granada is already secured to thine, by our united arms;
and here hath Providence opened the way to an empire in
the east, that promiseth to outdo all that hath yet been
performed
in Europe.
Are not my children thine, Fernando? Can good
happen
to one, without its equally befalling the other? I trust
they will learn to understand why so many new subjects,
and such wide territories are added to their possessions,
and will ever remain true to their highest and first duty,
that of spreading the gospel, that the sway of the one
Catholic
church may the more speedily be accomplished.
Still it may be necessary to secure advantages that are
offered in a worldly shape, by worldly means.
Thou sayest true, my lord; and it is the proper care
of loving parents to look well to the interest of their
offspring
in this, as in all other particulars.
Isabella now lent a more willing car to the politic
suggestions
of her consort, and they passed an hour in
discussing
some of the important measures that it was thought
their joint interests required should be immediately attended
to. After this Ferdinand saluted his wife affectionately,
and withdrew to his own cabinet, to labour, as usual, until
his frame demanded rest.
Isabella sate musing for a few minutes after the king had
retired, and then she took a light and proceeded through
certain private passages, with which she was familiar, to
the apartment of her daughters. Here she spent an hour,
indulging in the affections and discharging the duties of a
careful mother, when embracing each in turn, she gave her
blessings, and left the place in the same simple manner as
she had entered. Instead, however, of returning to her
own part of the palace, she pursued her way in an opposite
direction, until, reaching a private door, she gently tapped.
A voice within bade her enter, and complying, the Queen
of Castile found herself alone with her old and tried friend
the Marchioness of Moya. A quiet gesture forbade all the
usual testimonials of respect, and knowing her mistress's
wishes in this particular, the hostess received her illustrious
guest, much as she would have received an intimate of
her own rank in life.
We have had so busy and joyful a day,
daughter-marchioness
,
the queen commenced, quietly setting down the
little silver lamp she carried, that I had near forgotten a
duty which ought not to be overlooked. Thy nephew, the
Count de Llera, hath returned to court, bearing himself as
modestly and as prudently, as if he had no share in the
glory of this great success of Colon's!
Seora, Luis is here, but whether prudent or modest, I
leave for others, who may be less partial, to say.
To me such seemeth to be his deportment, and a young
mind might be pardoned some exultation at such a result.
But I have come to speak of Don Luis and thy ward. Now
that thy nephew hath given this high proof of his
perseverance
and courage, there can remain no longer any reason
for forbidding their union. Thou knowest that I hold the
pledged word of Doa Mercedes, not to marry without my
consent, and this night will I make her happy as I feel
myself, by leaving her mistress of her own wishes; nay,
by letting her know that I desire to see her Countess of
Llera, and that right speedily.
Your Highness is all goodness to me and mine,
returned
the Marchioness, coldly. Mercedes ought to feel
deeply grateful that her royal mistress hath a thought for
her welfare, when her mind hath so many greater concerns
to occupy it.
It is that, my friend, that hath brought me hither at
this late hour. My soul is truly burthened with gratitude,
and ere I sleep, were it possible, I would fain make all as
blessed as I feel myself. Where is thy ward?
She left me for the night, but as your Highness entered.
I will summon her to hear your pleasure.
We will go to her, Beatriz; tidings such as I bring
should not linger on weary feet.
It is her duty, and it would be her pleasure to pay all
respect, Seora.
I know that well, Marchioness, but it is my pleasure to
bear this news myself, interrupted the queen, leading the
way to the door. Show thou the way, which is better
known to thee than to another. We go with little state and
ceremony, as thou seest, like Colon going forth to explore
his unknown seas, and we go bearers of tidings as grateful
to thy ward, as those the Genoese bore to the benighted
natives
of Cipango. These corridors are our trackless seas,
and all these intricate passages the hidden ways we are to
explore.
Heaven grant your Highness make not some discovery
as astounding as that which the Genoese hath just divulged!
For myself, I scarce know whether to believe all things, or
to grant faith to none.
I wonder not at thy surprise; it is a feeling that hath
overcome all others, through the late extraordinary events,
answered the queen, evidently misconceiving the meaning
of her friend's words. But we have still another pleasure
in store; that of witnessing the joy of a pure female heart
which hath had its trials, and which hath borne them as
became a Christian maiden.
Doa Beatriz sighed heavily, but she made no answer.
By this time they were crossing the little saloon in which
Mercedes was permitted to receive her female acquaintances,
and were near the door of her chamber. Here they met a
maid, who hastened onward to inform her mistress of the
visit she was about to receive. Isabella was accustomed to
use a mother's liberties with those she loved, and opening
the door, without ceremony, she stood before our heroine,
ere the latter could advance to meet her.
Daughter, commenced the queen, seating herself,
and smiling benignantly on the startled girl, I have
come to discharge a solemn duty. Kneel thou here, at
my feet, and listen to thy sovereign as thou wouldst listen
to a mother.
Mercedes gladly obeyed, for, at that moment, anything
was preferable to being required to speak. When she had
knelt, the queen passed an arm affectionately round her
neck, and drew her closer to her person, until, by a little
gentle violence, the face of Mercedes was hid in the folds
of Isabella's robe.
I have all reason to extol thy faith and duty, child,
said the queen, as soon as this little arrangement, to favour
the feelings of Mercedes, had been considerately made;
thou hast not forgotten thy promise, in aught; and my
object, now, is to leave thee mistress of thine own
inclinations
,
and to remove all impediments to their exercise.
Thou hast no longer any pledge with thy sovereign; for,
who hath manifested so much discretion and delicacy,
may be surely trusted with her own happiness.
Mercedes continued silent, though Isabella fancied that
she felt a slight shudder passing convulsively through her
delicate frame.
No answer, daughter?Is it more preferable to leave
another arbitress of thy fate, than to exercise that office
for thyself? Well, then, as thy sovereign and parent, I
will substitute command for consent, and tell thee it is my
wish and desire that thou becomest, as speedily as shall
comport with propriety and thy high station, the wedded
wife of Don Luis de Bobadilla, Conde de Llera.
NononoSeoranevernever murmured
Mercedes, her voice equally stifled by her emotions, and by
the manner in which she had buried her face in the dress
of the queen.
Isabella looked at the Marchioness of Moya in wonder.
Her countenance did not express either displeasure or
resentment
,
for she too well knew the character of our
heroine
to suspect caprice, or any weak prevarication in a
matter
that so deeply touched the feelings; and the concern she
felt was merely overshadowed at the suddenness of the
intelligence
,
by a feeling of ungovernable surprise.
Canst thou explain this, Beatriz? the queen at length
inquired. Have I done harm, where I most intended good?
I am truly unfortunate, for I appear to have deeply wounded
the heart of this child, at the very moment I fancied I was
conferring supreme happiness!
No  no  no  Seora, again murmured Mercedes,
clinging convulsively to the queen's knees. Your
Highness
hath wounded no one
would
wound no one
can
wound no oneyou are all gracious goodness and
thoughtfulness
.
Beatriz, I look to thee for the explanation! Hath ought
justifiable occurred to warrant this change of feeling?
I fear, dearest Seora, that the feelings continue too
much as formerly, and that the change is not in this young
and unpractised heart, but in the fickle inclinations of man.
A flash of womanly indignation darted from the usually
serene eyes of the queen, and her form assumed all of its
native majesty.
Can this be true? she exclaimed. Would a subject
of Castile
dare
thus to trifle with his sovereign  thus to
trifle with one, sweet and pure as this girl  thus to trifle
with his faith with God! If the reckless Conde thinketh to
do these acts of wrongfulness with impunity, let him look
to it! Shall I punish him that merely depriveth his
neighbour
of some paltry piece of silver, and let him escape who
woundeth the soul? I wonder at thy calmness,
daughter-marchioness
;
thou, who art so wont to let an honest
indignation
speak out in the just language of a fearless and
honest spirit?
Alas! Seora, my beloved mistress, my feelings have
had vent already, and nature will no more. The boy,
moreover, is my brother's son, and when I would fain
arouse a resentment against him, such as befitteth his
offence
,
the image of that dear brother, whose very picture
he is, hath arisen to my mind in a way to weaken all its
energy.
This is most unusual! A creature so farso young
so nobleso richevery way so excellent, to be so soon
forgotten! Canst thou account for it by any wandering
inclination, Lady of Moya?
Isabella spoke musingly, and, as one of her high rank is
apt to overlook minor considerations, when the feelings are
strongly excited, she did not remember that Mercedes was
a listener. The convulsive shudder that again shook the
frame of our heroine, however, did not fail to remind her
of this fact, and the queen could not have pressed the
princess
Juana more fondly to her heart, than she now drew
the yielding form of our heroine.
What would you, Seora? returned the Marchioness,
bitterly. Luis, thoughtless and unprincipled boy as he is,
hath induced a youthful Indian princess to abandon home
and friends, under the pretence of swelling the triumph of
the admiral, but really, in obedience to a wandering fancy,
and in submission to those evil caprices, that make men
what, in sooth, they are, and which so often render unhappy
women their dupes and their victims.
An Indian princess, say'st thou?The admiral made
one of that rank known to us, but she was already a wife,
and far from being one to rival Doa Mercedes of Valverde.
Vol. II.  16
Ah! dearest Seora, she of whom you speak will not
compare with her I meanOzemafor so is the Indian
lady calledOzema is a different being, and is not without
high claims to personal beauty. Could mere personal
appearances
justify the conduct of the boy, he would not be
altogether without excuse.
How knowest thou this, Beatriz?
Because, your Highness, Luis hath brought her to the
palace, and she is, at this moment, in these very
apartments
.
Mercedes hath received her like a sister, even
while the stranger hath unconsciously crushed her heart.
Here,
say'st
thou
, marchioness! Then can there be
no vicious upon between the thoughtless young man and
the stranger. Thy nephew would not thus presume to
offer virtue and innocence.
Of that we complain not, Seora. 'Tis the boyish
inconstancy
,
and thoughtless cruelty of the count, that hath
awakened my feelings against him. Never have I
endeavoured
to influence my ward to favour his suit, for I would
not that they should have it in their power to say I sought
a union so honourable and advantageous to our house; but
now do I most earnestly desire her to steel her noble heart
to his unworthiness.
Ah! Seora  my guardian, murmured Mercedes,
Luis is not so
very
culpable. Ozema's beauty, and my
own want of the means to keep him true, are alone to
blame.
Ozema's beauty! slowly repeated the queen. Is this
young Indian, then, so very perfect, Beatriz, that thy ward
need fear, or envy her? I did not think that such a being
lived!
Your Highness knoweth how it is with men. They
love novelties, and are most captivated with the freshest
faces. San Iago!Andres de Cabrera hath caused me to
know this, though it were a crime to suppose any could
teach this hard lesson to Isabella of Trastamara.
Restrain thy strong and impetuous feelings,
daughter-marchioness
,
returned the queen, glancing her eye at the
bowed form of Mercedes, whose head was now buried in
her lap; truth seldom asserts its fullest power when the
heart is overflowing with feeling. Don Andres hath been
a loyal subject, and doth justice to thy merit; and, as to my
Lord the King, he is the father of my children, as well as
thy sovereign.But, touching this Ozema  can I see her,
Beatriz?
You have only to command, Seora, to see whom you
please. But Ozema is, no doubt, at hand, and can be
brought into your presence as soon as it may please your
Highness to order it done.
Nay, Beatriz, if she
be
a princess, and a stranger in
the kingdom, there is a consideration due to her rank and
to her position. Let Doa Mercedes go and prepare her to
receive us; I will visit her in her own apartment. The
hour is late, but she will overlook the want of ceremony in
the desire to do her service.
Mercedes did not wait a second bidding, but, rising from
her knees, she hastened to do as the queen had suggested
Isabella and the Marchioness were silent some little time,
when left to themselves; then the former, as became her
rank, opened the discourse.
It is remarkable, Beatriz, that Colon should not have
spoken to me of this princess! she said. One of her
condition ought not to have entered Spain with so little
ceremony.
The admiral hath deemed her the chosen subject of
Luis's care, and hath left her to be presented to your
Highness
by my recreant nephew. Ah, Seora! is it not
wonderful
,
that one like Mercedes could be so soon supplanted
by a half-naked, unbaptized, benighted being, on whom the
church hath never yet smiled, and whose very soul may be
said to be in jeopardy of instantaneous condemnation?
That soul must be cared for, Beatriz, and that right
quickly. Is the princess really of sufficient beauty to
supplant
a creature as lovely as the Doa Mercedes?
It is not that, Seora,  it is not that. But men are
fickle,and they so love novelties! Then is the modest
restraint of cultivated manners, less winning to them, than
the freedom of those who deem even clothes superfluous. I
mean not to question the modesty of Ozema; for, according
to her habits, she seemeth irreproachable in this respect;
but the ill-regulated fancy of a thoughtless boy may find a
momentary attraction in her unfettered conduct and
half-attired
person, that is wanting to the air and manners of a
high-born Spanish damsel, who hath been taught rigidly to
respect herself and her sex.
This may be true, as toucheth the vulgar, Beatriz, but
such unworthy motives can never influence the Conde de
Llera. If thy nephew hath really proved the recreant thou
supposest, this Indian princess must be of more excellence
than we have thought.
Of that, Seora, you can soon judge for yourself;
here is the maiden of Mercedes to inform us that the
Indian is ready to receive the honour that your Highness
intendeth.
Our heroine had prepared Ozema to meet the queen. By
this time, the young Haytian had caught so many Spanish
words, that verbal communication with her was far from
difficult
,
though she still spoke in the disconnected and abrupt
manner of one to whom the language was new. She
understood
perfectly that she was to meet that beloved sovereign,
of whom Luis and Mercedes had so often spoken with
reverence
;
and, accustomed herself, to look up to caciques
greater than her brother, there was no difficulty in making
her understand that the person she was now about to
receive
was the first of her sex in Spain. The only
misconception
which existed, arose from the circumstance that
Ozema believed Isabella to be the queen of all the
Christian
world, instead of being the queen of a particular
country; for, in her imagination, both Luis and Mercedes
were persons of royal station.
Although Isabella was prepared to see a being of
surprising
perfection of form, she started with surprise, as her eye
first fell on Ozema. It was not so much the beauty of the
young Indian, that astonished her, as the native grace of
her movements, the bright and happy expression of her
countenance, and the perfect self-possession of her mien
and deportment. Ozema had got accustomed to a degree
of dress that she would have found oppressive at Hayti; the
sensitiveness of Mercedes, on the subject of female propriety,
having induced her to lavish on her new friend many rich
articles of attire, that singularly, though wildly, contributed
to aid her charms. Still the gift of Luis was thrown over
one shoulder, as the highest-prized part of her wardrobe,
and the cross of Mercedes rested on her bosom, the most
precious of all her ornaments.
This is wonderful, Beatriz! exclaimed the queen, as
she stood at one side of the room, while Ozema bowed her
body in graceful reverence on the other; can this rare
being really have a soul that knoweth nought of its God and
Redeemer!But let her spirit be benighted as it may, there
is no vice in that simple mind, or deceit in that pure heart.
Seora, all this is true. Spite of our causes of
dissatisfaction
,
my ward and I both love her already, and could
take her to our hearts for ever; one as a friend, and the
other as a parent.
Princess, said the queen, advancing with quiet dignity
to the spot where Ozema stood, with downcast eyes and
bended body, waiting her pleasure, thou art welcome to
our dominions. The admiral hath done well in not
classing
one of thy evident claims and station among those whom
he hath exhibited to vulgar eyes. In this he hath shown
his customary judgment, no less than his deep respect for
the sacred office of sovereigns.
Almirante! exclaimed Ozema, her looks brightening
with intelligence, for she had long known how to pronounce
the well-earned title of Columbus; Almirante, Mercedes;
Isabella, MercedesLuis, Mercedes, Seora Reya.
Beatriz, what meaneth this? Why doth the princess
couple the name of thy ward with that of Colon, with mine,
and even with that of the young Count of Llera?
Seora, by some strange delusion, she hath got to think
that Mercedes is the Spanish term for every thing that is
excellent or perfect, and thus doth she couple it with all
that she most desireth to praise. Your Highness must
observe
that she even united Luis and Mercedes, a union that
we once fondly hoped might happen, but which now would
seem to be impossible; and which she herself must be the
last really to wish.
Strange delusion! repeated the queen; the idea hath
had its birth in some particular cause, for things like this
come not of accidents; who but thy nephew, Beatriz, would
know aught of thy ward, or who but he would have taught
the princess to deem her very name a sign of excellence?
Seora! exclaimed Mercedes, the colour mounting to
16 *
her pale cheek, and joy momentarily flashing in her eyes,
can this be so?
Why not, daughter? We may have been too hasty in
this matter, and mistaken what are truly signs of devotion
to thee, for proofs of fickleness and inconstancy.
Ah! Seora! but this can never be, else would not
Ozema so love him.
How knowest thou, child, that the princess hath any
other feeling for the count than that which properly
belongeth
to one who is grateful for his care, and for the
inexpressible
service of being made acquainted with the virtues
of the cross? Here is some rash error, Beatriz.
I fear not, your Highness. Touching the nature of
Ozema's
feelings, there can be no misconception, since the
innocent
and unpractised creature hath not art sufficient to
conceal
them. That her heart is all Luis's, we discovered in
the first few hours of our intercourse; and it is too pure,
unsought, to be won. The feeling of the Indian is not
merely admiration, but it is such a passionate devotion, as
partaketh of the warmth of that sun, which, we are told,
glows with a heat so genial in her native clime.
Could
one see so much of Don Luis, Seora, added
Mercedes, under circumstances to try his martial virtues,
and so long daily be in communion with his excellent heart,
and not come to view him as far above all others?
Martial virtuesexcellent heart!slowly repeated the
queen, and yet so regardless of the wrong he doeth! He
is neither knight nor cavalier worthy of the sex, if what
thou thinkest be true, child.
Nay, Seora, earnestly resumed the girl, whose
diffidence
was yielding to the wish to vindicate our hero, the
princess hath told us of the manner in which he rescued
her from her greatest enemy and persecutor, Caonabo, a
headstrong and tyrannical sovereign of her island, and of
his generous self-devotion in her behalf.
Daughter, do thou withdraw, and, first calling on Holy
Maria to intercede for thee, seek the calm of religious peace
and submission, on thy pillow. Beatriz, I will question the
princess alone.
The Marchioness and Mercedes immediately withdrew,
leaving Isabella with Ozema, in possession of the room.
The interview that followed lasted more than an hour, that
time being necessary to enable the queen to form an opinion
of the stranger's explanations, with the imperfect means of
communication she possessed. That Ozema's whole heart
was Luis's, Isabella could not doubt. Unaccustomed to
conceal
her preferences, the Indian girl was too unpractised to
succeed in such a design, had she even felt the desire to
attempt it; but, in addition to her native ingenuousness,
Ozema believed that duty required her to have no
concealments
from the sovereign of Luis, and she laid bare her
whole soul in the simplest and least disguised manner.
Princess, said the queen, after the conversation had
lasted some time, and Isabella believed herself to be in
possession
of the means of comprehending her companion, I
now understand your tale. Caonabo is the chief, or if thou
wilt, the king of a country adjoining thine own; he sought
thee for a wife, but being already married to more than one
princess, thou didst very properly reject his unholy
proposals
.
He then attempted to seize thee by violence. The
Conde de Llera was on a visit to thy brother at the
time
LuisLuisthe girl impatiently interrupted in her
sweet soft voiceLuisno CondeLuis.
True, princess, but the Conde de Llera and Luis de
Bobadilla are one and the same person. Luis, then, if thou
wilt, was present in thy palace, and he beat back the
presumptuous
cacique, who, not satisfied with fulfilling the law
of God by the possession of one wife, impiously sought, in
thy person, a second, or a third, and brought thee off in
triumph. Thy brother, next, requested thee to take shelter,
for a time, in Spain, and Don Luis, becoming thy guardian
and protector, hath brought thee hither to the care of his
aunt?
Ozema bowed her head in acknowledgment of the truth
of this statement, most of which she had no difficulty in
understanding, the subject having, of late, occupied so
much of her thoughts.
And, now, princess, continued Isabella, I must speak
to thee with maternal frankness, for I deem all of thy birth
my children while they dwell in my realms, and have a
right to look to me for advice and protection. Hast thou
any such love for Don Luis as would induce thee to forget
thine own country, and to adopt his in its stead?
Ozema don't know what `adopt his,' means, observed
the puzzled girl.
I wish to inquire if thou would'st consent to become
the wife of Don Luis de Bobadilla?
Wife and husband were words of which the
Indian
girl had early learned the signification, and she smiled
guilelessly, even while she blushed, and nodded her assent.
I am, then, to understand that thou expect'st to marry
the Count, for no modest young female, like thee, would so
cheerfully avow her preference, without having that hope
ripened in her heart, to something like certainty.
S, SeoraOzema, Luis' wife.
Thou meanest, princess, that Ozema expecteth shortly
to wed the Countshortly to become his wife?
NononoOzema
now
Luis' wife. Luis marry
Ozema, already.
Can this be so? exclaimed the queen, looking steadily
into the face of the beautiful Indian to ascertain if the
whole were not
an artful
deception. But the open and
innocent
face betrayed no guilt, and Isabella felt compelled to
believe what she had heard. In order, however, to make
certain of the fact, she questioned and cross-questioned
Ozema, for near half an hour longer, and always with the
same result.
When the queen arose to withdraw, she kissed the
princess, for so she deemed this wild creature of an
unknown
and novel state of society, and whispered a devout
prayer for the enlightenment of her mind, and for her
future
peace. On reaching her own apartment, she found
the Marchioness of Moya in attendance, that tried friend
being unable to sleep until she had learned the impressions
of her royal mistress.
'T is even worse than we had imagined, Beatriz, said
Isabella, as the other closed the door behind her. Thine
heartless, inconstant, nephew hath already wedded the
Indian
,
and she is, at this moment, his lawful wife.
Seora, there must be some mistake in this! The rash
boy would hardly dare to practise this imposition on me,
and that in the very presence of Mercedes.
He would sooner place his wife in thy care,
daughter-marchioness
,
than make the same disposition of one who
had fewer claims on him. But there can be no mistake.
I have questioned the princess closely, and no doubt
remaineth
in my mind, that the nupitals have been solemnized
by religious rites. It is not easy to understand all she
would wish to say, but that much she often and distinctly
hath affirmed.
Your Highness
can
a Christian contract marriage
with one that is yet unbaptised?
Certainly not, in the eye of the church, which is the
eye of God. But I rather think Ozema hath received this
holy rite, for she often pointed to the cross she weareth,
when speaking of the union with thy nephew. Indeed,
from her allusions, I understood her to say that she became
a Christian, ere she became a wife.
And that blessed cross, Seora, was a gift of Mercedes
to the reckless, fickle-minded boy; a parting gift, in which
the holy symbol was intended to remind him of constancy
and faith!
The world maketh so many inroads into the hearts of
men, Beatriz, that they know not woman's reliance and
woman's fidelity. But to thy knees, and bethink thee of
asking for grace to sustain thy ward, in this cruel, but
unavoidable
,
extremity.
Isabella now turned to her friend, who advanced and
raised the hand of her royal mistress to her lips. The
queen, however, was not content with this salutation, warm
as it was; passing an arm around the neck of Doa
Beatriz
,
she drew her to her person, and imprinted a kiss on
her forehead.
Adieu, Beatriztrue friend as thou art! she said. If
constancy hath deserted all others, it hath still an abode in
thy faithful heart.
With these words the queen and the marchioness
separated
each to find her pillow, if not her repose.
CHAPTER XIII.
Now, Gondarino, what can you put on now
That may deceive us?
Have ye more strange illusions, yet more mists,
Through which the weak eye may be led to error?
What can ye say that may do satisfaction
Both for her wronged honour and your ill?
Beaumont and Fletcher.
The
day which succeeded the interview related in the
preceding chapter, was that which Cardinal Mendoza had
selected for the celebrated banquet given to Columbus. On
this occasion, most of the high nobility of the court were
assembled in honour of the admiral, who was received with
a distinction which fell little short of that usually devoted
to crowned heads. The Genoese bore himself modestly,
though nobly, in all these ceremonies; and, for the hour,
all appeared to delight in doing justice to his great exploits,
and to sympathise in a success so much surpassing the
general expectation. Every eye seemed riveted on his
person, every ear listened eagerly to the syllables as they
fell from his lips, every voice was loud and willing in his
his praise.
As a matter of course, on such an occasion, Columbus
was expected to give some account of his voyage and
adventures
.
This was not an easy task, since it was virtually
asserting how much his own perseverance and spirit, his
sagacity and skill, were superior to the knowledge and
enterprise
of the age. Still, the admiral acquitted himself
with dexterity and credit, touching principally on those
heads which most redounded to the glory of Spain, and the
lustre of the two crowns.
Among the guests, was Luis de Bobadilla. The young
man had been invited on account of his high rank, and in
consideration of the confidence and familiarity with which
he was evidently treated by the admiral. The friendship
of Columbus was more than sufficient to erase the slightly
unfavourable impressions that had been produced by Luis's
early levities, and men quietly submitted to the influence
of the great man's example, without stopping to question
the motive, or the end. The consciousness of having done
that which few of his station and hopes would ever dream
of attempting, gave to the proud mien and handsome
countenance of Luis, a seriousness and elevation that had
not always been seated there, and helped to sustain him in
the good opinion that he had otherwise so cheaply
purchased
.
The manner in which he had related to Peter
Martyr and his companions the events of the expedition
was also remembered, and, without understanding exactly
why, the world was beginning to associate him, in some
mysterious manner, with the great western voyage. Owing
to these accidental circumstances, our hero was actually
reaping some few of the advantages of his spirit, though
in a way he had never anticipated; a result by no means
extraordinary, men as often receiving applause, or
reprobation
,
for acts that were never meditated, as for those for
which reason and justice would hold them rigidly
responsible
.
Here is a health to my lord, their Highnesses' admiral
of the Ocean Sea, cried Luis de St. Angel, raising his
cup, so that all at the board might witness the act. Spain
oweth him her gratitude for the boldest and most beneficial
enterprise of the age, and no good subject of the two
Sovereigns will hesitate to do him honour for his services.
The bumper was drunk, and the meek acknowledgments
of Columbus were listened to in respectful silence.
Lord Cardinal, resumed the free-speaking accountant
of the church's revenues, I look upon the church's cure
as doubled by these discoveries, and esteem the number of
souls that will be rescued from perdition by the means that
will now be employed to save them, as forming no small
part of the lustre of the exploit, and a thing not likely to
be forgotten at Rome.
Thou say'st well, good de St. Angel, returned the
Cardinal, and the Holy Father will not overlook God's
agent, or his assistants. Knowledge came from the east,
and we have long looked forward to the time, when,
purified
by revelation and the high commission that we hold
direct from the source of all power, it would be rolled
backward
to its place of beginning; but we now see that its
course is still to be westward, reaching Asia by a path that,
until this great discovery, was hid from human eyes.
Although so much apparent sympathy ruled at the
festival
,
the human heart was at work, and envy, the basest
and perhaps the most common of our passions, was fast
swelling in more than one breath. The remark of the
Cardinal produced an exhibition of the influence of this
unworthy feeling that might otherwise have been
smothered
.
Among the guests was a noble of the name of Juan
de Orbitello, and he could listen no longer, in silence, to
the praises of those whose breath he had been accustomed
to consider fame.
Is it so certain, holy sir, he said, addressing his host,
that God would not have directed other means to be
employed
,
to effect this end, had these of Don Christopher
failed? Or, are we to look upon this voyage as the only
known way in which all these heathen could be rescued
from perdition?
No one may presume, Seor, to limit the agencies of
heaven, returned the cardinal, gravely; nor is it the
of man to question the means employed, or to doubt
the power to create others, as wisdom may dictate. Least
of all, should laymen call in question aught that the church
sanctioneth.
This I admit Lord Cardinal, answered the Seor de
Orbitello, a little embarrassed, and somewhat vexed at the
implied rebuke of the churchmen's remarks, and it was
the least of my intentions to do so. But, you, Seor Don
Christopher, did you deem yourself an agent of heaven in
this expedition?
I have always considered myself a most unworthy
instrument
,
set apart for this great end, Seor, returned the
admiral, with a grave solemnity that was well suited to
impose
on the spectators. From the first, I have felt this
impulse, as being of divine origin, and I humbly trust
heaven
is not displeased with the creature it hath employed.
Do you then imagine, Seor Almirante, that Spain
could not produce another, fitted equally with yourself, to
execute this great enterprise, had any accident prevented
either your sailing or your success?
The boldness, as well as the singularity of this question,
produced a general pause in the conversation, and every
head was bent a little forward in expectation of the reply.
Columbus sate silent for more than a minute; then,
reaching
forward, he took an egg, and holding it up to view, he
spoke mildly, but with great gravity and earnestness of
manner.
Seores, he said, is there one here of sufficient
expertness
to cause this egg to stand on its end? If such a
man be present, I challenge him to give us an exhibition
of his skill.
The request produced a good deal of surprise; but a
dozen immediately attempted the exploit, amid much
laughter
and many words. More than once, some young noble
thought he had succeeded, but the instant his fingers quitted
the egg, it rolled upon the table, as if in mockery of his
awkwardness.
By Saint Luke, Seor Almirante, but this notable
achievement surpasseth our skill, cried Juan de Orbitello.
Here is the Conde de Llera, who hath slain so many
Moors, and who hath even unhorsed Alonzo de Ojeda, in
a
tourney, can make nothing of his egg, in the way you
mention.
And yet it will no longer be difficult to him or even to
you, Seor, when the art shall be exposed.
Saying thus, Columbus tapped the smaller end of his
egg lightly on the table, when, the shell being forced in, it
possessed a base on which it stood firmly and without
tremour
.
A murmur of applause followed this rebuke, and
the Lord of Orbitello was
forced
to shrink back into an
insignificance
,
from which it would have been better for him
never to have emerged. At this precise instant a royal
page spoke to the admiral, and then passed on to the seat
of Don Luis de Bobadilla.
I am summoned hastily to the presence of the queen,
Lord Cardinal, observed the admiral, and look to your
Grace for an apology for my withdrawing. The business
is of weight, by the manner of the message, and you will
pardon my now quitting the board, though it seem early.
Vol. II.  17
The usual reply was made; and, bowed to the door by
his host and all present, Columbus quitted the room.
Almost
at the same instant, he was followed by the Conde de
Llera.
Whither goest thou, in this hurry, Don Luis?
demanded
the admiral, as the other joined him. Art thou
in so great haste to quit a banquet such as Spain hath not
often seen, except in the palaces of her kings?
By San Iago! nor there, neither, Seor, answered the
young man, gaily, if King Ferdinand's board be taken
as the sample. But I quit this goodly company in
obedience
to an order of Doa Isabella, who hath suddenly
summoned me to her royal presence.
Then, Seor Conde, we go together, and are like to
meet on the same errand. I, too, am hastening to the
apartments of the queen.
It gladdens my heart to hear this, Seor, as I know of
but one subject on which a common summons should be
sent to us. This affair toucheth on my suit, and, doubtless,
you will be required to speak of my bearing in the voyage.
My mind and my time have been so much occupied,
of late, with public cares, Luis, that I have not had an
occasion
to question you of this. How fareth the Lady of
Valverde, and when will she deign to reward thy constancy
and love.
Seor, I would I could answer the last of these
questions
with greater certainty, and the first with a lighter
heart. Since my return I have seen Doa Mercedes but
thrice; and though she was all gentleness and truth, my
suit for the consummation of my happiness hath been
coldly and evasively answered by my aunt. Her Highness
is to be consulted, it would seem; and the tumult produced
by the success of the voyage hath so much occupied her,
that there hath been no leisure to wait on trifles such as
those that lead to the felicity of a wanderer like myself.
Then is it like, Luis, that we are indeed summoned on
this very affair; else, why should thou and I be brought
together in a manner so unusual and so sudden.
Our hero was not displeased to fancy this, and he entered
the apartments of the queen with a step as elastic, and
a mien as bright, as if he had come to wed his love.
The Admiral of the Ocean Sea, as Columbus was now
publicly
called, had not long to wait in ante-chambers, and, ere
many minutes, he and his companions were ushered into
the presence.
Isabella received her guests in private, there being no
one in attendance but the Marchioness of Moya, Mercedes,
and Ozema. The first glances of their eyes told Columbus
and Luis that all was not right. Every countenance
denoted
that its owner was endeavouring to maintain a
calmness
that was assumed. The queen herself was serene and
dignified, it is true, but her brow was thoughtful, her eye
melancholy, and her cheek slightly flushed. As for Doa
Beatriz, sorrow and indignation struggled in her expressive
face, and Luis saw, with concern, that her look was averted
from him in a way she always adopted when he had
seriously
incurred her displeasure. Mercedes's lips were
pale as death, though a bright spot, like vermilion, was
stationary on each cheek; her eyes were downcast, and all
her mien was humbled and timid. Ozema alone seemed
perfectly natural: still, her glances were quick and anxious,
though a gleam of joy danced in her eyes, and even a slight
exclamation of delight escaped her, as she beheld Luis,
whom she had seen but once since her arrival in Barcelona,
already near a month.
Isabella advanced a step or two, to meet the admiral, and
when the last would have kneeled, she hurriedly prevented
the act by giving him her hand to kiss.
Not sonot soLord Admiral, exclaimed the queen;
this is homage unsuited to thy high rank and eminent
services. If we are thy sovereigns, so are we also thy
friends. I fear my lord cardinal will scarce pardon the
orders I sent him, seeing that it hath deprived him of thy
society somewhat sooner than he may have expected.
His Eminence, and all his goodly company, have that
to muse on, Seora, that may yet occupy them some time,
returned Columbus, smiling in his grave manner;
doubtless
,
they will less miss me than at an ordinary time.
Were it otherwise, both I, and this young count, would not
scruple to quit even a richer banquet, to obey the summons
of your Highness.
I doubt it not, Seor, but I have desired to see thee,
this night, on a matter of private, rather than of public
concernment. Doa Beatriz, here, hath made known to
me the presence at court, as well as the history of this fair
being, who giveth one an idea so much more exalted of thy
vast discoveries, that I marvel she should ever have been
concealed. Know'st thou her rank, Don Christopher, and
the circumstances that have brought her to Spain?
Seora, I do; in part through my own observation, and
in part from the statements of Don Luis de Bobadilla. I
consider the rank of the lady Ozema to be less than royal,
and more than noble, if our opinions will allow us to
imagine
a condition between the two; though it must always
be remembered that Hayti is not Castile; the one being
benighted
under the cloud of heathenism, and the other
existing
in the sunshine of the church and civilization.
Nevertheless, Don Christopher, station is station, and
the rights of birth are not impaired by the condition of a
country. Although it hath pleased him already, and will
still further please the head of the church, to give us rights,
in our characters of Christian princes, over these caciques
of India, there is nothing unusual or novel in the fact.
The relation between the suzerain and the lieges is ancient
and well established; and instances are not wanting, in
which powerful monarchs have held certain of their States
by this tenure, while others have come direct from God.
In this view, I feel disposed to consider the Indian lady as
more than noble, and have directed her to be treated
accordingly
.
There remaineth only to relate the circumstances
that have brought her to Spain.
These can better come from Don Luis than from me,
Seora; he being most familiar with the events.
Nay, Seor, I would hear them from thine own lips.
I am already possessed of the substance of the Conde de
Llera's story.
Columbus looked both surprised and pained, but he did
not hesitate about complying with the queen's request.
Hayti hath its greater and its lesser princes, or
caciques
,
your Highness, he added, the last paying a
species
of homage, and owing a certain allegiance to the first,
as hath been said
Thou see'st, daughter-marchioness, this is but a
natural
order of government, prevailing equally in the East and
in the West!
Of the first of these was Guacanagari, of whom I have
already related so much to your Highness, continued
Columbus
,
and of the last, Mattinao, the brother of this
lady. Don Luis visited the cacique Mattinao, and was
present
at an inroad of Caonabo, a celebrated Carib chief, who
would fain have made a wife of her who now stands in this
illustrious presence. The Conde conducted himself like a
gallant Castilian cavalier, routed the foe, saved the lady,
and brought her in triumph to the ships. Here it was
determined
she should visit Spain, both as a means of
throwing
more lustre on the triumph of the two crowns, and of
removing her, for a season, from the attempts of the Carib,
who is too powerful and warlike to be withstood by a race
as gentle as that of Mattinao's.
This is well, Seor, and what I have already heard;
but how happeneth it, that Ozema did not appear with the
rest of thy train, in the public reception of the town?
It was the wish of Don Luis it should be otherwise,
and I consented that he and his charge should sail
privately
from Palos, with the expectation of meeting me in
Barcelona. We both thought the lady Ozema too
superior
to her companions, to be exhibited to rude eyes as a
spectacle.
There was delicacy, if there were not prudence in the
arrangement, the queen observed a little drily. Then
the lady Ozema hath been some weeks solely in the care
of the Conde de Llera?
I so esteem it, your Highness, except as she hath been
placed under the guardianship of the Marchioness of Moya.
Was this altogether discreet, Don Christopher, or as
one prudent as thou should'st have consented to?
Seora! exclaimed Luis, unable to restrain his
feelings
longer.
Forbear, young sir, commanded the queen. I shall
have occasion to question thee presently, when thou may'st
have a need for all thy readiness, to give the fitting
answers
.
Doth not thy discretion rebuke thy indiscretion in
this matter, Lord Admiral?
Seora, the question, like its motive, is altogether new
17 *
to me; I have the utmost reliance on the honour of the
Count, and then did I know that his heart hath long been
given to the fairest and worthiest damsel of Spain;
besides
,
my mind hath been so much occupied with the grave
subjects of your Highness' interests, that it hath had but
little opportunity to dwell on minor things.
I believe thee, Seor, and thy pardon is secure. Still,
for one so experienced, it was a sore indiscretion to trust to
the constancy of a fickle heart, when placed in the body
of a light-minded and truant boy. And, now, Conde de
Llera, I have that to say to thee, which thou may'st find it
difficult to answer. Thou assentest to all that hath
hitherto
been said?
Certainly, Seora. Don Christopher can have no
motive
to misstate, even were he capable of the meanness. I
trust our house hath not been remarkable in Spain, for
recreant and false cavaliers.
In that I fully agree. If thy house hath had the
misfortune
to produce one untrue and recreant heart, it hath
the gloryglancing at her friendof producing others
that might equal the constancy of the most heroic minds
of antiquity. The lustre of the name of Bobadilla doth
not altogether depend on the fidelity and truth of its head
nay, hear me, sir, and speak only when thou art ready
to answer my questions. Thy thoughts, of late, have been
bent on matrimony?
Seora, I confess it. Is it an offence to dream of the
honourable termination of a suit that hath been long urged,
and which I had dared to hope was finally about to receive
your own royal approbation?
It is then as I feared, Beatriz! exclaimed the queen;
and this benighted but lovely being hath been deceived by
the mockery of a marriage; for no subject of Castile would
dare thus to speak of wedlock, in my presence, with the
consciousness that his vows had actually and lawfully been
given to another. Both the church and the prince would
not be thus braved, by even the greatest profligate of
Spain!
Seora, your Highness speaketh most cruelly, even
while you speak in riddles! cried Luis. May I presume
to ask if I am meant in these severe remarks?
Of whom else should we be speaking, or to whom else
allude? Thou must have the inward consciousness,
unprincipled
boy, of all thy unworthiness; and yet thou
darest thus to brave thy sovereignnay, to brave that
suffering
and angelic girl, with a mien as bold as if sustained
by the purest innocence!
Seora, I am no angel, myself, however willing to
admit Doa Mercedes to be one; neither am I a saint of
perfect purity, perhaps  in a word, I am Luis de
Bobadilla
but as far from deserving these reproaches, as from
deserving the crown of martyrdom. Let me humbly
demand
my offence?
Simply that thou hast either cruelly deceived, by a
feigned marriage, this uninstructed and confiding Indian
princess, or hast insolently braved thy sovereign with the
professions of a desire to wed another, with thy faith
actually plighted at the altar, to another. Of which of
these crimes thou art guilty, thou knowest best, thyself.
And thou, my aunt  thou, Mercedes  dost thou, too,
believe me capable of this?
I fear it is but too true, returned the marchioness,
coldly; the proof is such that none but an Infidel could
deny belief.
Mercedes?
No, Luis, answered the generous girl, with a warmth
and feeling that broke down the barriers of all conventional
restraintI do not think thee base as thisI do not think
thee base at all; merely unable to restrain thy wandering
inclinations. I know thy heart too well, and thine honour
too well, to suppose aught more than a weakness that thou
would'st fain subdue, but canst not.
God and the Holy Virgin be blessed for this! cried
the count, who had scarcely breathed while his mistress
was speaking. Anything but thy entertaining so low an
opinion of me, may be borne!
There must be an end of this, Beatriz; and I see no
surer means, than by proceeding at once to the facts, said
the queen. Come hither, Ozema, and let thy testimony
set this matter at rest, for ever.
The young Indian, who comprehended Spanish much
better than she expressed herself in the language, although
far from having even a correct understanding of all that
was said, immediately complied, her whole soul being
engrossed
with what was passing, while her intelligence was
baffled in its attempts thoroughly to comprehend it.
Mercedes
alone had noted the workings of her countenance, as
Isabella reproved, or Luis made his protestations, and they
were such as completely denoted the interest she felt in
our hero.
Ozema, resumed the queen, speaking slowly, and
with deliberate distinctness, in order that the other might
get the meaning of her words as she proceeded. Speak
art thou wedded to Luis de Bobadilla, or not?
Ozema Luis's wife, answered the girl, laughing and
blushing. Luis Ozema's husband.
This is plain as words can make it, Don Christopher,
and is no more than she hath already often affirmed, on my
anxious and repeated inquiries. How and when did Luis
wed thee, Ozema?
Luis wed Ozema with religion  with Spaniard's
religion
.
Ozema wed Luis with love and duty  with Hayti
manner.
This is extraordinary, Seora, observed the admiral,
and I would gladly look into it. Have I your Highness's
permission to inquire into the affair, myself?
Do as thou wilt, Seor, returned the queen, coldly.
My own mind is satisfied, and it behoveth my justice to
act speedily.
Conde de Llera, dost thou admit, or dost thou deny, that
thou art the husband of the lady Ozema? demanded
Columbus
,
gravely.
Lord Admiral, I deny it altogether. Neither have I
wedded her, nor hath the thought of so doing, with any
but Mercedes, ever crossed my mind.
This was said firmly, and with the open frankness that
formed a principal charm in the young man's manner.
Hast thou, then, wronged her, and given her a right to
think that thou didst mean wedlock?
I have not. Mine own sister would not have been more
respected than hath Ozema been respected by me, as is
shown by the fact that I have hastened to place her in the
care of my dear aunt, and in the company of Doa
Mercedes
.
This seemeth reasonable, Seora; for man hath ever
that much respect for virtue in your sex, that he hesitateth
to offend it even in his levities.
In opposition to all these protestations, and to so much
fine virtue, Seor Colon, we have the simple declaration of
one untutored in deceptiona mind too simple to deceive;
and of a rank and hopes that would render such a fraud as
unnecessary as it would be unworthy. Beatriz, thou dost
agree with me, and cannot find an apology for this recreant
knight, even though he were once the pride of thy house?
Seora, I know not. Whatever may have been the
failings
and weaknesses of the boy  and heaven it knows
that they have been many  deception and untruth have
never made a part. I have even ascribed the manner in
which he hath placed the princess in my immediate care,
to the impulses of a heart that did not wish to conceal the
errors of the head, and to the expectation that her presence
in my family might sooner bring me to a knowledge of the
truth. I could wish that the lady Ozema might be
questioned
more closely, in order that we make certain of not
being under the delusion of some strange error.
This is right, observed Isabella, whose sense of
justice
ever inclined her to make the closest examination into
the merits of every case that required her decision. The
fortune of a grandee depends on the result, and it is meet
he enjoy all fair means of vindicating himself from so
heinous an offence. Sir Count, thou canst therefore,
question
her, in our presence, touching all proper grounds of
inquiry.
Seora, it would ill become a knight to put himself in
array against a lady, and she, too, of the character and
habits of this stranger, answered Luis, proudly;
colouring
as he spoke, with the consciousness that Ozema was
utterly unable to conceal her predilection in his favour.
If such an office is, indeed, necessary, its functions would
better become another.
As the stern duty of punishing must fall on me, the
queen calmly observed, I will then assume this unpleasant
office. Seor Almirante, we may not shrink from any
obligation
that brings us nearer to the greatest attribute of
God, his justice. Princess, thou hast said that Don Luis
hath wedded thee, and that thou considerest thyself his
wife. When and where didst thou meet him before a
priest?
So many attempts had been made to convert Ozema to
Christianity, that she was more familiar with the terms
connected with religion than with any other part of the
language, though her mind was a confused picture of
imaginary
obligations, and of mystical qualities. Like all who
are not addicted to abstractions, her piety was more
connected
with forms than with principles, and she was better
disposed to admit the virtue of the ceremonies of the
church than the importance of its faith. The question of
the queen was understood, and, therefore, it was answered
without guile, or a desire to deceive.
Luis wed Ozema with Christian's cross, she said,
pressing to her heart the holy emblem that the young man
had given to her in a moment of great peril, and in a
manner the reader already knows. Luis think he about
to die  Ozema think she about to die  both wish to die
man and wife, and Luis wed with the cross, like good
Spanish Christian. Ozema wed Luis in her heart, like
Hayti lady, in her own country.
Here is some mistakesome sad mistake, growing out
of the difference of language and customs, observed the
admiral. Don Luis hath not been guilty of this deception.
I witnessed the offering of that cross, which was made at
sea, during a tempest, and in a way to impress me
favourably
with the count's zeal in behalf of a benighted soul.
There was no wedlock there; nor could any, but one who
hath confounded our usages, through ignorance, imagine
more than the bestowal of a simple emblem, that it was
hoped might be useful, in extremity, to one that had not
enjoyed the advantages of baptism and the church's offices.
Don Luis, dost thou confirm this statement, and also
assert that thy gift was made solely with this object?
asked the queen.
Seora, it is most true. Death was staring us in the
face, and I felt that this poor wanderer, who had trusted
herself to our care, with the simple confidence of a child,
needed some consolation; none seemed so meet, at the
moment
,
as that memorial of our blessed Redeemer, and of
our own redemption. To me it seemed to be the
preservative
next to baptism.
Hast thou never stood before a priest with her, nor in
any manner abused her guileless simplicity?
Seora, it is not my nature to deceive, and every
weakness
of which I have been guilty in connexion with Ozema
shall be revealed. Her beauty and her winning manners
speak for themselves, as doth her resemblance to Doa
Mercedes. The last, greatly inclined me to her, and, had not
my heart been altogether another's, it would have been my
pride to make the princess my wife. But we met too late
for that; and even the resemblance led to comparisons, in
which one, educated in infidelity and ignorance, must
necessarily
suffer. That I have had moments of tenderness
for Ozema, I will own; but that they ever supplanted, or
came near supplanting, my love for Mercedes, I do deny.
If I have any fault to answer for, to the lady Ozema, it is
because I have not always been able to suppress the
feelings
that her likeness to the Doa Mercedes, and her own
ingenuous simplicity  chiefly the former  have induced.
Never otherwise, in speech or act, have I offended against
her.
This soundeth upright and true, Beatriz. Thou
knowest
the count better than I, and can easier say how far we
ought to confide in these explanations.
My life on their truth, my beloved mistress! Luis is
no hypocrite, and I rejoice  oh! how exultingly do I
rejoice
!at
finding him able to give this fair vindication of
his conduct. Ozema, who hath heard of our form of
wedlock
,
and hath seen our devotion to the cross, hath mistaken
her position, as she hath my nephew's feelings, and
supposed
herself a wife, when a Christian girl would not have
been so cruelly deceived.
This really hath a seeming probability, Seores,
continued
the queen, with her sex's sensitiveness to her sex's
delicacy of sentiment, not to say to her sex's rights
This toucheth of a lady's  nay, of a princess' feelings,
and must not be treated of openly. It is proper that any
further explanations should be made only among females;
and I trust to your honour, as cavaliers and nobles, that
what hath this night been said never be spoken of, amid the
reveals of men. The lady Ozema shall be my care; and,
Count of Llera, thou shalt know my final decision
to-morrow
,
concerning Doa Mercedes and thyself.
As this was said with a royal, as well as with a womanly,
dignity, no one presumed to demur, but, making the
customary
reverences, Columbus and our hero left the presence.
It was late before the queen quitted Ozema, but what passed
in this interview will better appear in the scenes that are
still to be given.
CHAPTER XIV.
When sinking low the sufferer wan
Beholds no arm outstretch'd to save,
Fair, as the bosom of the swan
That rises graceful o'er the wave,
I've seen your breast with pity heave,
And
therefore
love you, sweet Genevieve!
Coleridge.
When
Isabella found herself alone with Ozema and
Mercedes
(for she chose that the last should be present), she
entered on the subject of the marriage with the tenderness
of a sensitive and delicate mind, but with a sincerity that
rendered further error impossible. The result showed how
naturally and cruelly the young Indian beauty had deceived
herself. Ardent, confiding, and accustomed to be considered
the object of general admiration among her own people,
Ozema had fancied that her own inclinations had been
fully answered by the young man. From the first moment
they met, with the instinctive quickness of a woman, she
perceived that she was admired, and, as she gave way to
the excess of her own feelings, it was almost a necessary
consequence of the communications she held with Luis, that
she should think they were reciprocated. The very want
of language in words, by compelling a substitution of one
in looks and acts, contributed to the mistake; and, it will
be remembered, that, if Luis's constancy did not actually
waver, it had been sorely tried. The false signification she
attached to the word Mercedes, largely aided in the
delusion
,
and it was completed by the manly tenderness and
care with which our hero treated her on all occasions.
Even the rigid decorum that Luis invariably observed, and
the severe personal respect which he maintained towards
his charge, had their effect on her feelings; for, wild and
unsophisticated as had been her training, the deep and
unerring
instinct of the feeble, told her the nature of the power
she was wielding over the strong.
Then came the efforts to give her some ideas of religion,
and the deep and lamentable mistakes which, imperfectly
explained, and worse understood subtleties, left on her plastic
mind. Ozema believed that the Spaniards worshipped the
cross. She saw it put foremost in all public ceremonies,
knelt to, and apparently appealed to, on every occasion that
called for an engagement more solemn than usual.
Whenever
a knight made a vow, he kissed the cross of his
sword-hilt
.
The mariners regarded it with reverence, and even
the admiral had caused one to be erected as a sign of his
right to the territory that had been ceded to him by
Guacanagari
.
In a word, to her uninstructed imagination, it
seemed as if the cross were used as a pledge for the fidelity
of all engagements. Often had she beheld and admired
the beautiful emblem worn by our hero; and, as the habits
of her own people required the exchange of pledges of value,
as a proof of wedlock, she fancied, when she received this
much-valued jewel, that she received the sign that our hero
took her for a wife, at a moment when death was about to
part them for ever. Further than this, her simplicity and
affections did not induce her to reason, or to believe.
It was an hour before Isabella elicited all these facts and
feelings from Ozema, though the latter clearly wished to
conceal nothing; in truth, had nothing to conceal. The
painful part of the duty remained to be discharged. It was
to undeceive the confiding girl, and to teach her the hard
lesson of bitterness that followed. This was done,
however
,
and the queen, believing it best to remove all delusion
Vol. II.  18
on the subject, finally succeeded in causing her to
understand
that, before the count had ever seen herself, his
affections
were given to Mercedes, who was, in truth, his
betrothed
wife. Nothing could have been gentler, or more
femininely tender, than the manner in which the queen
made her communication; but the blow struck home, and
Isabella, herself, trembled at the consequences of her own
act. Never before had she witnessed the outbreaking of
feeling in a mind so entirely unsophisticated, and the images
of what she then saw, haunted her troubled slumbers for
many succeeding nights.
As for Columbus and our hero, they were left mainly in
the dark, as to what had occurred, for the following week.
It is true, Luis received a kind and encouraging note from
his aunt, the succeeding day, and a page of Mercedes's
silently placed in his hand the cross that he had so long
worn; but, beyond this, he was left to his own conjectures.
The moment for explanation, however, arrived, and the
young man received a summons to the apartment of the
marchioness.
Luis did not, as he expected, meet his aunt on reaching
the saloon, which he found empty. Questioning the page
who had been his usher, he was desired to wait for the
appearance
of some one to receive him. Patience was not a
conspicuous virtue in our hero's character, and he excited
himself by pacing the room, for near half an hour, ere he
discovered a single sign that his visit was remembered.
Just as he was about to summon an attendant, however,
again to announce his presence, a door was slowly opened,
and Mercedes stood before him.
The first glance that the young man cast upon his
betrothed
,
told him that she was suffering under deep mental
anxiety. The hand which he eagerly raised to his lips
trembled, and the colour came and went on her cheeks, in
a way to show that she was nearly overcome. Still she
rejected the glass of water that he offered, putting it aside
with a faint smile, and motioning her lover to take a chair,
while she calmly placed herself on a
tabouret
one of the
humble seats she was accustomed to occupy in the presence
of the queen.
I have asked for this interview, Don Luis, Mercedes
commenced, as soon as she had given herself time to
command
her feelings, in order that there may no longer be
any reasons for mistaking our feelings and wishes. You
have been suspected of having married the Lady Ozema;
and there was a moment when you stood on the verge of
destruction, through the displeasure of Doa Isabella.
But, blessed Mercedes,
you
never imputed to me this
act of deception and unfaithfulness?
I told you truth, Seorfor that I knew you too well.
I felt certain that, whenever Luis de Bobadilla had made
up his mind to the commission of such a step, he would also
have the manliness and courage to avow it.
I
never, for
an instant, believed that you had wedded the princess.
Why, then, those cold and averted looks?eyes that
sought the floor, rather than the meeting of glances that
love delights in; and a manner which, if it hath not
absolutely displayed aversion, hath at least manifested a
reserve and distance that I had never expected to witness
from thee to me?
Mercedes's colour changed, and she made no answer for
a minute, during which little interval she had doubts of her
ability to carry out her own purpose. Rallying her
courage
,
however, the discourse was continued in the same
manner as before.
Hear me, Don Luis, she resumed, for my history
will not be long. When you left Spain, at my suggestion,
to enter on this great voyage, you loved
me
of that
grateful
recollection no earthly power can deprive me! Yes,
you then loved
me,
and me
only.
We parted, with our
troth plighted to each other; and not a day went by, during
your absence, that I did not pass hours on my knees,
beseeching
heaven in behalf of the admiral and his followers.
Beloved Mercedes! it is not surprising that success
crowned our efforts; such an intercessor could not fail to
be heard!
I entreat you, sir, to hear me. Until the eventful day
which brought the tidings of your return, no Spanish wife
could have felt more concern for him on whom she had
placed all her hopes, than I felt for you. To me, the future
was bright and filled with hope, if the present was loaded
with fear and doubt. The messenger who reached the
court, first opened my eyes to the sad realities of the world,
and taught me the hard lesson the young are ever slow
to learnthat of disappointment. It was then I first heard
of Ozemaof your admiration of her beautyyour
readiness
to sacrifice your life in her behalf!
Holy Luke! Did that vagabond, Sancho, dare to
wound thy ear, Mercedes, with any insinuations that touched
the strength or the constancy of my love for thee!
He related nought but the truth, Luis, and blame him
not. I was prepared for some calamity by his report, and
I bless God that it came on me by such slow degrees, and
with the means of preparation to bear it. When I beheld
Ozema, I no longer wondered at thy change of feeling,
scarce blamed it. Her beauty, I do think, thou might'st
have withstood; but her unfeigned devotion to thyself, her
innocence, her winning simplicity, and her modest
joyousness
and nature, are sufficient to win a lover from any
Spanish maiden
Mercedes!
Nay, Luis, I have told thee, that I blame thee not. It
is better that the blow come now, than later, when I should
not be able to bear it. There is something which tells me
that, as a wife, I should sink beneath the weight of blighted
affections; but, now, there are open to me the convent and
the espousals of the Son of God. Do not interrupt me,
Luis, she added, smiling sweetly, but with an effort that
denoted how difficult it was to seem easy. I have to
struggle severely to speak at all, and to an argument I am
altogether unequal. Thou hast not been able to control thy
affections; and to the strange novelties that have surrounded
Ozema, as well as to her winning ingenuousness, I owe my
loss, and she oweth her gain. It is the will of Heaven,
and I strive to think it is to my everlasting advantage.
Had I really wedded thee, the tenderness that is even now
swelling in my heartI wish not to conceal itmight have
grown to such a strength as to supplant the love I owe to
God; it is, therefore, doubtless, better as it is. If
happiness
on earth is not to be my lot, I shall secure happiness
hereafter. Nay, all happiness here will not be lost; I can
still pray for thee, as well as for myselfand thou and
Ozema, of all earthly beings, will ever be uppermost in my
thoughts.
This is so wonderful, Mercedes  so cruelso
unreasonable
and so unjust, that I cannot credit my ears!
I have said that I blame thee not. The beauty and
frankness of Ozema are more than sufficient to justify thee,
for men yield to the senses, rather than to the heart, in
bestowing their love. Then Mercedes blushed crimson
as she continueda Haytian maid may innocently use a
power, that it would ill become a Christian damsel to
employ. And, now, we will come to facts that press for a
decision. Ozema hath been illis still illdangerously so
as her Highness and my guardian believeeven as the
physicians say,but it is in thy power, Luis, to raise her,
as it might be, from the grave. See hersay but the word
that will confer happinesstell her, if thou hast not yet
wedded her after the manner of Spain, that thou wiltnay,
let one of the Holy Priests, who are in constant attendance
on her, to prepare the way for baptism, perform the
ceremony
this very morning, and we shall presently see the
princess, again, the smiling, radiant, joyous creature she
was, when thou first placed her in our care.
And this thou say'st to me, Mercedes, calmly and
deliberately, as if thy words express thy very wishes and
feelings!
Calmly I may
seem
to say it, Luis, answered our
heroine in a smothered tone, and deliberately I
do
say it.
Marry me, loving another better, thou canst not; and why
not then follow whither thy heart leadeth. The dowry of
the princess shall not be small, for the convent recluse hath
little need of gold, and none of lands.
Luis gazed earnestly at the enthusiastic girl, who in his
eyes never appeared more lovely; then rising he paced the
room for three or four minutes like one who wished to keep
down mental agony by physical action. When he had
obtained
a proper command of himself, he returned to his
seat, and taking the unresisting hand of Mercedes, he
replied
to her extraordinary proposal.
Watching over the sick couch of thy friend, and too
much brooding on this subject, love, hath impaired thy
judgment. Ozema hath no hold on my heart, in the way
18 *
thou fanciest  never had, beyond a passing and truant
inclination
Ah! Luis, those `passing and truant inclinations.'
None such, pressing both her hands on her own heart
have ever found a place here!
Thy education and mine, Mercedesthy habits and
minenay, thy nature and the ruder elements of mine, are
not,
cannot
be the same. Were they so, I should not
worship
thee as I now do. But didst thou not exist, the
certainty
that I should wed Ozema, would not give me
happiness
but
thou existing, and beloved as thou art, it would
entail on me a misery that even my buoyant nature could
not endure. In no case can I ever be the husband of the
Indian.
Although a gleam of happiness illumined the face of
Mercedes for a moment, her high principles and pure
intentions
soon suppressed the momentary and unbidden triumph,
and, even with a reproving manner, she made her answer.
Is this just to Ozema?Hath not her simplicity been
deluded by those `passing and truant inclinations,' and
doth not honour require that thy acts now redeem the
pledges that have been given by, at least, thy manner?
Mercedesbeloved girlhearken to me. Thou must
know, that, with all my levities and backslidings, I am no
coxcomb. Never hath my manner said aught that the
heart did not confirm, and never hath the heart been drawn
towards any but thee. In this, is the great distinction that
I make between thee and all others of thy sex. Ozema's
is not the only form, her's are not the only charms that
may have caught a truant glance from my eyes, or extorted
some unmeaning and bootless admiration, but thou, love,
art enshrined here, and seemest already a part of myself.
Didst thou know how often thy image hath proved a monitor
stronger than conscience; on how many occasions the
remembrance
of thy virtues and thy affections hath prevailed,
when even duty, and religion, and early lessons would
have been forgotten, thou would'st understand the difference
between the love I bear
thee,
and what thou hast so
tauntingly
repeated as truant and passing inclinations.
Luis, I ought not to listen to these alluring words,
which come from a goodness of heart that would spare me
present pain, only to make my misery in the end the deeper.
If thou hast never felt otherwise, why was the cross that I
gave thee at parting, bestowed on another?
Mercedes, thou know'st not the fearful circumstances
under which I parted with that cross. Death was staring
us in the face, and I gave it as a symbol that might aid a
heathen soul in its extremity. That the gift, or rather that
the thing I lent, was mistaken for a pledge of matrimony,
is an unhappy misconception, that your own knowledge of
Christian usages will tell you I could not foresee;
otherwise
I might now claim thee for my wife, in consequence
of having first bestowed it on me.
Ah! Luis; when I gave thee that cross, I did wish to
be understood as plighting my faith to thee for ever!
And when thou didst send it back to me, now within
the week, how was it thy wish to be understood?
I sent it to thee, Luis, in a moment of reviving hope,
and by the order of the queen. Her Highness is now
firmly thy friend, and would fain see us united, but for the
melancholy condition of Ozema, to whom all has been
explained
all,
as I fear, except the real state of thy feelings
towards us both.
Cruel girl!Am I then never to be believednever
again to be happy? I swear to thee, dearest Mercedes,
that thou alone hast my whole heart  that with thee, I
could be contented in a hovel, and that without thee, I
should be miserable on a throne. Thou wilt believe this,
when thou see'st me a wretch, wandering the earth, reckless
alike of hopes and objects, perhaps of character, because
thou alone canst make me, and keep me the man I ought to
be. Bethink thee, Mercedes, of the influence thou canst
havemust have
wilt
have on one of my temperament
and passions. I have long looked upon thee as my
guardian
angel, one that can mould me to thy will, and rule me
when all others fail. With theethe impatience produced
by thy doubts exceptedam I not ever tractable and gentle?
Hath Doa Beatriz ever exercised a tithe of thy power over
me, and hast thou ever failed to tame even my wildest and
rashest humours?
LuisLuisno one that knew it, ever doubted of thy
heart! Mercedes paused, and the working of her
countenance
proved that the earnest sincerity of her lover had
already shaken her doubts of his constancy. Still her
mind reverted to the scenes of the voyage, and her
imagination
pourtrayed the couch of the stricken Ozema. After
a minute's delay, she proceeded in a low, humbled tone
I will not deny that it is soothing to my heart to hear
this language, to which I fear I listen too readily, she said.
Still I find it difficult to believe that thou canst ever forget
one who hath even braved the chances of death, in order
to shelter thy body from the arrows of thy foes!
Believe not this, beloved girl; thou would'st have done
that thyself, in Ozema's place, and so I shall ever consider
it.
I should have the wish, Luis, Mercedes continued, her
eyes suffused with tears, but I might not have the power!
Thou would'stthou would'stI know thee too well
to doubt it.
I could envy Ozema the occasion, were it not sinful!
I fear thou wilt think of this, when thy mind shall have
tired with attractions that have lost their novelty.
Thou would'st not only have done it, but thou would'st
have done it far better. Ozema, moreover, was exposed in
her own quarrel, whilst thou would'st have exposed thyself
in mine.
Mercedes again paused, and appeared to muse deeply.
Her eyes had brightened under the soothing asseverations
of her lover, and, spite of the generous self-devotion with
which she had determined to sacrifice all her own hopes to
what she had imagined would make her lover happy, the
seductive influence of requited affection was fast resuming
its power.
Come with me, then, Luis, and behold Ozema, she at
length continued. When thou see'st her, in her present
state, thou wilt better understand thine own intentions. I
ought not to have suffered thee thus to revive thy ancient
feelings in a private interview, Ozema not being present;
it is like forming a judgment on the hearing of only one
side. And, Luis,her heightened colour, the effect of
feeling, not of shame, rendered the girl surpassingly
beautiful
and,
Luis, if thou should'st find reason to change
thy language after visiting the princess, however hard I
may find it to be borne, thou wilt be certain of my
forgiveness
for all that hath passed, and of my prayers
Sobs interrupted Mercedes, and she stopped an instant to
wipe away her tears, rejecting Luis's attempt to fold her in
his arms, in order to console her, with a sensitive jealousy
of the result; a feeling, however, in which delicacy had
more weight than resentment. When she had dried her
eyes, and otherwise removed the traces of her agitation,
she led the way to the apartment of Ozema, where the
presence
of the young man was expected.
Luis started on entering the room; a little on perceiving
that the queen and the admiral were present, and more at
observing the inroads that disappointment had made on the
appearance of Ozema. The colour of the latter was gone,
leaving a deadly paleness in its place; her eyes possessed a
brightness that seemed supernatural, and yet her weakness
was so evident as to render it necessary to support her, in
a half-recumbent posture, on pillows. An exclamation of
unfeigned delight escaped her when she beheld our hero,
and then she covered her face with both her hands, in
childish
confusion, as if ashamed at betraying the pleasure she
felt. Luis behaved with manly propriety, for, though his
conscience did not altogether escape a few twinges, at the
recollection of the hours he had wasted in Ozema's society,
and at the manner in which he had momentarily submitted
to the influence of her beauty and seductive simplicity, on
the whole he stood self-acquitted of any thing that might
fairly be urged as a fault, and most of all, of any thought
of being unfaithful to his first love, or of any design to
deceive
.
He took the hand of the young Indian respectfully,
and he kissed it with an openness and warmth that denoted
brotherly tenderness and regard, rather than passion, or the
emotion of a lover. Mercedes did not dare to watch his
movements, but she observed the approving glance that the
queen threw at her guardian, when he had approached the
couch on which Ozema lay. This glance she interpreted
into a sign that the count had acquitted himself in a
manner
favourable to her own interests.
Thou findest the lady Ozema weak and changed,
observed
the queen, who alone would presume to break a
silence that was already awkward. We have been
endeavouring
to enlighten her simple mind on the subject of
religion, and she hath, at length, consented to receive the
holy sacrament of baptism. The Lord Archbishop is even
now preparing for the ceremony in my oratory, and we
have the blessed prospect of rescuing this one precious soul
from perdition.
Your Highness hath ever the good of all your people
at heart, said Luis, bowing low to conceal the tears that
the condition of Ozema had drawn from his eyes. I fear
this climate of ours ill agrees with the poor Haytians,
generally
,
for I hear that the sick among them, at Seville and
Palos, offer but little hope of recovery.
Is this so, Don Christopher?
Seora, I believe it is only too true. Care hath been
had, however, to their souls, as well as to their bodies, and
Ozema is the last of her people, now in Spain, to receive
the holy rite of Christian baptism.
Seora, said the Marchioness, coming from the couch
with surprise and concern in her countenance, I fear our
hopes are to be defeated after all! The lady Ozema hath
just whispered me, that Luis and Mercedes must first be
married in her presence, ere she will consent to be admitted
within the pale of the church herself.
This doth not denote the right spirit, Beatrizand, yet,
what can be done with a mind so little illuminated with the
light from above. 'T is merely a passing caprice, and will
be forgotten when the archbishop shall be ready.
I think not, Seora. Never have I seen her so decided
and clear. In common, we find her gentle and tractable,
but this hath she thrice said, in a way to cause the belief
of her perfect seriousness.
Isabella now advanced to the couch, and spoke long and
soothingly to the invalid. In the meantime, the admiral
conversed with the Marchioness, and Luis again approached
our heroine. The evidences of emotion were plain in both,
and Mercedes scarce breathed, not knowing what to expect.
But a few low words soon brought an assurance that could
not fail to bring happiness, spite of her generous efforts to
feel for Ozemathat the heart of our hero was all her
own. From this moment Mercedes dismissed every doubt,
and she regarded Luis as had so long been her wont.
As is usual in the presence of royalty, the conversation
was carried on in a low tone; and a quarter of an hour
elapsed before a page announced that the oratory, or little
chapel, was ready, opening a door that communicated
directly
with it, as he entered.
This wilful girl persisteth, daughter-marchioness, said
the queen, advancing from the side of the couch, and I
know not what to answer. It is cruel to deny her the
offered means of grace, and yet it is a sudden and
unseemly
request to make of thy nephew and thy ward!
As for the first, dearest Seora, never distrust his
forgiveness
;
though I much doubt the possibility of prevailing
on Mercedes. Her very nature is made up of religion and
female decorum.
It is, indeed, scarce right to think of it. A Christian
maiden should have time to prepare her spirit for the holy
sacrament of marriage, by prayer.
And yet, Seora, many wed without it! The time
hath been when Don Ferdinand of Aragon and Doa
Isabella
might not have hesitated for such a purpose.
That time never was, Beatriz. Thou hast a habit of
making me look back to our days of trial and youth,
whenever
thou would'st urge on me some favourite but
ill-considered
wish of thine own. Dost really think thy ward
would overlook the want of preparation and time?
I know not what she might feel disposed to overlook,
Seora; but I do know that if there be one woman in Spain
who is at all times ready in
spirit,
for the most sacred rites
of the church, it is your Highness; and, if there be
another
,
it is my ward.
Go togo togood Beatriz; flattery sitteth ill on thee.
None are always ready, and all have an unceasing need
for watchfulness. Bid Doa Mercedes follow to my closet;
I will converse with her on this subject. At least, there
shall be no unfeminine and unseemly surprise.
So saying, the queen withdrew. She had hardly reached
her closet, before our heroine entered, with a doubtful and
timid step. As soon as her eyes met those of her
sovereign
,
Mercedes burst into tears, and falling on her knees
she again buried her face in the robe of Doa Isabella.
This outbreak of feeling was soon subdued, however,
and then the girl stood erect, waiting her sovereign's
pleasure
.
Daughter, commenced the queen, I trust there is no
longer any misapprehension between thee and the Conde de
Llera. Thou knowest the views of thy guardian and
myself
,
and mayest, in a matter like this, with safety defer to
our cooler heads and greater experience. Don Luis loveth
thee, and hath never loved the princess, though it would
not be out of character, did an impetuous young man, who
hath been much exposed to the temptation, betray some
transient and passing feeling towards one of so much
nature
and beauty.
Luis hath admitted all, Seora: inconstant he hath
never been, though he may have had his weaknesses.
'T is a hard lesson to learn, child, even in this stage
of thy life, said the queen, gravely; but it would have
been harder were it deferred until the nearer tenderness of
a wife had superseded the impulses of the girl. Thou hast
heard the opinions of the learned; there is little hope that
the princess Ozema can long survive.
Ah! Seora, 't is a cruel fate! To die among
strangers
,
in the flower of her beauty, and with a heart crushed
by the weight of unrequited love!
And yet, Mercedes, if Heaven open on her awaking
eyes, when the last earthly scene is over, the transition will
be most blessed; and they who mourn her loss, would do
wiser to rejoice. One so youthful, and so innocent; whose
pure mind hath been laid bare to us, as it might be, and
which we have found wanting in nothing beside the fruits
of a pious instruction, can have little to apprehend on the
score of personal errors. All that is required for such a
being, is to place her within the covenant of God's grace,
by obtaining the rite of baptism, and there is not a bishop
of the church that could depart with brighter hopes for the
future.
That holy office is my lord archbishop about to
administer
,
as I hear, Seora.
That
somewhat dependeth on thee, daughter. Listen,
and be not hasty in thy decision, which may touch on the
security of a human soul.
The queen now related to Mercedes the romantic request
of Ozema, placing it before her listener in terms so winning
and gentle, that it produced less surprise and alarm than
she herself had anticipated.
Doa Beatriz hath a proposal that may, at first, appear
plausible, but which reflection will not sanction. Her
design
was to cause the count actually to wed Ozema
Mercedes
started, and turned pale  in order that the last
hours of the young stranger might be soothed by the
consciousness
of being the wife of the man she idolized; but
I have found serious objections to the scheme. What is
thy opinion, daughter?
Seora, could I believe  as lately I did, but now do
not  that Luis had such a preference for the princess, as
might lead him, in the end, to the happiness of that mutual
affection without which wedlock must be a curse instead of
a blessing, I would be the last to object; nay, I think I
could even beg the boon of your Highness on my knees,
for she who truly loveth can only seek the felicity of its
object. But, I am assured the count hath not the affection
for the lady Ozema that is necessary to this end; and
would it not be profane, Seora, to receive the church's
sacraments under vows that the heart not only does not
answer to, but against which it is actually struggling?
Excellent girl! These are precisely my own views,
and in this manner have I answered the marchioness. The
rites of the church may not be trifled with, and we are
bound to submit to sorrows that may be inflicted, after all,
for our eternal good; though it be harder to bear those of
others than to bear our own. It remaineth only to decide
on this whim of Ozema's, and to say if thou wilt now be
married, in order that she may be baptized.
Notwithstanding the devotedness of feeling with which
our heroine loved Luis, it required a strong struggle with
her habits and her sense of propriety to take this great step
so suddenly, and with so little preparation. The wishes
of the queen, however, prevailed; for Isabella felt a deep
responsibility on her own soul, in letting the stranger
depart
without being brought within the pale of the church.
When Mercedes consented, she dispatched a messenger to
the marchioness, and then she and her companion both
knelt, and passed near an hour together, in the spiritual
Vol. II.  19
exercises that were usual to the occasion. In this mood,
did these two pure-minded females, without a thought
to the vanities of the toilet, but with every attention to the
mental preparations of which the case admitted, present
themselves at the door of the royal chapel, through which
Ozema had just been carried, still stretched on her couch.
The marchioness had caused a white veil to be thrown over
the head of Mercedes, and a few proper but slight
alterations
had been made in her attire, out of habitual deference
to the altar and its ministers.
About a dozen persons, deemed worthy of confidence,
were present, already; and just as the bride and
bride-groom
were about to take their places, Don Ferdinand
hastily entered, carrying in his hand some papers which he
had been obliged to cease examining, in order to comply
with the wishes of his royal consort. The king was a
dignified prince; and when it suited him, no sovereign
enacted his part more gracefully or in better taste.
Motioning
the archbishop to pause, he directed Luis to kneel.
Throwing over the shoulder of the young man the collar
of one of his own orders, he said
Now, arise, noble sir, and ever do thy duty to thy
Heavenly Master, as thou hast of late discharged it
towards
us.
Isabella rewarded her husband, for this act of grace, by
an approving smile, and the ceremony immediately
proceeded
.
In the usual time, our hero and heroine were
pronounced
man and wife, and the solemn rites were ended.
Mercedes felt, in the warm pressure with which Luis held
her to his heart, that she now understood him; and, for a
blissful instant, Ozema was forgotten, in the fulness of her
own happiness. Columbus had given away the bride, an
office that the king assigned to him, though he stood at the
bridegroom's side himself, with a view to do him honour,
and even so far condescended as to touch the canopy that
was held above the heads of the new-married couple. But,
Isabella kept aloof, placing herself near the couch of
Ozema
,
whose features she watched throughout the ceremony.
She had felt no occasion for public manifestations of
interest
in the bride, their feelings having so lately been
poured out together in dear and private communion. The
congratulations were soon over, and, then, Don Ferdinand,
and all but those who were in the secret of Ozema's history,
withdrew.
The queen had not desired her husband, and the other
attendants, to remain and witness the baptism of Ozema,
out of a delicate feeling for the condition of a female stranger,
whom her habits and opinions had invested with a
portion
of the sacred rights of royalty. She had noted the
intensity of feeling with which the half-enlightened girl
watched the movements of the archbishop and the parties,
and the tears had forced themselves from her own eyes, at
witnessing the struggle between love and friendship, that
was pourtrayed in every lineament of her pale, but still
lovely, countenance.
Where cross? Ozema eagerly demanded, as Mercedes
stooped to fold the wasted form of the young Indian in her
arms, and to kiss her cheek. Give cross  Luis no
marry with crossgive Ozema cross.
Mercedes, herself, took the cross from the bosom of her
husband, where it had lain near his heart, since it had been
returned to him, and put it in the hands of the princess.
No marry with cross, then, murmured the girl, the
tears suffusing her eyes, so as nearly to prevent her gazing
at the much-prized bauble. Now, quick, Seora, and
make Ozema Christian.
The scene was getting to be too solemn and touching for
many words, and the archbishop, at a sign from the queen,
commenced the ceremony. It was of short duration; and
Isabella's kind nature was soon quieted with the assurance
that the stranger, whom she deemed the subject of her
especial
care, was put within the covenant for salvation that
had been made with the visible church.
Is Ozema Christian now? demanded the girl, with a
suddenness and simplicity, that caused all present to look
at each other, with pain and surprise.
Thou hast, now, the assurance that God's grace will
be offered to thy prayers, daughter, answered the prelate.
Seek it with thy heart, and thy end, which is at hand,
will be more blessed.
Christian no marry heathen?Christian marry
Christian
?
This hast thou been often told, my poor Ozema,
returned
the queenthe rite could not be duly solemnized
between Christian and heathen.
Christian marry first lady he love best?
Certainly. To do otherwise would be a violation of
his vow, and a mockery of God.
So Ozema thinkbut he can marry second wife
inferior
wife  lady he love next. Luis marry Mercedes,
first wife, because he love bestthen he marry Ozema,
second
wifelower wifebecause he love next bestOzema
Christian, now, and no harm. Come, archbishop; make
Ozema Luis second wife.
Isabella groaned aloud, and walked to a distant part of
the chapel, while Mercedes burst into tears, and sinking on
her knees, she buried her face in the cloth of the couch,
and prayed fervently for the enlightening of the soul of the
princess. The churchman did not receive this proof of
ignorance in his penitent, and of her unfitness for the rite
he had just administered, with the same pity and indulgence.
The holy baptism thou hast just received, benighted
woman
,
he said, sternly, is healthful, or not, as it is
improved
.
Thou hast just made such a demand, as already
loadeth thy soul with a fresh weight of sin, and the time
for repentance is short. No Christian can have two wives
at the same time, and God knoweth no higher or lower, no
first or last, between those whom his church hath united.
Thou canst not be a second wife, the first still living.
No would be to Caonabo  to Luis, yes. Fifty,
hundred
wife to dear Luis! No possible?
Self-deluded and miserable girl, I tell thee no. No
nononevernevernever. There is such a taint of
sin in the very question, as profaneth this holy chapel, and
the symbols of religion by which it is filled. Ay, kiss and
embrace thy cross, and bow down thy very soul in despair,
for
Lord Archbishop, interrupted the Marchioness of
Moya, with a sharpness of manner that denoted how much
her ancient spirit was aroused, there is enough of this.
The ear thou would'st wound, at such a moment, is already
deaf, and the pure spirit hath gone to the tribunal of
another
,
and, as I trust, a milder judge. Ozema is dead!
It was, indeed, true. Startled by the manner of the
prelate  bewildered with the confusion of ideas that had
grown up between the dogmas that had been crowded on
her mind, of late, and those in which she had been early
taught; and physically paralyzed by the certainty that her
last hope of a union with Luis was gone, the spirit of the
Indian girl had deserted its beautiful tenement, leaving on
the countenance of the corpse a lovely impression of the
emotions that had prevailed during the last moments of its
earthly residence.
Thus fled the first of those souls, that the great discovery
was to rescue from the perdition of the heathen. Casuists
may refine, the learned dilate, and the pious ponder, on its
probable fate in the unknown existence that awaited it; but
the meek and submissive will hope all from the beneficence
of a merciful God. As for Isabella, she received a shock
from the blow, that temporarily checked her triumph at the
success of her zeal and efforts. Little, however, did she
foresee, that the event was but a type of the manner in
which the religion of the cross was to be abused and
misunderstood
;
a sort of practical prognostic of the defeat
of most of her own pious and gentle hopes and wishes.
CHAPTER XV.
A perfect woman, nobly planned,
To warn, to comfort, and command;
And yet a spirit still, and bright
With something of an angel light.
Wordsworth.
The
lustre that was thrown around the voyage of
Columbus
,
brought the seas into favour. It was no longer
deemed an inferior occupation, or unsuited to nobles, to
engage
in enterprises on its bosom; and that very
propensity
of our hero, which had so often been mentioned to his
prejudice, in former years, was now frequently named to
19 *
his credit. Though his real connexion with Columbus is
published, for the first time, in these pages, the
circumstance
having escaped the superficial investigations of the
historians, it was an advantage to him to be known as
having manifested what might be termed a maritime
disposition
,
in an age when most of his rank and expectations
were satisfied with the adventures of the land. A sort of
fashion was got up on behalf of the ocean; and the
cavalier
who had gazed upon its vast and unbroken expanse,
beyond the view of his mother earth, regarded him who
had not, much as he who had won his spurs looked down
upon him who had suffered the proper period of life to pass
without making the effort. Many of the nobles whose
estates touched the Mediterranean or the Atlantic, fitted out
small coasters  the yachts of the fifteenth century
and were met following the sinuosities of the glorious
coasts of that part of the world, endeavouring to derive a
satisfaction from a pursuit that it seemed meritorious to
emulate. That all succeeded, who attempted thus to
transfer
the habits of courts and castles to the narrow limits of
xebecs and felucca it would be hazarding too much to
assert; but there is little doubt that the spirit of the period
was sustained by the experiments, and that men were
ashamed to condemn that, which it was equally the policy
and the affectation of the day to extol. The rivalry
between
Spain and Portugal, too, contributed to the feeling
of the times; and there was soon greater danger of the
youth who had never quitted his native shores, being
pointed out for his want of spirit, than that the adventurer
should be marked for his eccentric and vagrant instability.
In the meanwhile, the seasons advanced, and events
followed
,
in their usual course, from cause to effect. About
the close of the month of September, the ocean, just
without
that narrow and romantic pass that separates Europe
from Africa, while it connects the transcendent
Mediterranean
with the broader wastes of the Atlantic, was glittering
with the rays of the rising sun, which, at the same time,
was gilding the objects that rose above the surface of the
blue waters. The latter were not numerous, though a
dozen different sails were moving slowly on their several
courses, impelled by the soft breezes of the season. Of
these, our business is with one alone, which it may be well
to describe in a few general terms.
The rig of the vessel in question, was latine, perhaps
the most picturesque of all that the ingenuity of man has
invented as the accessory of a view, whether given to the
eye by means of the canvass, or in its real dimensions and
substance. Its position, too, was precisely that which a
painter would have chosen as the most favourable to his
pencil, the little felucca running before the wind, with one
of its high pointed sails extended on each side, resembling
the pinions of some enormous bird that was contracting
its wings as it settled towards its nest. Unusual symmetry
was apparent in the spars and rigging; while the hull,
which was distinguished by lines of the fairest proportions,
had a neatness and finish that denoted the yacht of a
noble.
The name of this vessel was the Ozema, and she
carried
the Count of Llera with his youthful bride. Luis, who
had acquired much of the mariner's skill, in his many
voyages, directed the movements in person, though Sancho
Mundo strutted around her decks with an air of authority,
being the titular, if not the real patron of the craft.
Ay  ay  good Bartolemeo, lash that anchor well,
said the last, as he inspected the forecastle, in his hourly
rounds; for fair as may be the breezes, and mild as is
the season, no one can know what humour the Atlantic
may be in, when it fairly waketh up. In the great voyage
to Cathay, nothing could have been more propitious than
our outward passage, and nothing savour more of devils
incarnate, than the homeward. Doa Mercedes maketh an
excellent sailor, as ye all may see; and no one can tell
which way, or how far, the humour of the Conde may
carry him, when he hath once taken his departure. I tell
ye, fellows, that glory and gold may alight upon ye all,
any minute, in the service of such a noble; and I hope
none of ye have forgotten to come provided with
hawk'sbells
,
which are as remarkable for assembling doblas, as
the bells of the Seville cathedral are for assembling
Christians
.
Master Mundo called out our hero from the
quarter-deck
,
let there be a man sent to the extremity of the
foreyard
,
and bid him look along the sea to the north and east
of us.
This command interrupted one of Sancho's
self-glorifying
discourses, and compelled him to see the order executed.
When the seaman who was sent aloft, had shinned his
way to the airy and seemingly perilous position he had
been told to occupy, an inquiry went up from the deck, to
demand what he beheld.
Seor Conde, answered the fellow, the ocean is
studded with sails, in the quarter your Excellency hath
named, looking like the mouth of the Tagus, at the first of
a westerly wind.
Canst thou tell them, and let me know their numbers?
called out Luis.
By the mass, Seor, returned the man, after taking
time to make his countI see no less than sixteennay,
now I see another, a smaller just opening from behind a
carrack of sizeseventeen, I make them in all.
Then are we in season, love! exclaimed Luis, turning
towards Mercedes with delightonce more shall I grasp
the hand of the admiral, ere he quitteth us again for
Cathay. Thou seemest glad as myself, that our effort
hath not failed.
That which gladdeneth thee, Luis, is sure to gladden
me, returned the bride; where there is but one interest,
there ought to be but one wish.
Belovedbeloved Mercedesthou wilt make me every
thing thou canst desire. This heavenly disposition of
thine, and this ready consenting to voyage with me, will be
sure to mould me in such a way that I shall be less myself
than thee.
As yet, Luis, returned the young wife, smiling, the
change promiseth to be the other way, since thou art
much likelier to make me a rover, than I to make thee a
fixture of the castle of Llera.
Thou comest not out upon the sea, Mercedes, contrary
to thine own wishes? demanded Luis, with the earnest
quickness of one who was fearful he might unconsciously
have done an act of indiscretion.
No, dearest Luis; so far from it, that I have come with
satisfaction, apart from the pleasure I have had in obliging
thee. Fortunately, I feel no indisposition from the motion
of the felucca, and the novelty is of the most agreeable
and exciting kind.
To say that Louis rejoiced to hear this on more accounts
than one, is but to add that he still found a pleasure in the
scenes of the ocean.
In half an hour the vessel of the admiral was visible
from the Ozema's deck, and ere the sun had reached the
meridian, the little felucca was gliding into the centre of
the fleet, holding her course towards the carrack of
Columbus
.
The usual hailing passed, when, apprised of the
presence of Mercedes, the admiral gallantly repaired on
board the Ozema, to pay his respects in person. The
scenes through which they had passed together, had created
in Columbus a species of paternal regard for Luis, in
which Mercedes shared, through the influence of her noble
conduct during the events that occurred at Barcelona. He
met the happy pair, therefore, with dignified affection, and
his reception partook of the feelings that the Count and
Countess so fully reciprocated.
Nothing could be more striking to one who had an
opportunity of witnessing both, than the contrast between
the means with which the Genoese sailed on this, and on
his former voyage. Then he had set forth neglected,
almost forgotten, in three vessels, ill-found, and
worse-manned
,
whilst now, the ocean was whitened with his
canvass
,
and he was surrounded by no inconsiderable portion
of the chivalry of Spain. As soon as it was known that
the Countess of Llera was in the felucca that had stopped
the fleet, boats put off from most of the vessels, and
Mercedes
held a sort of court on the broad Atlantic; her own
female attendants, among whom were two or three of the
rank of ladies, assisting her in doing proper honour to the
cavaliers who thronged the deck. The balmy influence of
the pure air of the ocean, contributed to the happiness of
the moment; and, for an hour, the Ozema presented a
scene of gaiety and splendour, such as had never before
been witnessed by any person present.
Beautiful countess, cried one, who had been a rejected
suitor of our heroine, you see to what acts of desperation
your cruelty hath driven me, who am going forth on an
adventure to the farthest east. It is well for Don Luis that
I did not make this venture before he won your favour;
as no damsel in Spain is expected, henceforth, to withstand
the suit of one of the admiral's followers.
It may be as you say, Seor, returned Mercedes, her
heart swelling with the consciousness that he whom she
had chosen had made this same boasted adventure, whilst
others shrunk from its hazard, and when its result was still
a mystery in the unknown future  It may be as you
say; but one of moderate wishes, like myself, must be
content
with these unambitious voyages along the coast, in
which, happily, a wife may be her husband's companion.
Lady, cried the gallant and reckless Alonzo de Ojeda,
in his turn, Don Luis caused me to roll upon the earth,
in the tourney, by a fair and manly effort, that hath left no
rancour behind it; but I shall outdo him now, since he is
content to keep the shores of Spain in view, leaving to us
the glory of seeking the Indies, and of reducing the Infidels
to the sway of the two sovereigns!
It is a sufficient honour to my husband, Seor, that he
can boast of the success you name, and he must rest
satisfied
with the reputation acquired in that one deed.
Countess, a year hence, you would love him better, did
he come forth with us, and show his spirit among the
people
of the Grand Khan!
Thou seest, Don Alonzo, that the illustrious admiral
doth not altogether despise him as it is. They seek a
private
interview in my cabin together; an attention Don
Christopher would not be apt to pay a recreant, or a
laggard
.
'T is surprising! resumed the rejected suitor; the
favour of the Conde with our noble admiral hath surprised
us all, at Barcelona. Can it be, de Ojeda, that they have
met in some of their earlier nautical wanderings?
By the mass! Seor, cried Alonzo, laughing, if Don
Luis ever met the admiral, as he met me in the lists, I
should think one interview would answer for the rest of
their days!
In this manner did the discourse proceed, some speaking
in levity, some in more sober mood, and all in amity.
Whilst this was passing on deck, Columbus had, indeed,
retired
to a cabin with our hero.
Don Luis, said the admiral, when they were seated
near each other, and alone, thou knowest the regard I
bear thee, and I feel certain that thou returnest it with an
equal degree of esteem. I now go forth from Spain, on a
far more perilous adventure than that in which thou wert
my companion. Then I sailed concealed in contempt, and
veiled from human eyes by ignorance and pity; now, have
I left the old world, followed by malignancy and envy.
These facts am I too old not to have seen, and foreseen.
In my absence, many will be busy with my name. Even
they who now shout at my heels, will become my
calumniators
,
revenging themselves for past adulation by present
detraction. The sovereigns will be beset with lies, and any
disappointment in the degree of success will be distorted
into crimes. I leave friends behind me, toofriends, such
as Juan Perez, de St. Angel, Quintanilla, and thyself. On
ye, then, do I greatly rely, not for favours, but for the
interest
of truth and justice.
Seor, you may count upon my small influence under
all circumstances. I have seen you in the day of trial,
and it exceedeth ordinary misrepresentations to weaken my
faith in you.
This did I believe, Luis, even before it was so warmly
and sincerely said, returned the admiral, squeezing the
young man's hand with fervour. I doubt if Fonseca,
who hath now so much power in the affairs of India, is
truly my friend. Then, there is one of thy blood and name,
who hath already regarded me with unfavourable eyes,
and whom I distrust exceedingly, should an occasion offer
in which he might do me injury.
I know him well, Don Christopher, and account him
as doing no credit to the house of Bobadilla.
He hath credit, nevertheless, with the king, which is
of more importance, just now!
Ah! Seor, to that wily and double-faced monarch,
you must look for nothing generous. So long as Doa
Isabella's ear can be kept open to the truth, there is nothing
to fear, but Don Ferdinand groweth each day more worldly
and temporizing. Mass!that one who, in youth, was so
bold and manly a knight, should in his age betray so many
of the meannesses that would disgrace a Moor! My noble
aunt, however, is a host in herself, and will ever remain
true to you, as she commenced.
God overruleth all, and it were sinful to distrust either
his wisdom or justice. And now, Luis, one word touching
thyself. Providence hath made thee the guardian of the
happiness of such a being as is seldom found this side the
gates of heaven. The man who is blessed with a virtuous
and amiable wife, like her thou hast wedded, should erect
an altar in his heart, on which he ought to make daily, nay,
hourly, sacrifices of gratitude to God for the boon; since,
of all earthly blessings, he enjoyeth the richest, the purest,
and the most lasting, should he not be unmindful of his own
riches. But a woman like Doa Mercedes is a creature as
delicate as she is rare. Let her equanimity check thy
impetuosity
;
her purity rebuke the less-refined elements of
thy composition; her virtue stimulate thine own; her love
keep thine in an unceasing flame, and her tenderness be a
constant appeal to thy manly indulgence and protection.
Fulfil all thy duties as a Spanish grandee, son, and seek
felicity in the partner of thy bosom, and in love to God.
The admiral now gave Luis his blessing, and taking
leave of Mercedes in the same solemn manner, he hastened
to his carrack. Boat after boat quitted the felucca, many
calling out their leave-takings even after they were at a
distance. In a few minutes, the heavy yards swung round,
and the fleet was again sweeping off towards the
south-west
,
holding its way, as was then fancied, towards the
distant shore of India. For an hour the Ozema lay where
she had been left by Columbus, as if gazing at her retiring
friends; then her canvass filled, and she hauled up towards
that bight of the coast, at the bottom of which lay the port
of Palos de Moguer.
The afternoon was deliciously balmy, and when the
felucca drew in with the land, the surface of the sea was
as smooth as that of an inland lake. There was just
wind enough to cool the air, and to propel the little vessel
three or four knots through the water. The day
apartment
,
occupied by our hero and heroine, was on the
quarter-deck
.
It was formed, on the exterior, by a tarpawlin,
bent like the tilt of a wagon, while the interior was
embellished
with a lining of precious stuffs that converted it
into a beautiful little saloon. In front, a canvass bulkhead
protected it from the gaze of the crew; and, towards the stern,
a rich curtain fell, when it became necessary to shut out
the view. The latter was now carelessly festooned,
permitting
the eye to range over a broad expanse of the ocean,
and to watch the glories of the setting sun.
Mercedes reclined on a luxurious couch, gazing on the
ocean, and Luis touched a guitar, seated on a stool at her
feet. He had just played a favourite national air, which he
had accompanied with his voice, and had laid aside the
instrument, when he perceived that his young wife did not
listen, with her usual fondness and admiration, to his
music.
Thou art thoughtful, Mercedes, he said, leaning
forward
to read the melancholy expression of those eyes that
were so often glowing with enthusiasm.
The sun is setting in the direction of the land of poor
Ozema, Luis, Mercedes answered, a slight tremour
pervading
her voice; the circumstance, in connexion with
the sight of this boundless ocean, that so much resembleth
eternity, hath led me to think of her end. Surelysurely
a creature so innocent can never be consigned to eternal
misery, because her unenlightened mind and impassioned
feelings were unable to comprehend all the church's
mysteries
!
I would that thou thought'st less on this subject, love;
thy prayers, and the masses that have been said for her
soul, should content thee; or, if thou wilt, the last can
be repeated, again and again.
We will offer still more, returned the young wife,
scarce speaking above her breath, while the tears fell down
her cheeks. The best of us will need masses, and
we
owe
this to poor Ozema. Didst thou bethink thee, to intercede
again with the admiral, to do all service to Mattinao, on
reaching Espaola?
That hath been attended to, and so dismiss the subject
from thy mind. The monument is already erected at Llera,
and, we may feel regret for the loss of the sweet girl, but
can scarce mourn for her. Were I not Luis de Bobadilla,
Vol. II.  20
thy husband, dearest, I could think her the subject of envy,
rather than of pity.
Ah! Luis, thy flattery is too pleasing to bring reproof,
but it is scarce seemly. Even the happiness I feel, in being
assured of thy lovethat our fortunes, fate, name, interests
are one  is, in truth, but misery, compared with the
seraphic
joys of the blessed; and to such joys I could wish
Ozema's spirit might be elevated.
Doubt it not, Mercedes; she hath all that her goodness
and innocence can claim. Mass! If she even have half that
I feel, in holding thee thus to my heart, she is no subject for
grief, and thou say'st she hath, or wilt have, tenfold more.
LuisLuisspeak not thus! We will have other
masses said at Seville, as well as at Burgos and Salamanca.
As thou wilt, love. Let them be said yearly, monthly,
weekly, for ever, or as long as the churchmen think they
may have virtue.
Mercedes smiled her gratitude, and the conversation
became
less painful, though it continued to be melancholy.
An hour passed in this manner, during which, the
communion
was of the sweet character that pervades the
intercourse
of those who love tenderly. Mercedes had already
acquired a powerful command over the headlong
propensities
and impetuous feelings of her husband, and was
gradually
moulding him, unknown to herself, to be the man that
was necessary to her own feelings. In this change, which
was the result of influence, and not of calculation or design,
she was aided by the manly qualities of our hero, which
were secretly persuading him that he had now the
happiness
of another in his keeping, as well as his own. This
is an appeal that a really generous mind seldom withstands,
and far oftener produces the correction of minor faults, than
any direct management, or open rebukes. Perhaps
Mercedes's
strongest arm, however, was her own implicit
confidence
in her husband's excellence, Luis feeling a desire to
be that which she so evidently thought him; an opinion
that his own conscience did not, in the fullest extent,
corroborate
.
Just as the sun had set, Sancho came to announce that
he had let go the anchor.
Here we are, Seor Conde,  here we are, at last,
Senora
Doa Mercedes, lying off the town of Palos, and
within a hundred yards of the very spot where Don
Christopher
and his gallant companions departed for the
discovery
of the IndiesGod bless him a hundred-fold, and all
who went with him. The boat is ready to take you to the
shore, Seora; and there, if you do not find Seville, or
Barcelona, cathedrals and palaces, you will find Palos, and
Santa Clara, and the Ship-Yard Gatethree places that are,
henceforth, to be more renowned than either: Palos, as
having sent forth the expedition; Santa Clara, as having
saved it from destruction, by vows fulfilled at its altars;
and the Gate, for having had the ship of the admiral built
within it.
And other great events, good Sancho! put in the
count.
Just so, your Excellency; and for other great events.
Am I to land you, lady?
Mercedes assented, and in ten minutes she and her
husband
were walking on the beach, within ten yards of the
very spot where Columbus and Luis had embarked the
previous year. The firm sands were now covered with
people, walking in the cool of the evening. Most of them
were of the humbler classes, this being the only land, we
believe, in which the population of countries that possess a
favourable climate, do not thus mingle in their public
promenades
,
at that witching hour.
Luis and his beautiful wife had landed merely for
exercise
and relaxation, well knowing that the felucca
possessed
better accommodations than any hosteria of Palos;
and they fell into the current of the walkers. Before them
was a group of young matrons, who were conversing
eagerly, and sufficiently loud to be overheard. Our hero
and heroine instantly ceased their own discourse, when they
found that the subject was the voyage to Cathay.
This day, said one of the party, in a tone of
authority
,
did Don Christopher sail from Cadiz; the sovereigns
deeming Palos too small a port for the equipment of so
great an enterprise. You may depend on what I tell ye,
good neighbours; my husband, as you all well know,
holding
an appointment in the admiral's own ship.
You are to be envied, neighbour, that he is in so good
repute with so great a man!
How could he be otherwise, seeing that he was with
him before, when few had courage to be his companions,
and was ever faithful to his orders. `Monica'nay, it was
`
good
Monica'  said the admiral to me, with his own
mouth, `thy Pepe is a true-hearted mariner, and hath
conducted
to my entire satisfaction. He shall be made the
boatswain of my own carrack, and thou, and thy posterity,
to the latest antiquity, may boast that you belong to so
good a man.' These were his words; and what he said,
he did,Pepe being now a boatswain. But the
paters
and
aves
that I said to reach this good fortune, would pave this
beach!
Luis now stepped forward and saluted the party, making
curiosity to know the particulars of the first departure, his
excuse. As he expected, Monica did not recognize him in
his present rich attire, and she willingly related all she
knew, and not a little more. The interview showed how
completely this woman had passed from despair to
exultation
,
reducing the general and more public change of
sentiment
,
down to the individual example of a particular case.
I have heard much of one Pinzon, added Luis, who
went forth as pilot of a caravel in the voyage; what hath
become of him?
Seor, he is dead! answered a dozen voices, Monica's,
however, so far getting the ascendency, as to tell the story.
He was once a great man in this quarter; but now his
name is lost, like his life. He was untrue, and died of
grief, it is said, when he found the Nia lying in the river,
when he expected to have had all the glory to himself.
Luis had been too much engrossed with his own
feelings
to have heard this news before, and he continued his
walk, musing and sad.
So much for unlawful hopes, and designs that God
doth not favour! he exclaimed, when they had walked a
considerable distance. Providence hath, I think, been of
the admiral's side; and certainly, my love, it hath been of
mine.
This is Santa Clara, observed Mercedes. Luis, I
would enter, and return a thanksgiving at its altars for thy
safety and return, and offer a prayer for the future success
of Don Christopher.
They both entered the church, and they knelt together
at the principal altar; for, in that age, the bravest warriors
were not as much ashamed, as in our own times, of publicly
acknowledging their gratitude to, and their dependence on,
God. This duty performed, the happy pair returned silently
to the beach, and went off to the felucca.
Early in the morning, the Ozema sailed for Malaga,
again, Luis being fearful he might be recognized if he
continued
at Palos. Their port was reached in safety; and
shortly after the party arrived at Valverde, the principal
estate of Mercedes, where we shall leave our hero and
heroine in the enjoyment of a felicity that was as great
as could be produced by the connexion between manly
tenderness
on one side, and purity of feeling and disinterested
womanly love on the other.
At a late day, there were other Luis de Bobadillas in
Spain, among her gallant and noble, and other Mercedes',
to cause the hearts of the gay and aspiring to ache; but
there was only one Ozema. She appeared at court, in
the succeeding reign, and, for a time, blazed like a star that
had just risen in a pure atmosphere. Her career, however,
was short, dying young and lamented; since which time, the
name itself has perished. It is, in part, owing to these
circumstances
,
that we have been obliged to drag so much of
our legend from the lost records of that eventful period.
THE END.